CHAPTER I.
Day glimmered and I went, a gentle breeze
Ruffling the Leman lake.
Rogers
.
The
year was in its fall, according to a poetical
expression of our own, and the morning bright, as
the fairest and swiftest bark that navigated the
Leman lay at the quay of the ancient and
historical
town of Geneva, ready to depart for the country
of Vaud. This vessel was called the Winkelried,
in commemoration of Arnold of that name, who
had so generously sacrificed life and hopes to the
good of his country, and who deservedly ranks
among the truest of those heroes of whom we have
well-authenticated legends. She had been
launched
at the commencement of the summer, and still
bore at the fore-top-mast-head a bunch of
evergreens
,
profusely ornamented with knots and
streamers of riband, the offerings of the patron's
female friends, and the fancied gage of success.
The use of steam, and the presence of unemployed
seamen of various nations, in this idle season of
the warlike, are slowly leading to innovations and
improvements in the navigation of the lakes of
Italy and Switzerland, it is true; but time, even at
this hour, has done little towards changing the
habits
and opinions of those who ply on these inland
waters for a subsistence. The Winkelreid had the
two low, diverging masts; the attenuated and
picturesquely-poised
latine yards; the light, triangular
sails; the sweeping and projecting gangways; the
receding and falling stern; the high and peaked
prow, with, in general, the classical and quaint air
of those vessels that are seen in the older paintings
and engravings. A gilded ball glittered on the
summit of each mast, for no canvass was set higher
than the slender and well-balanced yards, and it
was above one of these that the wilted bush, with
its gay appendages, trembled and fluttered in a
fresh western wind. The hull was worthy of so
much goodly apparel, being spacious, commodious,
and, according to the wants of the navigation, of
approved mould. The freight, which was
sufficiently
obvious, much the greatest part being piled
on the ample deck, consisted of what our own
watermen would term an assorted cargo. It was,
however, chiefly composed of those foreign
luxuries
,
as they were then called, though use has now
rendered them nearly indispensable to domestic
economy, which were consumed, in singular
moderation
,
by the more affluent of those who dwelt
deeper among the mountains, and of the two
principal
products of the dairy; the latter being
destined
to a market in the less verdant countries of
the south. To these must be added the personal
effects of an unusual number of passengers, which
were stowed on the top of the heavier part of the
cargo, with an order and care that their value
would scarcely seem to require. The
arrangement
,
however, was necessary to the convenience
and even to the security of the bark, having been
made by the patron with a view to posting each
individual by his particular wallet, in a manner to
prevent confusion in the crowd, and to leave the
crew space and opportunity to discharge the
necessary
duties of the navigation.
With a vessel stowed, sails ready to drop, the
wind fair, and the day drawing on apace, the
patron of the Winkelried, who was also her owner,
felt a very natural wish to depart. But an
unlooked-for
obstacle had just presented itself at the
water-gate, where the officer charged with the
duty of looking into the characters of all who went
and came was posted, and around whom some fifty
representatives of half as many nations were now
clustered in a clamorous throng, filling the air with
a confusion of tongues that had some probable
affinity
to the noises which deranged the workmen
of Babel. It appeared, by parts of sentences and
broken
remonstrances, equally addressed to the patron,
whose name was Baptiste, and to the guardian of
the Genevese laws, a rumor was rife among these
truculent travellers, that Balthazar, the headsman,
or executioner, of the powerful and aristocratical
canton of Berne, was about to be smuggled into
their company by the cupidity of the former,
contrary
,
not only to what was due to the feelings and
rights of men of more creditable callings, but, as it
was vehemently and plausibly insisted, to the very
safety of those who were about to trust their
fortunes
to the vicissitudes of the elements.
Chance and the ingenuity of Baptiste had
collected
,
on this occasion, as party-colored and
heterogeneous an assemblage of human passions,
interests, dialects, wishes, and opinions, as any
admirer
of diversity of character could desire. There
were several small traders, some returning from
adventures in Germany and France, and some
bound southward, with their scanty stock of wares;
a few poor scholars, bent on a literary pilgrimage
to Rome; an artist or two, better provided with
enthusiasm than with either knowledge or taste,
journeying with poetical longings towards skies
and tints of Italy; a
troupe
of street jugglers, who
had been turning their Neapolitan buffoonery to
account among the duller and less sophisticated
inhabitants of Swabia; divers lacqueys out of
place; some six or eight capitalists who lived on
their wits, and a nameless herd of that set which
the French call bad subjects; a title that is just
now, oddly enough, disputed between the dregs
of
society and a class that would fain become its
exclusive
leaders and lords.
These with some slight qualifications that it is
not yet necessary to particularise, composed that
essential requisite of all fair representationthe
majority. Those who remained were of a different
caste. Near the noisy crowd of tossing heads and
brandished arms, in and around the gate, was a
party containing the venerable and still fine figure
of a man in the travelling dress of one of superior
condition, and who did not need the testimony of
the two or three liveried menials that stood near
his person, to give an assurance of his belonging to
the more fortunate of his fellow-creatures, as good
and evil are usually estimated in calculating the
chances of life. On his arm leaned a female, so
young, and yet so lovely, as to cause regret in all
who observed her fading color, the sweet but
melancholy smile that occasionally lighted her mild
and pleasing features, at some of the more marked
exuberances of folly among the crowd, and a form
which, notwithstanding her lessened bloom, was
nearly perfect. If these symptoms of delicate
health, did not prevent this fair girl from being
amused at the volubility and arguments of the
different
orators, she oftener manifested apprehension
at finding herself the companion of creatures so
untrained, so violent, so exacting, and so grossly
ignorant. A young man, wearing the roquelaure
and other similar appendages of a Swiss in foreign
military service, a character to excite neither
observation
nor comment in that age, stood at her
Vol. I. B
elbow, answering the questions that from time to
time were addressed to him by the others, in a
manner to show he was an intimate acquaintance,
though there were signs about his travelling
equipage
to prove he was not exactly of their ordinary
society. Of all who were not immediately
engaged
in the boisterous discussion at the gate, this
young soldier, who was commonly addressed by
those near him as Monsieur Sigismund, was much
the most interested in its progress. Though of
herculean frame, and evidently of unusual physical
force, he was singularly agitated. His cheek,
which had not yet lost the freshness due to the
mountain air, would, at times, become pale as
that of the wilting flower near him; while at
others
,
the blood rushed across his brow in a torrent
that seemed to threaten a rupture of the starting
vessels in which it so tumultuously flowed. Unless
addressed, however, he said nothing; his distress
gradually subsiding, until it was merely betrayed
by the convulsive writhings of his fingers, which
unconsciously grasped the hilt of his sword.
The uproar had now continued for some time;
throats were getting sore, tongues clammy, voices
hoarse, and words incoherent, when a sudden check
was given to the useless clamor by an incident
quite in unison with the disturbance itself. Two
enormous dogs were in attendance hard by,
apparently
awaiting the movements of their respective
masters, who were lost to view in the mass of
heads and bodies that stopped the passage of the
gate. One of these animals was covered with a
short, thick coating of hair, whose prevailing
color
was a dingy yellow, but whose throat and
legs, with most of the inferior parts of the body,
were of a dull white. Nature, on the other hand,
had given a dusky, brownish, shaggy dress to his
rival, though his general hue was relieved by a few
shades of a more decided black. As respects
weight and force of body, the difference between
the brutes was not very obvious, though perhaps it
slightly inclined in favor of the former, who in
length, if not in strength, of limb, however, had
more manifestly the advantage.
It would much exceed the intelligence we have
brought to this task to explain how far the instincts
of the dogs sympathised in the savage passions of
the human beings around them, or whether they
were conscious that their masters had espoused
opposite sides in the quarrel, and that it became
them, as faithful esquires, to tilt together by way of
supporting the honor of those they followed; but,
after measuring each other for the usual period
with the eye, they came violently together, body to
body, in the manner of their species. The collision
was fearful, and the struggle, being between two
creatures of so great size and strength, of the
fiercest kind. The roar resembled that of lions,
effectually drowning the clamor of human voices.
Every tongue was mute, and each head was
turned
in the direction of the combatants. The
trembling
girl recoiled with averted face, while the
young man stepped eagerly forward to protect
her, for the conflict was near the place they
occupied
;
but powerful and active as was his frame,
he hesitated about mingling in an affray so
ferocious
.
At this critical moment, when it seemed
that the furious brutes were on the point of tearing
each other in pieces, the crowd was pushed
violently
open, and two men burst, side by side, out of
the mass. One wore the black robes, the conical,
Asiatic-looking, tufted cap, and the white belt of an
Augustine monk, and the other had the attire of a
man addicted to the seas, without, however, being
so decidedly maritime as to leave his character a
matter that was quite beyond dispute. The former
was fair, ruddy, with an oval, happy face, of which
internal peace and good-will to his fellows were the
principal characteristics, while the latter had the
swarthy hue, bold lineaments, and glittering eye,
of an Italian.
Uberto! said the monk reproachfully,
affecting
the sort of offended manner that one would be
apt to show to a more intelligent creature, willing,
but at the same time afraid, to trust his person
nearer to the furious conflict, shame on thee, old
Uberto! Hast forgotten thy schoolinghast no
respect for thine own good name?
On the other hand, the Italian did not stop to
expostulate; but throwing himself with reckless
hardihood on the dogs, by dint of kicks and blows,
of which much the heaviest portion fell on the
follower
of the Augustine, he succeeded in separating
the combatants.
Ha, Nettuno! he exclaimed, with the severity
of one accustomed to exercise a stern and absolute
authority, so soon as this daring exploit was
achieved, and he had recovered a little of the
breath lost in the violent exertionwhat dost
mean? Canst find no better amusement than
quarrelling
with a dog of San Bernardo! Fie upon thee,
foolish Nettuno! I am ashamed of thee, dog: thou,
that hast discreetly navigated so many seas, to
lose thy temper on a bit of fresh water!
The dog, which was in truth no other than a
noble animal of the well-known Newfoundland
breed, hung his head, and made signs of contrition,
by drawing nearer to his master with a tail that
swept the ground, while his late adversary quietly
seated himself with a species of monastic dignity,
looking from the speaker to his foe, as if
endeavoring
to comprehend the rebuke which his powerful
and gallant antagonist took so meekly.
Father, said the Italian, our dogs are both
too useful, in their several ways, and both of too
good character to be enemies. I know Uberto
of old, for the paths of St. Bernard and I are no
strangers, and, if report does the animal no more
than justice, he hath not been an idle cur among
the snows.
He hath been the instrument of saving seven
Christians from death, answered the monk,
beginning
again to regard his mastiff with friendly looks,
for at first there had been keen reproach and
severe
displeasure in his mannernot to speak
of the bodies that have been found by his activity,
after the vital spark had fled.
As for the latter, father, we can count little
more in favor of the dog than a good intention.
Valuing services on this scale, I might ere this
have been the holy father himself, or at least a
cardinal
;
but seven lives saved, for their owners to
die quietly in their beds, and with opportunity to
make their peace with heaven, is no bad
recommendation
for a dog. Nettuno, here, is every way
worthy to be the friend of old Uberto, for thirteen
drowning men have I myself seen him draw from
the greedy jaws of sharks and other monsters of
deep water. What dost thou say, father; shall
we make peace between the brutes?
The Augustine expressed his readiness, as well
as his desire, to aid in an effort so laudable, and by
dint of commands and persuasion, the dogs, who
were predisposed to peace from having had a
mutual
taste of the bitterness of war, and who now
felt for each other the respect which courage and
force are apt to create, were soon on the usual
terms of animals of their kind that have no
particular
grounds for contention.
The guardian of the city improved the calm
produced
by this little incident, to regain a portion of
his lost authority. Beating back the crowd with
B 2
his cane, he cleared a space around the gate into
which but one of the travellers could enter at a
time, while he professed himself not only ready but
determined to proceed with his duty, without
further
procrastination. Baptiste, the patron, who
beheld the precious moments wasting, and who, in
the delay, foresaw a loss of wind, which, to one of
his pursuits, was loss of money, now earnestly
pressed the travellers to comply with the necessary
forms, and to take their stations in his bark with
all convenient speed.
Of what matter is it, continued the
calculating
waterman, who was rather conspicuously
known for the love of thrift that is usually
attributed
to most of the inhabitants of that region,
whether there be one headsman or twenty in the
bark, so long as the good vessel can float and
steer? Our Leman winds are fickle friends, and
the wise take them while in the humor. Give me
the breeze at west, and I will load the Winkelried
to the water's edge with executioners, or any other
pernicious creatures thou wilt, and thou mayest
take the lightest bark that ever swam in the
bise
,
and let us see who will first make the haven of
Vvey!
The loudest, and in a sense that is very
important
in all such discussions, the principal, speaker
in the dispute, was the leader of the Neapolitan
troupe
, who, in virtue of good lungs, an agility that
had no competitor in any present, and a certain
mixture of superstition and bravado, that formed
nearly equal ingredients in his character, was a
man likely to gain great influence with those who,
from their ignorance and habits, had an inherent
love of the marvellous, and a profound respect for
all who possessed, in acting, more audacity, and,
in believing, more credulity than themselves. The
vulgar like an excess, even if it be of folly; for, in
their eyes, the abundance of any particular quality
is very apt to be taken as the standard of its
excellence
.
This is well for him who receives, but it may
be death to him that pays, cried the son of the
south, gaining not a little among his auditors by
the distinction, for the argument was sufficiently
wily, as between the buyer and the seller. Thou
wilt get thy silver for the risk, and we may get
watery graves for our weakness. Nought but
mishaps can come of wicked company, and
accursed
will they be, in the evil hour, that are found
in brotherly communion with one whose trade is
hurrying Christians into eternity, before the time
that has been lent by nature is fairly up. Santa
Madre! I would not be the fellow-traveller of such
a wretch, across this wild and changeable lake, for
the honor of leaping and showing my poor powers
in the presence of the Holy Father, and the whole
of the learned conclave!
This solemn declaration, which was made with
suitable gesticulation, and an action of the
countenance
that was well adapted to prove the speaker's
sincerity, produced a corresponding effect on most
of the listeners, who murmured their applause in a
manner sufficiently significant to convince the
patron he was not about to dispose of the difficulty,
simply by virtue of fair words. In this dilemma,
he bethought him of a plan of overcoming the
scruples of all present, in which he was warmly
seconded by the agent of the police, and to which,
after the usual number of cavilling objections that
were generated by distrust, heated blood, and the
obstinacy of disputation, the other parties were
finally induced to give their consent. It was
agreed that the examination should no longer be
delayed, but that a species of deputation from the
crowd might take their stand within the gate,
where all who passed would necessarily be subject
to their scrutiny, and, in the event of their
vigilance
detecting the abhorred and proscribed
Balthazar
,
that the patron should return his money to
the headsman, and preclude him from forming one
of a party that was so scrupulous of its
association
,
and, apparently, with so little reason. The
Neapolitan, whose name was Pippo; one of the
indigent scholars, for a century since learning was
rather the auxiliary than the foe of superstition;
and a certain Nicklaus Wagner, a fat Bernese,
who was the owner of most of the cheeses in the
bark, were the chosen of the multitude on this
occasion
.
The first owed his election to his
vehemence
and volubility, qualities that the ignoble
vulgar are very apt to mistake for conviction and
knowledge; the second to his silence and a
demureness
of air which pass with another class for
the stillness of deep water; and the last to his
substance
,
as a man of known wealth, an advantage
which, in spite of all that alarmists predict on one
side and enthusiasts affirm on the other, will
always
carry greater weight with those who are
less fortunate in this respect, than is either
reasonable
or morally healthful, provided it is not abused
by arrogance or by the assumption of very
extravagant
and oppressive privileges. As a matter of
course, these deputed guardians of the common
rights were first obliged to submit their own
papers
to the eye of the Genevese.
[1]
[1]
As we have so often alluded to this examination, it may
be well to explain, that the present system of gend'armerie and
passports did not then prevail in Europe; taking their rise
nearly a century later than that in which the events of this
tale had place. But Geneva was a small and exposed state,
and the regulation to which there is reference here, was one
of the provisions which were resorted to, from time to time,
in order to protect those liberties and that independence, of
which its citizens were so unceasingly and so wisely jealous.
The Neapolitan, than whom an archer knave,
or one that had committed more petty wrongs, did
not present himself that day at the water-gate, was
regularly fortified by every precaution that the
long experience of a vagabond could suggest, and
he was permitted to pass forthwith. The poor
Westphalian student presented an instrument fairly
written out in scholastic Latin, and escaped further
trouble by the vanity of the unlettered agent of the
police, who hastily affirmed it was a pleasure to
encounter documents so perfectly in form. But
the Bernese was about to take his station by the
side of the other two, appearing to think inquiry,
in his case, unnecessary. While moving through
the passage in stately silence, Nicklaus Wagner
was occupied in securing the strings of a
well-filled
purse, which he had just lightened of a small
copper coin, to reward the varlet of the hostelry
in which he had passed the night, and who had
been obliged to follow him to the port to obtain
even this scanty boon; and the Genevese was fain
to believe that, in the urgency of this important
concern, he had overlooked those forms which all
were, just then, obliged to respect, on quitting the
town.
Thou hast a name and character? observed
the latter, with official brevity.
God help thee, friend!I did not think
Geneva
had been so particular with a Swiss;and a
Swiss who is so favorably known on the Aar, and
indeed over the whole of the great canton! I am
Nicklaus Wagner, a name of little account,
perhaps
,
but which is well esteemed among men of
substance, and which has a right even to the B
urgerschaft
Nicklaus
Wagner of Bernethou wilt
scarce need more?
Naught but proof of its truth. Thou wilt
remember
this is Geneva; the laws of a small and
exposed state need be particular in affairs of this
nature.
I never questioned thy state being Geneva; I
only wonder thou shouldst doubt my being
Nicklaus
Wagner! I can journey the darkest night that
ever threw a shadow from the mountains,
anywhere
between the Jura and the Oberland, and
none shall say my word is to be disputed. Look
'ee, there is the patron, Baptiste, who will tell thee,
that if he were to land the freight which is shipped
in my name, his bark would float greatly the
lighter.
All this time Nicklaus was nothing loth to show
his papers, which were quite in rule. He even
held them, with a thumb and finger separating the
folds, ready to be presented to his questioner. The
hesitation came from a feeling of wounded vanity,
which would gladly show that one of his local
importance
and known substance was to be exempt
from the exactions required from men of smaller
means. The officer, who had great practice in
this species of collision with his fellow-creatures,
understood the character with which he had to
deal, and, seeing no good reason for refusing to
gratify a feeling which was innocent, though
sufficiently
silly, he yielded to the Bernese pride.
Thou canst proceed, he said, turning the
indulgence
to account, with a ready knowledge of
his duty; and when thou gettest again among
thy burghers, do us of Geneva the grace to say,
we treat our allies fairly.
I thought thy question hasty! exclaimed the
wealthy peasant, swelling like one who gets
justice
,
though tardily. Now let us to this knotty
affair of the headsman.
Taking his place with the Neapolitan and the
Westphalian, Nicklaus assumed the grave air of
a judge, and an austerity of manner which proved
that he entered on his duty with a firm resolution
to do justice.
Thou art well known here, pilgrim, observed
the officer, with some severity of tone, to the next
that came to the gate.
St. Francis to speed, master, it were else
wonderful! I should be so, for the seasons scarce
come and go more regularly.
There must be a sore conscience somewhere,
that Rome and thou should need each other so
often?
The pilgrim, who was enveloped in a tattered
coat, sprinkled with cockle-shells, who wore his
beard, and was altogether a disgusting picture
of human depravity, rendered still more revolting
by an ill-concealed hypocrisy, laughed openly
and recklessly at the remark.
Thou art a follower of Calvin, master, he
replied, or thou would'st not have said this. My
own failings give me little trouble. I am engaged
by certain parishes of Germany to take upon my
poor person their physical pains, and it is not easy
to name another that hath done as many messages
of this kind as myself, with better proofs of
fidelity
.
If thou hast any little offering to make, thou
shalt see fair papers to prove what I say;papers
that would pass at St. Peter's itself!
The officer perceived that he had to do with one
of those unequivocal hypocritesif such a word can
properly be applied to him who scarcely thought
deception necessarywho then made a traffic of
expiations of this nature; a pursuit that was
common
enough at the close of the close of the seventeenth and in
the commencement of the eighteenth centuries, and
which has not even yet entirely disappeared from
Europe. He threw the pass with unconcealed
aversion towards the profligate, who, recovering
his document, assumed unasked his station by the
side of the three who had been selected to decide
on the fitness of those who were to be allowed to
embark.
Go to! cried the officer, as he permitted this
ebullition of disgust to escape him; thou hast
well said that we are followers of Calvin. Geneva
has little in common with her of the scarlet
mantle
,
and thou wilt do well to remember this, in thy
next pilgrimage, lest the beadle make acquaintance
with thy back.Hold! who art thou?
A heretic, hopelessly damned by anticipation,
if that of yonder travelling prayer-monger be
the true faith; answered one who was pressing
past, with a quiet assurance that had near carried
its point without incurring the risks of the usual
investigation into his name and character. It was
the owner of Nettuno, whose aquatic air and
perfect
self-possession now caused the officer to doubt
whether he had not stopped a waterman of the
lakea class privileged to come and go at will.
Thou knowest our usages, said the
half-satisfied
Genevese.
I were a fool else! Even the ass that often
travels the same path comes in time to tell its
turns and windings. Art not satisfied with
touching
the pride of the worthy Nicklaus Wagner, by
putting the well-warmed burgher to his proofs, but
thou would'st e'en question me! Come hither,
Nettuno; thou shalt answer for both, being a dog
of discretion. We are no go-betweens of heaven
and earth, thou knowest, but creatures that come
part of the water and part of the land!
The Italian spoke loud and confidently, and in
the manner of one who addressed himself more to
the humors of those near than to the
understanding
of the Genevese. He laughed, and looked
about him in a manner to extract an echo from
the crowd, though not one among them all could
probably have given a sufficient reason why he
had so readily taken part with the stranger against
the authorities of the town, unless it might have
been from the instinct of opposition to the law.
Thou hast a name? continued the
half-yielding
,
half-doubting guardian of the port.
Dost take me to be worse off than the bark of
Baptiste, there? I have papers, too, if thou wilt that
I go to the vessel in order to seek them. This dog
is Nettuno, a brute from a far country, where
brutes swim like fishes, and my name is Maso,
though wicked-minded men call me oftener Il
Maledetto than by any other title.
All in the throng, who understood the
signification
of what the Italian said, laughed aloud, and
apparently with great glee, for, to the grossly
vulgar, extreme audacity has an irresistible charm.
The officer felt that the merriment was against
him, though he scarce knew why; and ignorant
of the language in which the other had given his
extraordinary appellation, he yielded to the
contagion
,
and laughed with the others, like one who
understood the joke to the bottom. The Italian
profited by this advantage, nodded familiarly with
a good-natured and knowing smile, and proceeded.
Whistling the dog to his side, he walked leisurely
to the bark, into which he was the first that
entered
,
always preserving the deliberation and calm
of a man who felt himself privileged, and safe from
farther molestation. This cool audacity effected
its purpose, though one long and closely hunted
by the law evaded the authorities of the town,
when this singular being took his seat by the little
package which contained his scanty wardrobe.
Vol. I. C
CHAPTER II.
My nobiel liege! all my request
Ys for a nobile knyghte,
Who, tho' mayhap he has done wronge,
Hee thoughte ytt stylle was righte.
Chatterton
.
While
this impudent evasion of vigilance was
successfully practised by so old an offender, the
trio of sentinels, with their volunteer assistant the
pilgrim, manifested the greatest anxiety to prevent
the contamination of admitting the highest
executioner
of the law to form one of the strangely
assorted
company. No sooner did the Genevese
permit a traveller to pass, than they commenced
their private and particular examination, which
was sufficiently fierce, for more than once had they
threatened to turn back the trembling, ignorant
applicant on mere suspicion. The cunning
Baptiste
lent himself to their feelings with the skill of
a demagogue, affecting a zeal equal to their own,
while, at the same time, he took care most to
excite
their suspicions where there was the smallest
danger of their being rewarded with success.
Through this fiery ordeal one passed after another,
until most of the nameless vagabonds had been
found innocent, and the throng around the gate
was so far lessened as to allow a freer circulation
in the thoroughfare. The opening permitted the
venerable noble, who has already been presented
to the reader, to advance to the gate, accompanied
by the female, and closely followed by the menials.
The servitor of the police saluted the stranger
with deference, for his calm exterior and imposing
presence were in singular contrast with the noisy
declamation and rude deportment of the rabble
that had preceded.
I am Melchior de Willading, of Berne, said
the traveller, quietly offering the proofs of what
he said, with the ease of one sure of his
impunity
;
this is my childmy only child, the old
man repeated the latter words with melancholy
emphasis, and these, that wear my livery, are
old and faithful followers of my house. We go
by the St. Bernard, to change the ruder side of
our Alps for that which is more grateful to the
weakto see if there be a sun in Italy that hath
warmth enough to revive this drooping flower,
and to cause it once more to raise its head
joyously
,
as until lately, it did ever in its native halls.
The officer smiled and repeated his reverences,
always declining to receive the offered papers;
for the aged father indulged the overflowing of
his feelings in a manner that would have awakened
even duller sympathies.
The lady has youth and a tender parent of her
side, he said; these are much when health fails
us.
She is indeed too young to sink so early!
returned the father, who had apparently forgotten
his immediate business, and was gazing with a
tearful eye at the faded but still eminently
attractive
features of the young female, who rewarded
his solicitude with a look of love; but thou hast
not seen I am the man I represent myself to be.
It is not necessary, noble baron; the city knows
of your presence, and I have it, in especial charge,
to do all that may be grateful to render the
passage
through Geneva, of one so honored among
our allies, agreeable to his recollections.
Thy city's courtesy is of known repute, said
the Baron de Willading, replacing his papers in
their usual envelope, and receiving the grace like
one accustomed to honors of this sort:art thou
a father?
Heaven has not been niggardly of gifts of this
nature: my table feeds eleven, besides those who
gave them being.
Eleven!The will of God is a fearful
mystery
!
And this thou seest is the sole hope of my
line;the only heir that is left to the name and
lands of Willading! Art thou at ease in thy
condition
?
There are those in our town who are less so,
with many thanks for the friendliness of the
question
.
A slight color suffused the face of Adelheid de
Willading, for so was the daughter of the Bernese
called, and she advanced a step nearer to the
officer.
They who have so few at their own board,
need think of those who have so many, she said,
dropping a piece of gold into the hand of the
Genevese
:
then she added, in a voice scarce louder
than a whisperIf the young and innocent of
thy household can offer a prayer in the behalf of
a poor girl who has much need of aid, 'twill be
remembered of God, and it may serve to lighten
the grief of one who has the dread of being
childless
.
God bless thee, lady! said the officer, little
used to deal with such spirits, and touched by the
mild resignation and piety of the speaker, whose
simple but winning manner moved him nearly to
tears; all of my family, old as well as young,
shall bethink them of thee and thine.
Adelheid's cheek resumed its paleness, and she
quietly accompanied her father, as he slowly
proceeded
towards the bark. A scene of this nature
did not fail to shake the pertinacity of those who
stood at watch near the gate. Of course they had
nothing to say to any of the rank of Melchior de
Willading, who went into the bark without a
question
.
The influence of beauty and station united
to so much simple grace as that shown by the fair
actor in the little incident we have just related,
was much too strong for the ill-trained feelings of
the Neapolitan and his companions. They not only
let all the menials pass unquestioned also, but it
was some little time before their vigilance resumed
its former truculence. The two or three
travellers
that succeeded had the benefit of this
fortunate
change of disposition.
The next who came to the gate was the young
soldier, whom the Baron de Willading had so
often
addressed as Monsieur Sigismund. His papers
were regular, and no obstacle was offered to his
departure. It may be doubted how far this young
man would have been disposed to submit to these
extra-official inquiries of the three deputies of the
crowd, had there been a desire to urge them, for
he went towards the quay, with an eye that
expressed
any other sensation than that of amity or
compliance. Respect, or a more equivocal
feeling
,
proved his protection; for none but the
pilgrim
,
who displayed ultra-zeal in the pursuit of
his object, ventured so far as to hazard even a
smothered remark as he passed.
There goes an arm and a sword that might
well shorten a Christian's days, said the dissolute
and shameless dealer in the church's abuses, and
yet no one asks his name or calling!
Thou hadst better put the question thyself,
returned the sneering Pippo, since penitence is
thy trade. For myself, I am content with
whirling
round at my own bidding, without taking a
hint from that young giant's arm.
The poor scholar and the burgher of Berne
appeared
to acquiesce in this opinion, and no more
C 2
was said in the matter. In the mean while there
was another at the gate. The new applicant had
little in his exterior to renew the vigilance of the
superstitious trio. A quiet, meek-looking man,
seemingly of a middle condition in life, and of an
air altogether calm and unpretending, had
submitted
his passport to the faithful guardian of the
city. The latter read the document, cast a quick
and inquiring glance at its owner, and returned
the paper in a way to show haste, and a desire to
be rid of him.
It is well, he said; thou canst go thy way.
How now! cried the Neapolitan, to whom
buffoonery was a congenial employment, as much
by natural disposition as by practice; How now!
have we Balthazar at last, in this bloody-minded
and fierce-looking traveller? As the speaker had
expected, this sally was rewarded by a general
laugh, and he was accordingly encouraged to
proceed
.
Thou knowest our office, friend, added
the unfeeling mountebank, and must show us thy
hands. None pass who bear the stain of blood!
The traveller appeared staggered, for he was
plainly a man of retired and peaceable habits, who
had been thrown, by the chances of the road, in
contact with one only too practised in this
unfeeling
species of wit. He showed his open palm,
however, with a direct and confiding simplicity,
that drew a shout of merriment from all the
bystanders
.
This will not do; soap, and ashes, and the tears
of victims, may have washed out the marks of
his work from Balthazar himself. The spots we
seek are on the soul, man, and we must look into
that, ere thou art permitted to make one in this
goodly company.
Thou didst not question yonder young soldier
thus, returned the stranger, whose eye kindled,
as even the meek repel unprovoked outrage, though
his frame trembled violently at being subject to
open insults from men so rude and unprincipled;
thou didst not dare to question yonder young
soldier
thus!
By the prayers of San Gennaro! which are
known to stop running and melted lava, I would
rather thou should'st undertake that office than I.
Yonder young soldier is an honorable decapitator,
and it is a pleasure to be his companion on a
journey
;
for, no doubt, some six or eight of the saints
are speaking in his behalf daily. But he we seek
is the outcast of all, good or bad, whether in
heaven
or on earth, or in that other hot abode to which
he will surely be sent when his time shall come.
And yet he does no more than execute the
law!
What is law to opinion, friend? But go thy
way; none suspect thee to be the redoubtable
enemy
of our heads. Go thy way, for Heaven's sake,
and mutter thy prayers to be delivered from
Balthazar's
axe.
The countenance of the stranger worked, as if
he would have answered; then suddenly changing
his purpose, he passed on, and instantly disappeared
in the bark. The monk of St. Bernard came next.
Both the Augustine and his dog were old
acquaintances
of the officer, who did not require any
evidence
of his character or errand from the former.
We are the protectors of life and not its foes,
observed the monk, as, leaving the more regular
watchman of the place, he drew near to those
whose claims to the office would have admitted of
dispute: we live among the snows, that Christians
may not die without the church's comfort.
Honor, holy Augustine, to thee and thy office!
said the Neapolitan, who, reckless and abandoned
as he was, possessed that instinct of respect for
those who deny their natures for the good of others,
which is common to all, however tainted by
cupidity
themselves. Thou and thy dog, old Uberto,
can freely pass, with our best good wishes for
both.
There no longer remained any to examine, and,
after a short consultation among the more
superstitious
of the travellers, they came to the very
natural opinion that, intimidated by their just
remonstrances
,
the offensive headsman had shrunk,
unperceived
,
from the crowd, and that they were at
length happily relieved from his presence. The
annunciation of the welcome tidings drew much
self-felicitation from the different members of the
motley company, and all eagerly embarked, for
Baptiste now loudly and vehemently declared that
a single moment of further delay was entirely out
of the question.
Of what are you thinking, men! he
exclaimed
with well-acted heat; are the Leman winds
liveried lackeys, to come and go as may suit your
fancies; now to blow west, and now east, as shall
be most wanted, to help you on your journeys?
Take example of the noble Melchior de Willading,
who has long been in his place, and pray the saints,
if you will, in your several fashions, that this fair
western wind do not quit us in punishment of our
neglect.
Yonder come others, in haste, to be of the
party! interrupted the cunning Italian; loosen
thy fasts quickly, Master Baptiste, or, by San
Gennaro
!
we shall still be detained!
The Patron suddenly checked himself, and
hurried
back to the gate, in order to ascertain what
he might expect from this unlooked-for turn of
fortune
.
Two travellers, in the attire of men familiar
with the road, accompanied by a menial, and
followed
by a porter staggering under the burthen of
their luggage, were fast approaching the
water-gate
,
as if conscious the least delay might cause
their being left. This party was led by one
considerably
past the meridian of life, and who
evidently
was enabled to maintain his post more by
the deference of his companions than by his
physcal
force. A cloak was thrown across one arm,
while in the hand of the other he carried the rapier,
which all of gentle blood then considered a
necessary
appendage of their rank.
You were near losing the last bark that sails
for the Abbaye des Vignerons, Signori, said the
Genevese, recognizing the country of the strangers
at a glance, if, as I judge from your direction
and haste, these festivities are in your minds.
Such is our aim, returned the elder of the
travellers, and, as thou sayest, we are, of a
certainty
,
tardy. A hasty departure and bad roads
have been the causebut as, happily, we are yet
in time to profit by this bark, wilt do us the favor
to look into our authority to pass?
The officer perused the offered document with
the customary care, turning it from side to side,
as if all were not right, though in a way to show
that he regretted the informality.
Signore, your pass is quite in rule as touches
Savoy and the country of Nice, but it wants the
city's forms.
By San Francesco! more's the pity. We are
honest gentlemen of Genoa, hurrying to witness
the revels at Vvey, of which rumor gives an
enticing report, and our sole desire is to come and
go peaceably. As thou seest, we are late; for
hearing at the post, on alighting, that a bark was
about to spread its sails for the other extremity of
the lake, we had no time to consult all the
observances
that thy city's rules may deem necessary.
So many turn their faces the same way, to witness
these ancient games, that we had not thought our
quick passage through the town of sufficient
importance
to give thy authorities the trouble to look
into our proofs.
Therein, Signore, you have judged amiss. It
is my sworn duty to stay all who want the
republic's
permission to proceed.
This is unfortunate, to say no more. Art thou
the patron of the bark, friend?
And her owner, Signore, answered Baptiste,
who listened to the discourse with longings equal
to his doubts. I should be a great deal too happy
to count such honorable travellers among my
passengers.
Thou wilt then delay thy departure until this
gentleman shall see the authorities of the town,
and obtain the required permission to quit it? Thy
compliance shall not go unrewarded.
As the Genoese concluded, he dropped into a
palm that was well practised in bribes a sequin of
the celebrated republic of which he was a citizen.
Baptiste had long cultivated an aptitude to suffer
himself to be influenced by gold, and it was with
unfeigned reluctance that he admitted the necessity
of refusing, in this instance, to profit by his own
good dispositions. Still retaining the money,
however
,
for he did not well know how to overcome
his reluctance to part with it, he answered in a
manner sufficiently embarrassed, to show the other
that he had at least gained a material advantage
by his liberality.
His Excellency knows not what he asks, said
the patron, fumbling the coin between a finger and
thumb; our Genevese citizens love to keep house
till the sun is up, lest they should break their necks
by walking about the uneven streets in the dark, and
it will be two long hours before a single bureau will
open its windows in the town. Besides, your man
of the police is not like us of the lake, happy to get
a morsel when the weather and occasion permit;
but he is a regular feeder, that must have his grapes
and his wine before he will use his wits for the
benefit of his employers. The Winkelried would
weary of doing nothing, with this fresh western
breeze humming between her masts, while the poor
gentleman was swearing before the town-house
gate at the laziness of the officers. I know the
rogues better than your Excellency, and would
advise
some other expedient.
Baptiste looked, with a certain expression, at the
guardian of the water-gate, and in a manner to
make his meaning sufficiently clear to the
travellers
.
The latter studied the countenance of the
Genevese a moment, and, better practised than the
patron, or a more enlightened judge of character,
he fortunately refused to commit himself by
offering
to purchase the officer's good-will. If there
are too many who love to be tempted to forget
their trusts, by a well-managed venality, there are a
few who find a greater satisfaction in being thought
beyond its influence. The watchman of the gate
happened to be one of the latter class, and, by one
of the many unaccountable workings of human
feeling
,
the very vanity which had induced him to
suffer
Il Maledetto to go through unquestioned, rather
than expose his own ignorance, now led him to
wish he might make some return for the stranger's
good opinion of his honesty.
Will you let me look again at the pass,
Signore
?
asked the Genevese, as if he thought a
sufficient
legal warranty for that which he now
strongly
desired to do might yet be found in the
instrument
itself.
The inquiry was useless, unless it was to show
that the elder Genoese was called the Signor
Grimaldi
and that his companion went by the name of
Marcelli. Shaking his head he returned the paper
in the manner of a disappointed man.
Thou canst not have read half of what the
paper
contains, said Baptiste peevishly; your
reading
and writing are not such easy matters, that a
squint of the eye is all-sufficient. Look at it again,
and thou mayest yet find all in rule. It is
unreasonable
to suppose Signori of their rank would
journey like vagabonds, with papers to be
suspected
.
Nothing is wanting but our city signatures,
without which my duty will let none go by, that
are truly travellers.
This comes, Signore, of the accursed art of
writing, which is much pushed and greatly abused
of late. I have heard the aged watermen of the
Leman praise the good old time, when boxes and
bales went and came, and no ink touched paper
between him that sent and him that carried; and
yet it has now reached the pass that a christian
may not transport himself on his own legs without
calling on the scriveners for permission!
We lose the moments in words, when it were
far better to be doing, returned the Signore
Grimaldi
.
The pass is luckily in the language of the
country, and needs but a glance to get the
approval
of the authorities. Thou wilt do well to say
thou canst remain the time necessary to see this
little done.
Were your excellency to offer me the Doge's
crown as a bribe, this could not be. Our Leman
winds will not wait for king or noble, bishop or
priest, and duty to those I have in the bark
commands
me to quit the port as soon as possible.
Thou art truly well charged with living freight
already, said the Genoese, regarding the deeply
loaded bark with a half-distrustful eye. I hope
thou hast not overdone thy vessel's powers in
receiving
so many?
I could gladly reduce the number a little,
excellent
Signore, for all that you see piled among
the boxes and tubs are no better than so many
knaves, fit only to give trouble and raise questions
touching the embarkation of those who are willing
to pay better than themselves. The noble Swiss,
whom you see seated near the stern, with his
daughter
and people, the worthy Melchior de Willading,
gives a more liberal reward for his passage to
Vvey than all those nameless rogues together.
The Genoese made a hasty movement towards
the patron, with an earnestness of eye and air that
betrayed a sudden and singular interest in what he
heard.
Did'st thou say de Willading? he exclaimed,
eager as one of much fewer years would have been
at the unexpected announcement of some
pleasurable
event. Melchior, too, of that honorable
name?
Signore, the same. None other bears the title
now, for the old line, they say, is drawing to an
end. I remember this same baron, when he was
as ready to launch his boat into a troubled lake, as
any in Switzerland
Fortune hath truly favored me, good Marcelli!
interrupted the other, grasping the hand of his
companion
,
with strong feeling. Go thou to the bark,
master patron, and advise thy passenger that
what shall we say to Melchior? Shall we tell
him at once, who waits him here, or shall we
practise
a little on his failing memory? By San
Francesco
!
we will do this, Enrico, that we may try
his powers! 'Twill be pleasant to see him
wonder
and guessmy life on it, however, that he
knows me at a glance. I am truly little changed,
for one that hath seen so much.
Vol. I. D
The Signor Marcelli lowered his eyes
respectfully
at this opinion of his friend, but he did not
see fit to discourage a belief which was merely a
sudden ebullition, produced by the recollection of
younger days. Baptiste was instantly dispatched
with a request that the baron would do a stranger
of rank the favor to come to the water-gate.
Tell him 'tis a traveller disappointed in the
wish to be of his company, repeated the
Genoese
.
That will suffice. I know him courteous,
and he is not my Melchior, honest Marcelli, if he
delay an instant:thou seest! he is already
quitting
the bark, for never did I know him refuse an
act of friendlinessdear, dear Melchiorthou
art the same at seventy as thou wast at thirty!
Here the agitation of the Genoese got the better
of him, and he walked aside, under a sense of
shame, lest he might betray unmanly weakness.
In the mean time, the Baron de Willading
advanced
from the water-side, without suspecting
that his presence was required for more than an
act of simple courtesy.
Baptiste tells me that gentlemen of Genoa are
here, who are desirous of hastening to the games
of Vvey, said the latter, raising his beaver,
and that my presence may be of use in
obtaining
the pleasure of their company.
I will not unmask till we are fairly and
decently
embarked, Enrico, whispered the Signor
Grimaldi; nayby the mass! not till we are
fairly disembarked! The laugh against him will
never be forgotten. Signore, addressing the
Bernese with affected composure, endeavoring to
assume the manner of a stranger, though his voice
trembled with eagerness at each syllable, we are
indeed of Genoa, and most anxious to be of the
party in your barkbuthe little suspects who
speaks to him, Marcelli!but, Signore, there has
been some small oversight touching the city
signatures
,
and we have need of friendly assistance,
either to pass the gate, or to detain the bark until
the forms of the place shall have been respected.
Signore, the city of Geneva hath need to be
watchful, for it is an exposed and weak state, and
I have little hope that my influence can cause this
trusty watchman to dispense with his duty.
Touching the bark, a small gratuity will do much
with honest Baptiste, should there not be a
question
of the stability of the breeze, in which case
he might be somewhat of a loser.
You say the truth, noble Melchior, put in the
patron; were the wind ahead, or were it two
hours earlier in the morning, the little delay should
not cost the strangers a batzthat is to say,
nothing unreasonable; but as it is, I have not
twenty minutes more to lose, even were all the
city magistrates cloaking to be of the party, in
their proper and worshipful persons.
I greatly regret, Signore, it should be so,
resumed the baron, turning to the applicant with
the consideration of one accustomed to season his
refusals by a gracious manner; but these
water-men
have their secret signs, by which, it would
seem, they know the latest moment they may with
prudence delay.
By the mass! Marcelli, I will try him a little
I should have known him in a carnival dress.
Signor Barone, we are but poor Italian gentlemen,
it is true, of Genoa. You have heard of our
republic
,
beyond questionthe poor state of Genoa?
Though of no great pretensions to letters,
Signore
,
answered Melchior, smiling, I am not
quite ignorant that such a state exists. You could
not have named a city on the shores of your
Mediterranean
that would sooner warm my heart than
this very town of which you speak. Many of
my happiest hours were passed within its walls,
and often, even at this late day, do I live over
again my life to recall the pleasures of that merry
period. Were there leisure, I could repeat a list
of honorable and much esteemed names that are
familiar to your ears, in proof of what I say.
Name them, Signor Barone;for the love of
the saints, and the blessed virgin, name them, I
beseech you!
A little amazed at the eagerness of the other,
Melchior de Willading earnestly regarded his
furrowed
face; and, for an instant, an expression
like incertitude crossed his own features.
Nothing would be easier, Signore, than to
name many. The first in my memory, as he has
always been the first in my love, is Gaetano
Grimaldi
,
of whom, I doubt not, both of you have
often heard?
We have, we have! That isyes, I think we
may say, Marcelli, that we have often heard of
him, and not unfavorably. Well, what of this
Grimaldi?
Signore, the desire to converse of your noble
townsman is natural, but were I to yield to my
wishes to speak of Gaetano, I fear the honest
Baptiste might have reason to complain.
To the devil with Baptiste and his bark!
Melchior
,my
good Melchior!dearest, dearest
Melchior
!
hast thou indeed forgotten me?
Here the Genoese opened wide his arms, and
stood ready to receive the embrace of his friend.
The Baron de Willading was troubled, but he was
still so far from suspecting the real fact, that he
could not have easily told the reason why. He gazed
wistfully at the working features of the fine old
man who stood before him, and though memory
seemed to flit around the truth, it was in gleams
so transient as completely to baffle his wishes.
Dost thou deny me, de Willading?dost thou
refuse to own the friend of thy youththe
companion
of thy pleasuresthe sharer of thy
sorrows
thy
comrade in the warsnay, morethy
confidant in a dearer tie?
None but Gaetano Grimaldi himself can claim
these titles! burst from the lips of the trembling
baron.
Am I aught else?am I not this Gaetano?
that Gaetanothy Gaetano,old and very dear
friend?
Thou Gaetano! exclaimed the Bernois,
recoiling
a step, instead of advancing to meet the
eager embrace of the Genoese, whose impetuous
feelings were little cooled by timethou, the
gallant, active, daring, blooming Grimaldi!
Signore
,
you trifle with an old man's affections.
By the holy mass, I do not deceive thee! Ha,
Marcelli, he is slow to believe as ever, but fast and
certain as the vow of a churchman when
convinced
.
If we are to distrust each other for a few
wrinkles, thou wilt find objections rising against
thine own identity as well as against mine, friend
Melchior. I am none other than Gaetanothe
Gaetano of thy youththe friend thou hast not
seen these many long and weary years.
Recognition was slow in making its way in the
mind of the Bernese. Lineament after lineament,
however, became successively known to him, and
most of all, the voice served to awaken long
dormant
recollections. But, as heavy natures are
said to have the least self-command when fairly
excited, so did the baron betray the most
ungovernable
emotion of the two, when conviction came
at last to confirm the words of his friend. He
throw himself on the neck of the Genoese, and the
old man wept in a manner that caused him to
D 2
withdraw aside, in order to conceal the tears
which had so suddenly and profusely broken from
fountains that he had long thought nearly dried.
CHAPTER III.
Ha, cousin Silence, that thou hadst seen
That, that this knight and I have seen!
King Henry IV
.
The
calculating patron of the Winkelried had
patiently watched the progress of the foregoing
scene with great inward satisfaction, but now that
the strangers seemed to be assured of support
powerful as that of Melchior de Willading, he was
disposed to turn it to account without farther
delay
.
The old men were still standing with their
hands grasping each other, after another warm
and still closer embrace, and with tears rolling
down the furrowed face of each, when Baptiste
advanced to put in his raven-like remonstrance.
Noble gentlemen, he said, if the felicitations
of one humble as I can add to the pleasure of
this happy meeting, I beg you to accept them; but
the wind has no heart for friendships nor any
thought for the gains or losses of us watermen. I
feel it my duty, as patron of the bark, to recall to
your honors that many poor travellers, far from
their homes and pining families, are waiting our
leisure, not to speak of foot-sore pilgrims and other
worthy adventurers, who are impatient in their
hearts, though respect for their superiors keeps
them tongue-tied, while we are losing the best of
the breeze.
By San Francesco! the varlet is right; said
the Genoese, hurriedly erasing the marks of his
recent weakness from his cheeks. We are
forgetful
of all these worthy people while joy at our
meeting is so strong, and it is time that we thought
of others. Canst thou aid me in dispensing with
the city's signatures?
The Baron de Willading paused; for
well-disposed
at first to assist any gentlemen who found
themselves in an unpleasant embarrassment, it will
be readily imagined that the case lost none of its
interest, when he found that his oldest and most
tried friend was the party in want of his influence.
Still it was much easier to admit the force of this
new and unexpected appeal than to devise the
means of success. The officer was, to use a phrase
which most men seem to think supplies a substitute
for reason and principle, too openly committed to
render it probable he would easily yield. It was
necessary, however, to make the trial, and the
baron, therefore, addressed the keeper of the
water-gate more urgently than he had yet done in
behalf of the strangers.
It is beyond my functions; there is not one of
our Syndics whom I would more gladly oblige
than yourself, noble baron, answered the officer;
but the duty of the watchman is to adhere
strictly
to the commands of those who have placed him
at his post.
Gaetano, we are not the men to complain of
this! We have stood together too long in the same
trench, and have too often slept soundly, in
situations
where failure in this doctrine might have cost
us our lives, to quarrel with the honest Genevese
for his watchfulness. To be frank, 'twere little
use to tamper with the fidelity of a Swiss or with
that of his ally.
With the Swiss that is well paid to be
vigilant
!
answered the Genoese, laughing in a way
to show that he had only revived one of those
standing but biting jests, that they who love each
other best are perhaps most accustomed to
practice
.
The Baron de Willading took the facetiousness
of his friend in good part, returning the mirth of
the other in a manner to show that the allusion
recalled days when their hours had idly passed in
the indulgence of spontaneous outbreakings of
animal spirits.
Were this thy Italy, Gaetano, a sequin would
not only supply the place of a dozen signatures,
but, by the name of thy favorite, San Francesco!
it would give the honest gate-keeper that gift of
second-sight on which the Scottish seers are said
to pride themselves.
Well, the two sides of the Alps will keep their
characters, even though we quarrel about their
virtuesbut we shall never see again the days
that we have known! Neither the games of V
evey
,
nor the use of old jokes, will make us the
youths we have been, dear de Willading!
Signore, a million of pardons, interrupted
Baptiste, but this western wind is more
inconstant
even than the spirits of the young.
The rogue is again right, and we forget
yonder
cargo of honest travellers, who are wishing
us both in Abraham's bosom, for keeping the
impatient
bark in idleness at the quay. Good
Marcelli
,
hast thou aught to suggest in this strait?
Signore, you forget that we have another
document that may be found sufficientthe
person
questioned, who appeared to fill a middle
station
between that of a servant and that of a
companion
,
rather hinted than observed:
Thou sayest trueand yet I would gladly
avoid producing itbut anything is better than
the loss of thy company, Melchior.
Name it not! We shall not separate, though
the Winkelried rot where she lies. 'Twere easier
to separate our faithful cantons than two such
friends.
Nay, noble baron, you forget the wearied
pilgrims
and the many anxious travellers in the
bark.
If twenty crowns will purchase thy consent,
honest Baptiste, we will have no further
discussion
.
It is scarce in human will to withstand you,
noble Sir!Well, the pilgrims have weary feet,
and rest will only fit them the better for the
passage
of the mountains; and as for the others, why
let them quit the bark if they dislike the conditions.
I am not a man to force my commerce on any.
Nay, nay, I will have none of this. Keep thy
gold, Melchior, and let the honest Baptiste keep
his passengers, to say nothing of his conscience.
I beseech your excellency, interrupted
Baptiste
,
not to distress yourself in tenderness for
me. I am ready to do far more disagreeable
things to oblige so noble a gentleman.
I will none of it! Signor officer, wilt thou do
me the favor to cast a glance at this?
As the Genoese concluded, he placed in the
hands of the watchman at the gate, a paper
different
from that which he had first shown. The
officer
perused the new instrument with deep
attention
,
and, when half through its contents, his eyes
left the page to become rivetted in respectful
attention
on the face of the expectant Italian. He
then read the passport to the end. Raising his cap
ceremoniously, the keeper of the gate left the
passage
free, bowing with deep deference to the
strangers.
Had I sooner known this, he said, there
would have been no delay. I hope your
excellency
will consider my ignorance?
Name it not, friend. Thou hast done well;
in proof of which I beg thy acceptance of a small
token of esteem.
The Genoese dropped a sequin into the hand of
the officer, passing him, at the same time, on his
way to the waterside. As the reluctance of the
other to receive gold came rather from a love of
duty than from any particular aversion to the
metal itself, this second offering met with a more
favorable reception than the first. The Baron de
Willading was not without surprise at the sudden
success of his friend, though he was far too
prudent
and well-bred to let his wonder be seen.
Every obstacle to the departure of the
Winkelried
was now removed, and Baptiste and his crew
were soon actively engaged in loosening the sails
and in casting off the fasts. The movement of
the bark was at first slow and heavy, for the wind
was intercepted by the buildings of the town; but,
as she receded from the shore, the canvass began
to flap and belly, and ere long it filled outward
with a report like that of a musket; after which
the motion of the travellers began to bear some
relation to their nearly exhausted patience.
Soon after the party which had been so long
detained at the water-gate were embarked,
Adelheid
first learned the reason of the delay. She
had long known, from the mouth of her father, the
name and early history of the Signor Grimaldi, a
Genoese of illustrious family, who had been the
sworn friend and the comrade of Melchior de
Willading, when the latter pursued his career in
arms in the wars of Italy. These circumstances
having
passed long before her own birth, and even
before
the marriage of her parents, and she being the
youngest and the only survivor of a numerous family
of children, they were, as respected herself, events
that already began to assume the hue of history.
She received the old man frankly and even with
affection, though in his yielding but still fine form,
she had quite as much difficulty as her father in
recognizing the young, gay, gallant, brilliant, and
handsome Gaetano Grimaldi that her imagination
had conceived from the verbal descriptions she
had so often heard, and from her fancy was still
wont to draw as he was painted in the affectionate
descriptions of her father. When he suddenly and
affectionately offered a kiss, the color flushed her
face, for no man but he to whom she owed her
being
had ever before taken that liberty; but, after
an instant of virgin embarrassment, she laughed,
and blushingly presented her cheek to receive the
salute.
The last tidings I had of thee, Melchior, said
the Italian, was the letter sent by the Swiss
Ambassador
,
who took our city in his way as he
traveled
south, and which was written on the occasion
of the birth of this very girl.
Not of this, dear friend, but of an elder sister,
who is, long since, a cherub in heaven. Thou
seest the ninth precious gift that God bestowed,
and thou seest all that is now left of his bounty.
The countenance of the Signor Grimaldi lost
its joyousness, and a deep pause in the discourse
succeeded. They lived in an age when
communications
between friends that were separated by
distance, and by the frontiers of different states,
were rare and uncertain. The fresh and novel
affections of marriage had first broken an
intercourse
that was continued, under such
disadvantages
as marked the period, long after their duties
called them different ways; and time, with its
changes and the embarrassments of wars, had
finally destroyed nearly every link in the chain of
their correspondence. Each had, therefore, much
of a near and interesting character to
communicate
to the other, and each dreaded to speak, lest
he might cause some wound, that was not
perfectly
healed, to bleed anew. The volume of matter
conveyed in the few words uttered by the Baron
de Willading, showed both in how many ways
they might inflict pain without intention, and how
necessary it was to be guarded in their discourse,
during the first days of their renewed intercourse.
This girl at least is a treasure of itself, of
which I must envy thee the possession, the
Signor
Grimaldi at length rejoined.
The Swiss made one of those quick movements
which betray surprise, and it was very apparent,
that, just at the moment, he was more affected by
some interest of his friend, than by the
apprehensions
which usually beset him when any very
direct
allusion was made to his surviving child.
Gaetano, thou hast a son!
He is losthopelesslyirretrievably lostat
least, to me!
These were brief but painful glimpses into each
other's concerns, and another melancholy and
embarrassed
pause followed. As the Baron de
Willading
witnessed the sorrow that deeply shadowed
the face of the Genoese, he almost felt that
Providence
,
in summoning his own boys to early graves,
might have spared him the still bitterer grief of
mourning over the unworthiness of a living son.
These are God's decrees, Melchior, the Italian
continued of his own accord, and we, as soldiers,
as men, and more than either, as Christians,
should know how to submit. The letter, of which
I spoke, contained the last direct tidings that I
received
of thy welfare, though different traveller
have mentioned thee as among the honored and
trusted of thy country, without descending to the
particulars of thy private life.
The retirement of our mountains, and the little
intercourse of strangers with the Swiss, have
denied
me even this meagre satisfaction as respects
thee and thy fortunes. Since the especial courier
sent, according to our ancient agreement, to
announce
The baron hesitated, for he felt he was again
touching on forbidden ground.
To announce the birth of my unhappy boy,
continued the Signor Grimaldi, firmly.
To announce that much-wished-for event, I
have not had news of thee, except in a way so
vague, as to whet the desire to know more rather
than to appease the longings of love.
These doubts are the penalties that friendship
pays to separation. We enlist the affections in
youth with the recklessness of hope, and, when
called different ways by duties or interest, we first
begin to perceive that the world is not the heaven
we thought it, but that each enjoyment has its
price, as each grief has its solace. Thou hast
carried
arms since we were soldiers in company?
As a Swiss only.
The answer drew a gleam of habitual humor
from the keen eye of the Italian, whose
countenance
was apt to change as rapidly as his thoughts.
In what service?
Nay, a truce to thy old pleasantries, good
Grimaldi
and
yet I should scarce love thee, as I do,
wert thou other than thou art! I believe we come
at last to prize even the foibles of those we truly
esteem!
It must be so, young lady, or boyish follies
would long since have weaned thy father from me.
I have never spared him on the subjects of snows
and money, and yet he beareth with me
marvellously
.
Well, strong love endureth much. Hath
the baron often spoken to thee of old Grimaldi
Vol. I. E
young Grimaldi, I should sayand of the many
freaks of our thoughtless days?
So much, Signore, returned Adelheid, who
had wept and smiled by turns during the
interrupted
dialogue of her father and his friend, that I
can repeat most of your youthful histories. The
castle of Willading is deep among the mountains,
and it is rare indeed for the foot of stranger to
enter
its gates. During the long evenings of our
severe
winters, I have listened as a daughter would
be apt to listen to the recital of most of your
common
adventures, and in listening, I have not only
learned to know, but to esteem, one that is justly
so dear to my parent.
I make no doubt, now, thou hast the history of
the plunge into the canal, by over-stooping to see
the Venetian beauty, at thy finger's ends?
I do remember some such act of humid
gallantry
,
returned Adelheid, laughing.
Did thy father tell thee, child, of the manner in
which he bore me off in a noble rescue from a
deadly charge of the Imperial cavalry?
I have heard some light allusion to such an
event, too, returned Adelheid, evidently trying
to recall the history of the affair, to her mind,
but
Light does he call it, and of small account? I
wish never to see another as heavy! This is the
impartiality of thy narratives, good Melchior, in
which a life preserved, wounds received, and a
charge to make the German quail, are set down as
matters to be touched with a light hand!
If I did thee this service, it was more than
deserved
by the manner in which, before Milan
Well, let it all pass together. We are old fools,
young lady, and should we get garrulous in each
other's praise, thou mightest mistake us for
braggarts
;
a character that, in truth, neither wholly
merits. Didst thou ever tell the girl, Melchior, of
our mad excursion into the forests of the Apennines,
in search of a Spanish lady that had fallen into the
hands of banditti; and how we passed weeks on a
foolish enterprise of errantry, that had become
useless
,
by the timely application of a few sequins on
the part of the husband, even before we started
on the chivalrous, not to say silly, excursion?
Say chivalrous, but not silly, answered
Adelheid
,
with the simplicity of a young and sincere
mind. Of this adventure I have heard; but to
me it has never seemed ridiculous. A generous
motive might well excuse an undertaking of less
favorable auspices.
'Tis fortunate, returned the Signor Grimaldi,
thoughtfully, that, if youth and exaggerated
opinions
lead us to commit mad pranks under the name
of spirit and generosity, there are other youthful
and generons minds to reflect our sentiments and
to smile upon our folly.
This is more like the wary grey-headed
expounder
of wisdom than like the hot-headed
Gaetano
Grimaldi of old! exclaimed the baron, though
he laughed while uttering the words, as if he felt,
at least a portion of the other's indifference to
those exaggerated feelings that had entered much
into the characters of both in youth. The
time has been when the words, policy and
calculation
,
would have cost a companion thy favor!
'Tis said that the prodigal of twenty makes
the miser of seventy. It is certain that even our
southern sun does not warm the blood of threescore,
as suddenly as it heats that of one. But we will
not darken thy daughter's views of the future by a
picture too faithfully drawn, lest she become wise
before her time. I have often questioned,
Melchior
,
which is the most precious gift of nature, a
warm fancy, or the colder powers of reason. But
if I must say which I most love, the point
becomes
less difficult of decision. I would prefer each
in its season, or rather the two united, with a
gradual change in their influence. Let the youth
commence with the first in the ascendant, and close
with the last. He who begins life too cold a
reasoner
may end it a calculating egotist; and he
who is ruled solely by his imagination is in danger
of having his mind so ripened as to bring forth the
fruits of a visionary. Had it pleased heaven to
have left me the dear son I possessed for so short
a period, I would rather have seen him leaning to
the side of exaggeration in his estimate of men,
before experience came to chill his hopes, than to
see him scan his fellows with a too philosophical
eye in boyhood. 'Tis said we are but clay at the
best, but the ground, before it has been well tilled,
sends forth the plants that are most congenial to
its soil, and though it be of no great value, give
me the spontaneous and generous growth of the
weed, which proves the depth of the loam, rather
than a stinted imitation of that which cultivation
may, no doubt, render more useful if not more
grateful.
The allusion to his lost son caused another cloud
to pass athwart the brow of the Genoese.
Thou seest, Adelheid, he continued, after a
pausefor Adelheid will I call thee, in virtue of
a second father's rightsthat we are making our
folly respectable, at least to ourselvesMaster
Patron, thou hast a well-charged bark!
Thanks to your two honors; answered
Baptiste
,
who stood at the helm, near the group of
principal passengers. These windfalls come
rarely to the poor, and we must make much of such
as offer. The games at Vvey have called every
craft on the Leman to the upper end of the lake,
and a little mother-wit led me to trust to the last
turn of the wheel, which, as you see, Signore, has
not come up a blank.
Have many strangers passed by your city on
their way to these sports?
Many hundreds, noble gentleman; and report
speaks of thousands that are collecting at Vvey,
and in the neighboring villages. The country of
Vaud has not had a richer harvest from her games
this many a year.
It is fortunate, Melchior, that the desire to
witness
these revels should have arisen in us at the
same moment. The hope of at last obtaining
certain
tidings of thy welfare was the chief
inducement
that caused me to steal from Genoa, whither
I am compelled to return forthwith. There is
truly something providential in this meeting!
I so esteem it, returned the Baron de
Willading
;
though the hope of soon embracing thee
was strongly alive in me. Thou art mistaken in
fancying that curiosity, or a wish to mingle with
the multitude at Vvey, has drawn me from my
castle. Italy was in my eye, as it has long been
in my heart.
How!Italy?
Nothing less. This fragile plant of the
mountains
has drooped of late in her native air, and
skilful advisers have counselled the sunny side of
the Alps as a shelter to revive her animation. I
have promised Roger de Blonay to pass a night or
two within his ancient walls, and then we are
destined
to seek the hospitality of the monks of St.
Bernard. Like thee, I had hoped this unusual sortie
from my hold might lead to intelligence touching
the fortunes of one I have never ceased to love.
The Signor Grimaldi turned a more scrutinizing
look towards the face of their female companion.
Her gentle and winning beauty gave him pleasure;
but, with his attention quickened by what had just
E 2
fallen from her father, he traced, in silent pain, the
signs of that early fading which threatened to
include
this last hope of his friend in the common
fate of the family. Disease had not, however, set
its seal on the sweet face of Adelheid, in a manner
to attract the notice of a common observer. The
lessening of the bloom, the mournful character of
a dove-like eye, and a look of thoughtfulness, on a
brow that he had ever known devoid of care and
open as day with youthful ingenuousness, were the
symptoms that first gave the alarm to her father,
whose previous losses, and whose solitariness, as
respects the ties of the world, had rendered him
keenly alive to impressions of such a nature. The
reflections excited by this examination brought
painful recollections to all, and it was long before
the discourse was renewed.
In the mean time, the Winkelried was not idle.
As the vessel receded from the cover of the
buildings
and the hills, the force of the breeze was felt,
and her speed became quickened in proportion;
though the watermen of her crew often studied the
manner in which she dragged her way through the
element with a shake of the head, that was
intended
to express their consciousness that too much
had been required of the craft. The cupidity of
Baptiste had indeed charged his good bark to the
uttermost. The water was nearly on a line with
the low stern, and when the bark had reached a
part of the lake where the waves were rolling with
some force, it was found that the vast weight was
too much to be lifted by the feeble and broken efforts
of these miniature seas. The consequences were,
however, more vexatious than alarming. A few
wet feet among the less quiet of the passengers,
with an occasional slapping of a sheet of water
against the gangways, and a consequent drift of
spray across the pile of human heads in the centre
of the bark, were all the immediate personal
inconveniencies
.
Still unjustifiable greediness of gain,
had tempted the patron to commit the
unseamanlike
fault of overloading his vessel. The decrease
of speed was another and a graver consequence
of his cupidity, since it might prevent their arrival
in port before the breeze had expended itself.
The lake of Geneva lies nearly in the form of a
crescent, stretching from the south-west towards
the north-east. Its northern, or the Swiss shore,
is chiefly what is called, in the language of the
country, a
cte
, or a declivity that admits of
cultivation
;
and, with few exceptions, it has been,
since the earliest periods of history, planted with
the generous vine. Here the Romans had many
stations and posts, vestiges of which are still
visible
.
The confusion and the mixture of interests
that succeeded the fall of the empire, gave rise,
in the middle ages, to various baronial castles,
ecclesiastical
towns, and towers of defence, which
still stand on the margin of this beautiful sheet of
water, or ornament the eminences a little inland.
At the time of which we write, the whole coast
of the Leman, if so imposing a word may be
applied
to the shores of so small a body of water,
was in the possession of the three several states
of Geneva, Savoy, and Berne. The first
consisted
of a mere fragment of territory at the
western
,
or lower horn of the crescent; the second
occupied nearly the whole of the southern side of
the sheet, or the cavity of the half-moon; while
the latter was mistress of the whole of the convex
border, and of the eastern horn. The shores of
Savoy are composed, with immaterial exceptions,
of advanced spurs of the high Alps, among which
towers Mont Blanc, like a sovereign seated in
majesty in the midst of a brilliant court, the rocks
frequently rising from the water's edge in
perpendicular
masses. None of the lakes of this
remarkable
region possess a greater variety of
scenery than that of Geneva, which changes from
the smiling aspect of fertility and cultivation, at
its lower extremity, to the sublimity of a savage
and sublime nature at its upper. Vvey, the haven
for which the Winkelried was bound, lies at the
distance of three leagues from the head of the
lake, or the point where it receives the Rhone;
and Geneva, the port from which the reader has
just seen her take her departure, is divided by that
river as it glances out of the blue basin of the
Leman
again, to traverse the fertile fields of France,
on its hurried course towards the distant
Mediterranean
.
It is well known that the currents of air, on all
bodies of water that lie amid high and broken
mountains, are uncertain both as to their direction
and their force. This was the difficulty which
had most disturbed Baptiste during the delay of
the bark, for the experienced waterman well knew
it required the first and the freest effort of the wind
to drive the breeze home, as it is called by
seamen
,
against the opposing currents that frequently
descend from the mountains which surrounded his
port. In addition to this difficulty, the shape of
the lake was another reason why the winds rarely
blow in the same direction over the whole of its
surface at the same time. Strong and continued
gales commonly force themselves down into the
deep basin, and push their way, against all
resistance
,
into every crevice of the rocks; but a power
less than this, rarely succeeds in favoring the bark
with the same breeze, from the entrance to the
outlet of the Rhone.
As a consequence of these peculiarities, the
passengers
of the Winkelried had early evidence that
they had trifled too long with the fickle air. The
breeze carried them up abreast of Lausanne in
good season, but here the influence of the
mountains
began to impair its force, and, by the time
the sun had a little fallen towards the long, dark,
even line of the Jura, the good vessel was driven
to the usual expedients of jibing and hauling-in of
sheets.
Baptiste had only to blame his own cupidity for
this disappointment; and the consciousness that,
had he complied with the engagement, made on
the previous evening with the mass of his
passengers
,
to depart with the dawn, he should now have
been in a situation to profit by any turn of fortune
that was likely to arise from the multitude of
strangers
who were in Vvey, rendered him moody.
As is usual with the headstrong and selfish when
they possess the power, others were made to pay
for the fault that he alone had committed. His
men were vexed with contradictory and useless
orders; the inferior passengers were accused of
constant neglect of his instructions, a fault which
he did not hesitate to affirm had caused the bark
to sail less swiftly than usual, and he no longer
even answered the occasional questions of those
for whom he felt habitual deference, with his
former
respect and readiness.
CHAPTER IV.
Thrice to thine, and thrice to mine,
And thrice again, to make up nine.
Macbeth
.
Baffling
and light airs kept the Winkelried a
long time nearly stationary, and it was only by
paying the greatest attention to trimming the sails,
and to all the little minuti of the waterman's art,
that the vessel was worked into the eastern horn
of the crescent, as the sun touched the hazy line
of the Jura. Here the wind failed entirely, the
surface of the lake becoming as glassy and smooth
as a mirror, and further motion, for the time at
least, was quite out of the question. The crew,
perceiving the hopelessness of their exertions, and
fatigued with the previous toil, threw themselves
among the boxes and bales, and endeavored to
catch a little sleep, in anticipation of the north
breeze, which, at this season of the year, usually
blew from the shores of Vaud within an hour or
two of the disappearance of the sun.
The deck of the bark was now left to the
undisputed
possession of her passengers. The day
had latterly been sultry, for the season, the even
water having cast back the hot rays in fierce
reflection
,
and, as evening drew on, a refreshing
coolness came to relieve the densely packed and
scorching travellers. The effect of such a change
was like that which would have been observed
among a flock of heavily fleeced sheep, which,
after gasping for breath beneath trees and hedges,
during the time of the sun's power, are seen
scattering
over their pastures to feed, or to play their
antics, as a grateful shade succeeds to cool their
panting sides.
Baptiste, as is but too apt to be the case with
men possessed of brief authority, during the day
had mercilessly played the tyrant with all the
passengers
that were beneath the privileged degrees,
more than once threatening to come to
extremities
with several, who had betrayed restlessness
under the restraint and suffering of their
unaccustomed
situation. Perhaps there is no man who
feels less for the complaints of the novice than
your weather-beaten and hardened mariner; for,
familiarized to the suffering and confinement of a
vessel, and at liberty himself to seek relief in his
duties and avocations, he can scarcely enter into
the privations and embarrassments of those to
whom all is so new and painful. But, in the
patron
of the Winkelried, there existed a natural
indifference
to the grievances of others, and a
narrow
selfishness of disposition, in aid of the opinions
which had been formed by a life of hardship and
exposure. He considered the vulgar passenger
as so much troublesome freight, which, while it
brought the advantage of a higher remuneration
than the same cubic measurement of inanimate
matter, had the unpleasant drawback of volition
and motion. With this general tendency to bully
and intimidate, the wary patron had, however,
made a silent exception in favor of the Italian,
who has introduced himself to the reader by the
ill-omened name of Il Maledetto, or the accursed.
This formidable personage had enjoyed a perfect
immunity from the effects of Baptiste's tyranny,
which he had been able to establish by a very
simple and quiet process. Instead of cowering at
the fierce glance, or recoiling at the rude
remonstrances
of the churlish patron, he had chosen his
time, when the latter was in one of his hottest
ebullitions of anger, and when maledictions and
menaces flowed out of his mouth in torrents, coolly
to place himself on the very spot that the other
had proscribed, where he maintained his ground
with a quietness and composure which it might
have been difficult to say was more to be imputed
to extreme ignorance, or to immeasurable
contempt
.
At least so reasoned the spectators; some
thinking that the stranger meant to bring affairs to
a speedy issue by braving the patron's fury, and
others charitably inferring that he knew no better.
But thus did not Baptiste reason himself. He saw
by the calm eye and resolute demeanor of his
passenger
that he himself, his pretended professional
difficulties, his captiousness, and his threats, were
alike despised; and he shrank from collision with
such a spirit, precisely on the principle that the
intimidated
among the rest of the travellers shrunk
from a contest with his own. From this moment
Il Maledetto, or, as he was called by Baptiste
himself
,
who it would appear had some knowledge of
his person, Maso, became as completely the
master
of his own movements, as if he had been one
of the more honored in the stern of the bark, or
even her patron. He did not abuse his advantage,
however, rarely quitting the indicated station near
his own effects, where he had been mainly content
to repose in listless indolence, like the others, dozing
away the minutes.
But the scene was now altogether changed.
The instant the wrangling, discontented, and
unhappy
,
because disappointed, patron, confessed his
inability to reach his port before the coming of
the expected night-breeze, and threw himself on
a bale, to conceal his dissatisfaction in sleep, head
arose after head from among the pile of freight,
and body after body followed the nobler member,
until the whole mass was alive with human beings.
The invigorating coolness, the tranquil hour, the
prospect of a safe if not a speedy arrival, and the
relief from excessive weariness, produced a
sudden
and agreeable re-action in the feelings of all.
Even the Baron de Willading and his friends, who
had shared in none of the especial privations just
named, joined in the general exhibition of
satisfaction
and good-will, rather aiding by their smiles
and affability, than restraining by their presence
the whims and jokes of the different individuals
among the motley group of their nameless
companions
.
The aspect and position of the bark, as well as
the prospects of those on board as they were
connected
with their arrival, now deserve to be more
particularly mentioned. The manner in which
the vessel was loaded to the water's edge has
already been more than once alluded to. The
whole of the centre of the broad deck, a portion
of the Winkelried which, owing to the
over-hanging
gangways, possessed, in common with all the
similar craft of the Leman, a greater width than
is usual in vessels of the same tonnage elsewhere,
was so cumbered with freight as barely to leave a
passage to the crew, forward and aft, by stepping
among the boxes and bales that were piled much
higher than their own heads. A little vacant
space was left near the stern, in which it was
possible
for the party who occupied that part of the
deck to move, though in sufficiently straitened
limits, while the huge tiller played in its
semicircle
behind. At the other extremity, as is
absolutely
necessary in all navigation, the forecastle
was reasonably clear, though even this important
part of the deck was bristling with the flukes of
no less than nine anchors that lay in a row across
its breadth, the wild roadsteads of this end of
the lake rendering such a provision of
ground-tackle
absolutely indispensable to the safety of
every craft that ventured into its eastern horn.
The effect of the whole, seen as it was in a state
of absolute rest, was to give to the Winkelried the
appearance of a small mound in the midst of the
water, that was crowded with human beings, and
seemingly so incorporated with the element on
which it floated as to grow out of its bosom; an
image that the fancy was not slow to form, aided
as it was by the reflection of the mass that the
unruffled lake threw back from its mirror-like face,
as perfectly formed, as unwieldy, and nearly as
distinct, as the original. To this picture of a
motionless
Vol. I. F
rock, or island, the spars, sails, and high,
pointed beak, however, formed especial
exceptions
.
The yards hung, as seamen term it, a
cockbill, or in such negligent and picturesque
positions
as an artist would most love to draw, while
the drapery of the canvass was suspended in
graceful
and spotless festoons, as it had fallen by chance, or
been cast carelessly from the hands of the boatmen.
The beak, or prow, rose in its sharp gallant stem,
resembling the stately neck of a swan, slightly
swerving from its direction, or inclining in a
nearly imperceptible sweep, as the hull yielded to
the secret influence of the varying currents.
When the teeming pile of freight, therefore,
began so freely to bring forth, and traveller after
traveller left his wallet, there was no great space
found in which they could stretch their wearied
limbs, or seek the change they needed. But
suffering
is a good preparative for pleasure, and
there is no sweetner of liberty like previous
confinement
.
Baptiste was no sooner heard to snore,
than the whole hummock of cargo was garnished
with upright bodies and stretching arms and legs,
as mice are known to steal from their holes during
the slumbers of their mortal enemy, the cat.
The reader has been made sufficiently
acquainted
with the moral composition of the Winkelried's
living freight, in the opening chapter. As it had
undergone no other alteration than that produced
by lassitude, he is already prepared, therefore, to
renew his communications with its different
members
,
all of whom were well disposed to show off
in their respective characters, the moment they
were favored with an opportunity. The
mercurial
Pippo, as he had been the most difficult to
restrain during the day, was the first to steal from
his lair, now that the Argus-like eyes of Baptiste
permitted the freedom, and the exhilarating
coolness
of the sunset invited action. His success
emboldened others, and, ere long, the buffoon had
an admiring audience around him, that was
well-disposed
to laugh at his witticisms, and to applaud
all his practical jokes. Gaining courage as he
proceeded
,
the buffoon gradually went from liberty to
liberty, until he was at length triumphantly
established
on what might be termed an advanced spur
of the mountain formed by the tubs of Nicklaus
Wagner, in the regular exercise of his art; while
a crowd of amused and gaping spectators
clustered
about him, peopling every eminence of the
height, and even invading the more privileged
deck in their eagerness to see and to admire.
Though frequently reduced by adverse fortune
to the lowest shifts of his calling, such as the
horse-play of Policinello, and the imitation of
uncouth
sounds, that resembled nothing either in
heaven
or earth, Pippo was a clever knave in his way,
and was quite equal to a display of the higher
branches
of his art, whenever chance gave him an audience
capable of estimating his qualities. On the
present
occasion he was obliged to address himself
both to the polished and to the unpolished; for the
proximity of their position, as well as a
good-natured
readiness to lend themselves to fooleries
that were so agreeable to most around them, had
brought the more gentle portion of the passengers
within the influence of his wit.
And now, illustrissimi signori, continued the
wily juggler, after having drawn a burst of
applause
by one of his happiest hits in a
sleight-of-hand
exhibition, I come to the most imposing
and the most mysterious part of my knowledge
that of looking into the future, and of foretelling
events. If there are any among you who would
wish to know how long they are to eat the bread
of toil, let them come to me; if there is a youth
that wishes to learn whether the heart of his
mistress
is made of flesh or of stonea maiden that
would see into a youth's faith and constancy,
while her long eyelashes cover her sight like a
modest silken veilor a noble, that would fain
have an insight into the movements of his rivals at
court or council, let them all put their questions to
Pippo, who has an answer ready for each, and an
answer so real, that the most expert among the
listeners will be ready to swear that a lie from his
mouth is worth more than truth from that of
another
man.
He that would gain credit for knowledge of
the future, gravely observed the Signor Grimaldi,
who had listened to his countryman's voluble
eulogium on his own merits with a good-natured
laugh, had best commence by showing his
familiarity
with the past. Who and what is he that
speaks to thee, as a specimen of thy skill in
sooth-saying
?
His eccellenza is more than he seems, less than
he deserves to be, and as much as any present.
He hath an old and a prized friend at his elbow;
hath come because it was his pleasure, to witness
the games at Vveywill depart for the same
reason, when they are over, and will seek his home
at his leisurenot like a fox stealing into his hole,
but as the stately ship sails, gallantly, and by the
light of the sun, into her haven.
This will never do, Pippo, returned the
good-humoured
old noble; at need I might equal this
myself. Thou shouldst relate that which is less
probable, while it is more true.
Signore, we prophets like to sleep in whole
skins. If it be your eccellenza's pleasure and that
of your noble company to listen to the truly
wonderful
,
I will tell some of these honest people
matters
touching their own interests that they do not
know themselves, and yet it shall be as clear to
every body else as the sun in the heavens at
noonday
.
Thou wilt, probably, tell them their faults?
Your eccellenza has a right to my place, for
no prophet could have better divined my
intention
;
answered the laughing knave. Come
nearer, friend, he added, beckoning to the
Bernois
;
thou art Nicklaus Wagner, a fat peasant
of the great canton, and a warm husbandman,
that fancies he has a title to the respect of all he
meets because some one among his fathers bought
a right in the brgerschaft. Thou hast a large
stake in the Winkelried, and art at this moment
thinking what punishment is good enough for
an impudent soothsayer who dares dive so
unceremoniously
into the secrets of so warm a
citizen, while all around thee wish thy cheeses had
never left the dairy, to the discomfort of our limbs
and to the great detriment of the bark's speed.
This sally at the expense of Nicklaus drew a
burst of merriment from the listeners; for the
selfish
spirit he had manifested throughout the day
had won little favor with a majority of his
fellow
travellers, who had all the generous
propensities
that are usually so abundant among those who
have little or nothing to bestow, and who were by
this time so well disposed to be merry that much
less would have served to stimulate their mirth.
Wert thou the owner of this good freight,
friend, thou might find its presence less
uncomfortable
than thou now appearest to think,
returned
the literal peasant, who had no humour for
raillery, and to whom a jest on the subject of
property had that sort of irreverend character that
popular opinion and holy sayings have attached to
waste. The cheeses are well enough where they
F 2
find themselves; if thou dislikest their company
thou hast the alternative of the water.
A truce between us, worshipful burgher! and
let our skirmish end in something that may be
useful
to both. Thou hast that which would be
acceptable
to me, and I have that which no owner of
cheeses would refuse, did he know the means by
which it might be come at honestly.
Nicklaus growled a few words of distrust and
indifference, but it was plain that the ambiguous
language of the juggler, as usual, had succeeded in
awakening interest. With the affectation of a
mind secretly conscious of its own infirmity, he
pretended to be indifferent to what the other
professed
a readiness to reveal, while with the
rapacity
of a grasping spirit he betrayed a longing to
know more.
First I will tell thee, said Pippo, with a
parade
of good-nature, that thou deservest to remain
in ignorance, as a punishment of thy pride and
want of faith; but it is the failing of your prophet
to let that be known which he ought to conceal.
Thou flatterest thyself this is the fattest cargo of
cheeses that will cross the Swiss waters this
season
,
on their way to an Italian market? Shake
not thy head.'Tis useless to deny it to a man of
my learning!
Nay, I know there are others as heavy, and, it
may be, as good; but this has the advantage of
being
the first, a circumstance that is certain to
command
a price.
Such is the blindness of one that nature sent
on earth to deal in cheeses!The Herr Von
Willading
and his friends smiled among themselves at
the cool impudence of the mountebankThou
fanciest it is so; and at this moment, a heavily
laden
bark is driving before a favorable gale, near
the upper end of the lake of the four cantons, while
a long line of mules is waiting at Flellen, to bear
its freight by the paths of the St. Gothard, to
Milano
and other rich markets of the south. In
virtue
of my secret power, I see that, in despite of all
thy cravings, it will arrive before thine.
Nicklaus fidgeted, for the graphic particularity
of Pippo almost led him to believe the augury
might be true.
Had this bark sailed according to our
covenant
,
he said, with a simplicity that betrayed his
uneasiness, the beasts bespoken by me would now
be loading at Villeneuve; and, if there be justice
in Vaud, I shall hold Baptiste responsible for any
disadvantage that may come of the neglect.
Luckily, the generous Baptiste is asleep,
returned
Pippo, or we might hear objections to this
scheme. But, Signiori, I see you are satisfied with
this insight into the character of the warm peasant
of Berne, who, to say truth, has not much to
conceal
from us, and I will turn my searching looks
into the soul of this pious pilgrim, the reverend
Conrado
,
whose unction may well go near to be a
leaven sufficient to lighten all in the bark of their
burthens of backslidings. Thou carriest the
penitence
and prayers of many sinners, besides some
merchandise of this nature of thine own.
I am bound to Loretto, with the mental
offerings
of certain Christians, who are too much
occupied
with their daily concerns to make the journey
in person, answered the pilgrim, who never
absolutely
threw aside his professional character, though
he cared in general so little about his hypocrisy
being known. I am poor, and humble of appear
ance, but I have seen miracles in my day!
If any trust valuable offerings to thy keeping,
thou art a living miracle in thine own person! I
can foresee that thou wilt bear nought else beside
aves.
Nay, I pretend to deal in little more. The rich
and great, they that send vessels of gold and rich
dresses to Our Lady, employ their own favorite
messengers; I am but the bearer of prayer and the
substitute for the penitent. The sufferings that I
undergo in the flesh are passed to the credit of my
employers, who get the benefit of my aches and
pains. I pretend to be no more than their
go-between
,
as yonder mariner has so lately called me.
Pippo turned suddenly, following the direction
of the other's eye, and cast a glance at the
self-styled
Il Maledetto. This individual, of all the
common herd, had alone forborne to join the
gaping
and amused crowd near the juggler. His
forbearance
,
or want of curiosity, had left him in the
quiet possession of the little platform that was made
by the stowage of the boxes, and he now stood on
the summit of the pile, conspicuous by his situation
and mein, the latter being remarkable for its
unmoved
calmness, heightened by the understanding
manner that is so peculiar to a seaman when
afloat.
Wilt thou have the history of thy coming
perils
,
friend mariner? cried the mercurial
mountebank
:
A journal of thy future risks and tempests
to amuse you in this calm? Such a picture of
sea-monsters
and of coral that grows in the ocean's
caverns, where mariners sleep, that shall give thee
the night-mare for months, and cause thee to dream
of wrecks and bleached bones for the rest of thy
life? Thou hast only to wish it, to have the
adventures
of thy next voyage laid before thee, like a
map.
Thou would'st gain more credit with me, as
one cunning in thy art, by giving the history of the
last.
The request is reasonable, and thou shalt have
it; for I love the bold adventurer that trusts
himself
hardily upon the great deep; answered the
unabashed Pippo. My first lessons in
necromancy
were received on the mole of Napoli, amid
burly
Inglesi, straight-nosed Greeks, swarthy Sicilians,
and Maltese with spirits as fine as the gold of their
own chains. This was the school in which I
learned to know my art, and an apt scholar I
proved
in all that touches the philosophy and
humanity
of my craft. Signore, thy palm?
Maso spread his sinewy hand in the direction of
the juggler, without descending from his elevation,
and in a way to show that, while he would not
balk the common humor, he was superior to the
gaping wonder and childish credulity of most of
those who watched the result. Pippo affected to
stretch out his neck, in order to study the hard and
dark lines, and then he resumed his revelations,
like one perfectly satisfied with what he had
discovered
.
The hand is masculine, and has been familiar
with many friends in its time. It hath dealt with
steel, and cordage, and saltpetre, and most of all
with gold. Signori, the true seat of a man's
digestion
lies in the palm of his hand; if that is
free to give and to receive, he will never have a
costive conscience, for of all damnable
inconveniences
that afflict mortals, that of a conscience
that will neither give up nor take is the heaviest
curse. Let a man have as much sagacity as shall
make him a cardinal, if it get entangled in the
meshes of one of your unyielding consciences, ye
shall see him a mendicant brother to his dying
day; let him be born a prince with a close-ribbed
opinion of this sort, and he had better have been
born a beggar, for his reign will be like a river
from which the current sets outward, without any
return. No, my friends, a palm like this of Maso's
is a favorable sign, since it hinges on a pliant will.
that will open and shut like a well-formed eye, or
the jacket of a shell-fish, at its owner's pleasure.
Thou hast drawn near to many a port before this
of Vvey, after the sun has fallen low, Signor
Maso!
In that I have taken a seaman's chances
which depend more on the winds than on his own
wishes.
Thou esteemest the bottom of the craft in
which thou art required to sail, as far more
important
than her ancient. Thou hast an eye for
a keel, but none for color; unless, indeed, as it
may happen to be convenient to seem that thou
art not.
Nay, Master Soothsayer, I suspect thee to be
an officer of some of the Holy Brotherhoods, sent
in this guise to question us poor travellers to our
ruin! answered Maso. I am, what thou seest,
but a poor mariner that hath no better bark under
him than this of Baptiste, and on a sea no larger
than a Swiss lake.
Shrewdly observed, said Pippo, winking to
those near him, though he so little liked the eye
and bearing of the other that he was not sorry to
turn to some new subject. But what matters it,
Signori, to be speaking of the qualities of men!
We are all alike, honorable, merciful, more
disposed
to help others than to help ourselves, and so
little given to selfishness, that nature has been
obliged to supply every mother's son of us with a
sort of goad, that shall be constantly pricking us
on to look after our own interests. Here are
animals
whose dispositions are less understood, and
we will bestow a useful minute in examining their
qualities. Reverend Augustine, this mastiff of
thine is named Uberto?
He is known by that appellation throughout
the cantons and their allies. The fame of the dog
reaches even to Turin and to most of the towns in
the plain of Lombardy.
Now, Signori, you perceive that this is but a
secondary creature in the scale of animals. Do
him good and he will be grateful; do him harm,
and he will forgive. Feed him, and he is satisfied.
He will travel the paths of the St. Bernard, night
and day, to do credit to his training, and when
the toil is ended, all he asks is just as much meat
as will keep the breath within his ribs. Had
heaven given Uberto a conscience and greater
wit, the first might have shown him the impiety
of working for travellers on holy days and festas,
while the latter would be apt to say he was a fool
for troubling himself about the safety of others at
all.
And yet his masters, the good Augustines
themselves
,
do not hold so selfish a creed! observed
Adelheid.
Ah! they have heaven in view! I cry the
reverend Augustine's pardonbut, lady, the
difference
is in the length of the calculation. Woe's
me, brethren; I would that my parents had
educated
me for a bishop, or a viceroy, or some other
modest employment, that this learned craft of
mine might have fallen into better hands! Ye
would lose in instruction, but I should be removed
from the giddy heights of ambition, and die at last
with some hopes of being a saint. Fair lady, thou
travellest on a bootless errand, if I know the
reason
that tempts thee to cross the Alps at this late
season of the year.
This sudden address caused both Adelheid and
her father to start, for, in despite of pride and the
force of reason, it is seldom that we can
completely
redeem our opinions from the shackles of
superstition
,
and that dread of the unseen future which
appears to have been entailed upon our nature, as
a ceaseless monitor of the eternal state of being to
which all are hastening, with steps so noiseless and
yet so sure. The countenance of the maiden
changed, and she turned a quick, involuntary glance
at her anxious parent, as if to note the effect of
this rude announcement on him before she answer
ed.
I go in quest of the blessing, health, she said,
and I should be sorry to think thy prognostic
likely to be realized. With youth, a good
constitution
,
and tender friends of my side, there is
reason
to think thou mayest, in this at least, prove a
false prophet.
Lady, hast thou hope?
Pippo ventured this question as he had adventured
his opinion; that is to say, recklessly, pretendingly,
and with great indifference to any effect it might
have, except as it was likely to establish his
reputation
with the crowd. Still, it would seem, that
by one of those singular coincidences that are
hourly occurring in real life, he had unwittingly
touched a sensitive chord in the system of his fair
fellow-traveller. Her eyes sank to the deck at this
abrupt question, the color again stole to her
polished
temples, and the least practised in the
emotions
of the sex might have detected painful
embarrassment
in her mein. She was, however,
spared the awkwardness of a reply, by the
unexpected
and prompt interference of Maso.
Hope is the last of our friends to prove
recreant
,
said this mariner, else would the cases
of many in company be bad enough, thine own
included, Pippo; for, judging by the outward signs,
the Swabian campaign has not been rich in spoils.
Providence has ordered the harvests of wit
much as it has ordered the harvests of the field,
returned the juggler, who felt the sarcasm of the
other's remark with all the poignancy that it could
derive from truth; since, to expose his real
situation
,
he was absolutely indebted to an
extraordinary
access of generosity in Baptiste, for his very
passage across the Leman. One year, thou shalt
find the vineyard dripping liquors precious as
diamonds
,
while, the next, barrenness shall make it
its seat. To-day the peasant will complain that
poverty prevents him from building the covering
necessary to house his crops, while to-morrow he
will be heard groaning over empty garners.
Abundance
and famine travel the earth hard upon each
other's heels, and it is not surprising that he who
lives by his wits should sometimes fail of his
harvest
,
as well as he who lives by his hands.
If constant custom can secure success, the pious
Conrad should be prosperous, answered Maso,
for, of all machinery, that of sin is the least
seldom
idle. His trade at least can never fail for
want of employers.
Thou hast it, Signor Maso; and it is for this
especial reason that I wish my parents had
educated
me for a bishoprick. He that is charged
with reproving his fellow creatures for their vices
need never know an idle hour.
Thou dost not understand what thou sayest, put
in Conrad; love for the saints has much fallen
away since my youth, and where there is one
Christian ready now to bestow his silver, in order
to get the blessing of some favorite shrine, there
were then ten. I have heard the elders of us
pilgrims
say, that, fifty years since, 'twas a pleasure
to bear the sins of a whole parish, for ours is a
business in which the load does not so much depend
on the amount as the quality; and, in their time,
there were willing offerings, frank confessions,
and generous consideration for those who
undertook
the toil.
In such a trade, the less thou hast to answer
Vol. I. G
for, in behalf of others, the more will pass to thy
credit on the score of thine own backslidings,
pithily remarked Nicklaus Wagner, who was a
sturdy
Protestant, and apt enough at levelling these
side-hits at those who professed a faith, obnoxious
to the attacks of all who dissented from the opinions
and the spiritual domination of Rome.
But Conrad was a rare specimen of what may
be effected by training and well-rooted prejudices.
In presenting this man to the mind of the reader,
we have no intention to impugn the doctrines of the
particular church to which he belonged, but
simply
to show, as the truth will fully warrant, to what
a pass of flagrant and impudent pretension the
qualities of man, unbridled by the wholesome
corrective
of a sound and healthful opinion, was
capable
of conducting abuses on the most solemn
and gravest subjects. In that age usages
prevailed
,
and were so familiar to the minds of the actors
as to excite neither reflection nor comment, which
would now lead to revolutions, and a general rising
in defence of principles which are held to be clear
as the air we breathe. Though we entertain no
doubt of the existence of that truth which pervades
the universe, and to which all things tend, we
think the world, in its practices, its theories, and
its conventional standards of right and wrong, is
in a condition of constant change, which it should
be the business of the wise and good to favor, so
long as care is had that the advantage is not bought
by a re-action of evil, that shall more than prove
its counterpoise. Conrad was one of the lowest
class of those fungi that grow out of the decayed
parts of the moral, as their more material types
prove the rottenness of the vegetable, world; and
the probability of the truth of the portraiture is not
to be loosely denied, without mature reflection on
the similar anomalies that are yet to be found on
every side of us, or without studying the history of
the abuses which then disgraced Christianity, and
which, in truth, became so intolerable in their
character, and so hideous in their features, as to
be the chief influencing cause to bring about their
own annihilation.
Pippo, who had that useful tact which enables a
man to measure his own estimation with others,
was not slow to perceive that the more enlightened
part of his audience began to tire of this
pretending
buffoonery. Resorting to a happy subterfuge,
by means of one of his sleight-of-hand expedients,
he succeeded in transferring the whole of that
portion
of the spectators who still found amusement
in his jugglery, to the other end of the vessel,
where they established themselves among the
anchors
,
ready as ever to swallow an aliment, that
seems to find an unextinguishable appetite for its
reception among the vulgar. Here he continued
his exhibition, now moralizing in the quaint and
often in the pithy manner, which renders the
southern
buffoon so much superior to his duller
competitor
of the north, and uttering a wild jumble of
wholesome truths, loose morality, and witty
inuendoes
,
the latter of which never failed to extort roars
of laughter from all but those who happened to be
their luckless subjects.
Once or twice Baptiste raised his head, and stared
about him with drowsy eyes, but, satisfied there
was nothing to be done in the way of forcing the
vessel ahead, he resumed his nap, without
interfering
in the pastime of those whom he had
hitherto
seemed to take pleasure in annoying. Left
entirely to themselves, therefore, the crowd on
the forecastle represented one of those every-day
but profitable pictures of life, which abound under
our eyes, but which, though they are pregnant with
instruction, are treated with the indifference that
would seem to be the inevitable consequence of
familiarity.
The crowded and overloaded bark might have
been compared to the vessel of human life, which
floats at all times subject to the thousand accidents
of a delicate and complicated machinery; the lake,
so smooth and alluring in its present tranquillity,
but so capable of lashing its iron-bound coasts with
fury, to a treacherous world, whose smile is
almost
always as dangerous as its frown; and, to
complete the picture, the idle, laughing,
thoughtless
,
and yet inflammable group that surrounded
the buffoon, to the unaccountable medley of human
sympathies, of sudden and fierce passions, of fun
and frolic, so inexplicably mingled with the
grossest
egotism that enters into the heart of man: in
a word, to so much that is beautiful and divine,
with so much that would seem to be derived
directly
from the demons, a compound which
composes
this mysterious and dread state of being, and
which we are taught, by reason and revelation,
is only a preparation for another still more
incomprehensible
and wonderful.
CHAPTER V.
How like a fawning publican he looks!
Shylock
.
The
change of the juggler's scene of action left
the party in the stern of the barge, in quiet
possession
of their portion of the vessel. Baptiste and
his boatmen still slept among the boxes; Maso
continued to pace his elevated platform above their
heads; and the meek-looking stranger, whose
entrance
into the barge had drawn so many witticisms
from Pippo, sate a little apart, silent, furtively
observant
,
and retiring, in the identical spot he had
occupied throughout the day. With these
exceptions
,
the whole of the rest of the travellers were
crowding around the person of the mountebank.
Perhaps we have not done well, however, in
classing
either of the two just named with the more
common herd, for there were strong points of
difference to distinguish both from most of their
companions.
The exterior and the personal appointments of
the unknown traveller, who had shrunk so
sensitively
before the hits of the Neapolitan, was greatly
superior to those of any other in the bark beneath
the degree of the gentle, not even excepting those
of the warm peasant Nicklaus Wagner, the owner
of so large a portion of the freight. There was a
decency of air that commanded more respect than
it was then usual to yield to the nameless, a
quietness
of demeanor that denoted reflection and the
habit of self-study and self-correction, together with
a deference to others that was well adapted to gain
friends. In the midst of the noisy, clamorous
merriment of all around him, his restrained and
rebuked manner had won upon the favor of the
more privileged, who had unavoidably noticed the
difference, and had prepared the way to a more
frank communication between the party of the
noble
,
and one who, if not their equal in the usual
points of worldly distinction, was greatly superior
to those among whom he had been accidentally
east by the chances of his journey. Not so with
Maso; he, apparently, had little in common with
the unobtruding and silent being that sat so near
his path, in the short turns he was making to and
fro across the pile of freight. The mariner was
much the younger, his years scarcely reaching
G 2
thirty, while the head of the unknown traveller was
already beginning to be sprinkled with gray. The
walk, attitudes, and gestures, of the former, were
also those of a man confident of himself, a little
addicted to be indifferent to others, and far more
disposed to lead than to follow. These are
qualities
that it may be thought his present situation
was scarcely suited to discover, but they had been
made sufficiently apparent, by the cool, calculating
looks he threw, from time to time, at the man
uvres
commanded by Baptiste, the expressive sneer
with which he criticised his decisions, and a few
biting remarks which had escaped him in the course
of the day, and which had conveyed any thing but
compliments to the nautical skill of the patron and
his fresh-water followers. Still there were signs
of better stuff in this suspicious-looking person than
are usually seen about men, whose attire, pursuits
and situation, are so indicative of the world's
pressing hard upon their principles, as happened to
be the fact with this poor and unknown seaman.
Though ill clad, and wearing about him the general
tokens of a vagrant life, and that loose connexion
with society that is usually taken as sufficient
evidence
of one's demerits, his countenance
occasionally
denoted thought, and, during the day, his eye
had frequently wandered towards the group of his
more intelligent fellow-passengers, as if he found
subjects of greater interest in their discourse, than
in the rude pleasantries and practical jokes of those
nearer his person.
The high-bred are always courteous, except in
cases in which presumption repels civility; for they
who are accustomed to the privileges of station,
think far less of their immunities, than they, who,
by being excluded from the fancied advantages,
are apt to exaggerate a superiority that a short
experience would show becomes of very
questionable
value in the possession. Without this equitable
provision of Providence, the laws of civilized
society
would become truly intolerable, for, if peace
of mind, pleasure, and what is usually termed
happiness, were the exclusive enjoyment of those
who are rich and honoured, there would, indeed,
be so crying an injustice in their present ordinances
as could not long withstand the united assaults of
reason and justice. But, happily for the relief of
the less gifted and the peace of the world, the fact
is very different. Wealth has its peculiar woes;
honors and privileges pall in the use; and,
perhaps
,
as a rule, there is less of that regulated
contentment
,
which forms the nearest approach to the
condition of the blessed of which this unquiet state
of being is susceptible, among those who are
usually the most envied by their fellow-creatures,
than in any other of the numerous gradations into
which the social scale has been divided. He who
reads our present legend with the eyes that we
could wish, will find in its moral the illustration of
this truth; for, if it is our intention to delineate
some of the wrongs that spring from the abuses of
the privileged and powerful, we hope equally to
show how completely they fall short of their
object
,
by failing to confer that exclusive happiness
which is the goal that all struggle to attain.
Neither the Baron de Willading, nor his noble
friend, the Genoese, though educated in the
opinions
of their caste, and necessarily under the
influence
of the prejudices of the age, was addicted
to the insolence of vulgar pride. Their habits
had revolted at the coarseness of the majority of
the travellers, and they were glad to be rid of
them by the expedient of Pippo; but no sooner
did the modest, decent air of the stranger who
remained
,
make itself apparent, than they felt a desire
to compensate him for the privations he had already
undergone, by showing the civilities that their
own rank rendered so easy and usually so
grateful
.
With this view, then, as soon as the noisy
troupe
had departed, the Signor Grimaldi raised
his beaver with that discreet and imposing
politeness
which equally attracts and repels, and,
addressing
the solitary stranger, he invited him to
descend, and stretch his legs on the part of the
deck which had hitherto been considered
exclusively
devoted to the use of his own party. The
other started, reddened, and looked like one who
doubted whether he had heard aright.
These noble gentlemen would be glad if you
would come down, and take advantage of this
opportunity to relieve your limbs; said the young
Sigismund, raising his own athletic arm towards
the stranger, to offer its assistance in helping him
to reach the deck.
Still the unknown traveller hesitated, in the
manner of one who fears he might overstep
discretion
,
by obtruding beyond the limits imposed
by modesty. He glanced furtively upwards at
the place where Maso had posted himself, and
muttered something of an intention to profit by its
present nakedness.
It has an occupant who does not seem
disposed
to admit another, said Sigismund, smiling;
your mariner has a self-possession when afloat,
that usually gives him the same superiority that
the well-armed swasher has among the timid in
the street. You would do well, then, to accept
the offer of the noble Genoese.
The stranger, who had once or twice been
called rather ostentatiously by Baptiste the Herr
Mller, during the day, as if the patron were
disposed
to let his hearers know that he had those
who at least bore creditable names, even among
his ordinary passengers, no longer delayed. He
came down from his seat, and moved about the
deck in his usual, quiet, subdued manner, but in a
way to show that he found a very sensible and
grateful relief in being permitted to make the
change. Sigismund was rewarded for this act
of good-nature by a smile from Adelheid, who
thought his warm interference in behalf of one,
seemingly so much his inferior, did no discredit
to his rank. It is possible that the youthful
soldier
had some secret sentiment of the advantage
he derived from his kind interest in the stranger,
for his brow flushed, and he looked more satisfied
with himself, after this little office of humanity
had been performed.
You are better among us here, the baron
kindly observed, when the Herr Mller was fairly
established in his new situation, than among the
freight of the honest Nicklaus Wagner, who,
Heaven help the worthy peasant! has loaded us
fairly to the water's edge, with the notable
industry
of his dairy people. I like to witness the
prosperity of our burghers, but it would have
been better for us travellers, at least, had there
been less of the wealth of honest Nicklaus in our
company. Are you of Berne, or of Zurich?
Of Berne, Herr Baron.
I might have guessed that by finding you on
the Genfer See, instead of the Wallensttter.
There are many of the Mllers in the Emmen
That?
The Herr is right; the name is frequent, both
in that valley, and in Entlibuch.
It is a frequent appellation among us of the
Teutonick stock. I had many Mllers in my
company, Gaetano, when we lay before Mantua.
I remember that two of the brave fellows were
buried in the marshes of that low country; for
the fever helped the enemy as much as the sword,
in the life-wasting campaign of the year we
besieged
the place.
The more observant Italian saw that the stranger
was distressed by the personal nature of the
conversation
,
and, while he quietly assented to his
friend's remark, he took occasion to give it a new
direction.
You travel, like ourselves, Signore, to get a
look at these far-famed revels of the Vvasians?
That, and affairs, have brought me into this
honorable company; answered the Herr Mller,
whom no kindness of tone, however, could win
from his timid and subdued manner of speaking.
And thou, father, turning to the Augustine,
art journeying towards thy mountain residence,
after a visit of love to the valleys and their
people?
The monk of St. Bernard assented to the truth
of this remark, explaining the manner in which
his community were accustomed annually to
appeal
to the liberality of the generous in
Switzerland
,
in behalf of an institution that was founded
in the interest of humanity, without reference to
distinction of faith.
'Tis a blessed brotherhood. answered the
Genoese, crossing himself, perhaps as much from
habit as from devotion, and the traveller need
wish it well. I have never shared of your
hospitality, but all report speaks fairly of it, and
the title of a brother of San Bernardo, should
prove a passport to the favor of every Christian.
Signore, said Maso, stopping suddenly, and
taking his part uninvited in the discourse, and yet
in a way to avoid the appearance of an
impertinent
interference, none know this better than I!
A wanderer these many years, I have often seen
the stony roof of the hospice with as much
pleasure
as I have ever beheld the entrance of my
haven, when an adverse gale was pressing
against my canvass. Honor and a rich
qute
to
the clavier of the convent, therefore, for it is
bringing succor to the poor and rest to the
weary!
As he uttered this opinion, Maso decorously
raised his cap, and pursued his straitened walk
with the industry of a caged tiger. It was so
unusual
for one of his condition to obtrude on the
discourse of the fair and noble, that the party
exchanged
looks of surprise; but, the Signor
Grimaldi
,
more accustomed than most of his friends
to the frank deportment and bold speech of
mariners
,
from having dwelt long on the coast of the
Mediterranean, felt disposed rather to humor than
to repulse this disposition to talk.
Thou art a Genoese, by thy dialect, he said,
assuming as a matter of course the right to
question
one of years so much fewer, and of a
condition
so much inferior to his own.
Signore, returned Maso, uncovering himself
again, though his manner betrayed profound
personal
respect rather than the deference of the
vulgar
,
I was born in the city of palaces, though
it was my fortune first to see the light beneath a
humble roof. The poorest of us are proud of the
splendor of Genova la Superba, even if its glory
has come from our own groans.
The Signor Grimaldi frowned. But, ashamed
to permit himself to be disturbed by an allusion so
vague, and perhaps so unpremediated, and more
especially coming as it did from so insignificant a
source, his brow regained its expression of
habitual
composure.
An instant of reflection, told him it would be
in better taste to continue the conversation, than
churlishly to cut it short for so light a cause.
Thou art too young to have had much
connexion
,
either in advantage or in suffering, he
rejoined, with the erection of the gorgeous
dwellings
to which thou alludest.
This is true, Signore; except as one is the
better or worse for those who have gone before
him. I am what I seem, more by the acts of
others than by any faults of my own. I envy not
the rich or great, however; for one that has seen
as much of life as I, knows the difference between
the gay colors of the garment, and that of the
shrivelled and diseased skin it conceals. We make
our feluccas glittering and fine with paint, when
their timbers work the most, and when the
treacherous
planks are ready to let in the sea to drown
us.
Thou hast the philosophy of it, young man,
and hast uttered a biting truth, for those who waste
their prime in chasing a phantom. Thou hast well
bethought thee of these matters, for, if content
with thy lot, no palace of our city would make
thee happier.
If, Signore, is a meaning word!Content is
like the north-starwe seamen steer for it, while
none can ever reach it!
Am I then deceived in thee, after all? Is thy
seeming moderation only affected; and would'st
thou be the patron of the bark in which fortune
hath made thee only a passenger?
And a bad fortune it hath proved, returned
Maso, laughing. We appear fated to pass the
night in it, for, so far from seeing any signs of
this land-breeze of which Baptiste has so
confidently
spoken, the air seems to have gone to sleep
as well as the crew. Thou art accustomed to this
climate, reverend Augustine; is it usual to see so
deep a calm on the Leman at this late season?
A question like this was well adapted to effect
the speaker's wish to change the discourse, for it
very naturally directed the attention of all present
from a subject that was rather tolerated from
idleness
than interesting in itself, to the different
natural
phenomena by which they were surrounded.
The sun-set had now fairly passed, and the
travellers
were at the witching moment that precedes
the final disappearance of the day. A calm so
deep rested on the limpid lake, that it was not easy
to distinguish the line which separated the two
elements, in those places where the blue of the
land was confounded with the well-known and
peculiar
color of the Leman.
The precise position of the Winkelried was near
mid-way between the shores of Vaud and those
of Savoy, though nearer to the first than to the
last. Not another sail was visible on the whole
of the watery expanse, with the exception of one
that hung lazily from its yard, in a small bark that
was pulling towards St. Gingoulph, bearing
Savoyards
returning to their homes from the other
side of the lake, and which, in that delusive
landscape
,
appeared to the eye to be within a
stone's-throw
of the base of the mountain, though, in
truth, still a weary row from the land.
Nature has spread her work on a scale so
magnificent
in this sublime region that ocular
deceptions
of this character abound, and it requires
time and practice to judge of those measurements
which have been rendered familiar in other scenes.
In like manner to the bark under the rocks of
Savoy
,
there lay another, a heavy-moulded boat,
nearly in a line with Villeneuve, which seemed to
float in the air instead of its proper element, and
whose oars were seen to rise and fall beneath a
high mound, that was rendered shapeless by
refraction
.
This was a craft, bearing hay from the
meadows at the mouth of the Rhone to their
proprietors
in the villages of the Swiss coast. A few
Vol. I. H
light boats were pulling about in front of the town
of Vvey, and a forest of low masts and latine
yards, seen in the hundred picturesque attitudes
peculiar to the rig, crowded the wild anchorage
that is termed its port.
An air-line drawn from St. Saphorin to
Meillerie
,
would have passed between the spars of the
Winkelried, her distance from her haven,
consequently
,
a little exceeded a marine league. This
space might readily have been conquered in an
hour or two by means of the sweeps, but for the
lumbered condition of the decks, which would have
rendered their use difficult, and the unusual draught
of the bark, which would have caused the
exertion
to be painful. As it has been seen, Baptiste
preferred waiting for the arrival of the
night-breeze
to having recourse to an expedient so
toilsome
and slow.
We have already said, that the point just
described
was at the place where the Leman fairly
enters its eastern horn, and where its shores
possess
their boldest and finest faces. On the side of
Savoy, the coast was a sublime wall of rocks,
here and there clothed with chestnuts, or indented
with ravines and dark glens, and naked and wild
along the whole line of their giddly summits. The
villages so frequently mentioned, and which have
become celebrated in these later times by the touch
of genius, clung to the uneven declivities, their
lower dwellings laved by the lake, and their upper
confounded with the rugged faces of the
mountains
.
Beyond the limits of the Leman, the Alps
shot up into still higher pinnacles, occasionally
showing one of those naked excrescences of
granite
,
which rise for a thousand feet above the rest
of the rangea trifle in the stupendous scale of
the vast pilesand which, in the language of the
country, are not inaptly termed Dents, from some
fancied and plausible resemblance to human teeth.
The verdant meadows of Noville, Aigle and Bex,
spread for leagues between these snow-capped
barriers, so dwindled to the eye, however, that the
spectator believed that to be a mere bottom, which
was, in truth, a broad and fertile plain. Beyond
these again, came the celebrated pass of St.
Maurice
,
where the foaming Rhone dashed between
two abutments of rock, as if anxious to effect its
exit before the superincumbent mountains could
come together, and shut it out for ever from the
inviting basin to which it was hurrying with a
never-ceasing din. Behind this gorge, so
celebrated
as the key of the Valais, and even of the
Alps in the time of the conquerors of the world,
the back-ground took a character of holy mystery.
The shades of evening lay thick in that enormous
glen, which was sufficiently large to contain a
sovereign state, and the dark piles of mountains
beyond were seen in a hazy, confused array. The
setting was a grey boundary of rocks, on which
fleecy clouds rested, as if tired with their long and
high flight, and on which the parting day still
lingered
soft and lucid. One cone of dazzling white
towered over all. It resembled a bright
steppingstone
between heaven and earth, the heat of the
hot sun falling innocuously against its sides, like
the cold and pure breast of a virgin repelling those
treacherous sentiments which prove the ruin of a
shining and glorious innocence. Across the
summit
of this brilliant and cloud-like peak, which
formed the most distant object in the view, ran the
imaginary line that divided Italy from the regions
of the north. Drawing nearer, and holding its
course on the opposite shore, the eye embraced the
range of rampart-like rocks that beetle over
Villeneuve
and Chillon, the latter a snow-white pile that
seemed to rest partly on the land and partly on the
water. On the vast dbris of the mountains
clustered
the hamlets of Clarens, Montreux, Chtelard,
and all those other places, since rendered so
familiar
to the reader of fiction by the vivid pen of
Rousseau. Above the latter village the whole of
the savage and rocky range receded, leaving the
lake-shore to vine-clad ctes that stretch away far
to the west.
This scene, at all times alluring and grand, was
now beheld under its most favorable auspices.
The glare of day had deserted all that belonged to
what might be termed the lower world, leaving in
its stead the mild hues, the pleasing shadows, and
the varying tints of twilight. It is true that a
hundred
chlets dotted the Alps, or those mountain
pasturages which spread themselves a thousand
fathoms above the Leman, on the foundation of
rock that lay like a wall behind Montreux, shining
still with the brightness of a bland even, but all
below
was fast catching the more sombre colors of
the hour.
As the transition from day to night grew more
palpable, the hamlets of Savoy became gray and
hazy, the shades thickened around the bases of the
mountains in a manner to render their forms
indistinct
and massive, and the milder glory of the
scene was transferred to their summits. Seen by
sun-light, these noble heights appear a long range
of naked granite, piled on a foundation of
chestnut-covered
hills, and buttressed by a few such salient
spurs as are perhaps necessary to give variety and
agreeable shadows to their acclivities. Their
outlines
were now drawn in those waving lines that
the pencil of Raphael would have loved to sketch,
dark, distinct, and appearing to be carved by art.
The inflected and capricious edges of the rocks
stood out in high relief against the back-ground of
pearly sky, resembling so much ebony wrought
into every fantastic curvature that a wild and vivid
fancy could conceive. Of all the wonderful and
imposing sights of this extraordinary region, there
is perhaps none in which there is so exquisite an
admixture of the noble, the beautiful, and the
bewitching
,
as in this view of these natural arabesques
of Savoy, seen at the solemn hour of twilight.
The Baron de Willading and his friends stood
uncovered, in reverence of the sublime picture,
which could only come from the hands of the
Creator
,
and with unalloyed enjoyment of the bland
tranquillity of the hour. Exclamations of pleasure
had escaped them, as the exhibition advanced; for
the view, like the shifting of scenes, was in a
constant
state of transition under the waning and
changing light, and each had eagerly pointed out
to the others some peculiar charm of the view.
The sight was, in sooth, of a nature to preclude
selfishness, no one catching a glimpse that he did
not wish to be shared by all. Vvey, their
journey
,
the fleeting minutes, and their disappointment,
were all forgotten in the delight of witnessing this
evening landscape, and the silence was broken
only
to express those feelings of delight which had
long been uppermost in every bosom.
I doff my beaver to thy Switzerland, friend
Melchior, cried the Signor Grimaldi, after
directing
the attention of Adelheid to one of the peaks of
Savoy, of which he had just remarked that it
seemed a spot where an angel might love to light
in his visits to the earth; if thou hast much of
this, we of Italy must look to it, orby the shades
of our fathers! we shall lose our reputation for
natural beauty. How is it young lady; hast thou
many of these sun-sets at Willading? or, is this,
after all, but an exception to what thou seest in
commonas much a matter of astonishment to
H 2
thyself, asby San Francesco! good Marcelli, we
must even own, it is to thee and me!
Adelheid laughed at the old noble's
good-humored
rhapsody, but, much as she loved her native
land, she could not pervert the truth by pretending
that the sight was one to be often met with.
If we have not this, however, we have our
glaciers, our lakes, our cottages, our chlets, our
Oberland, and such glens as have an eternal
twilight
of their own.
Ay, my true-hearted and pretty Swiss, this
is well for thee who wilt affirm that a drop of
thy snow-water is worth a thousand limpid springs,
or thou art not the true child of old Melchior de
Willading; but it is lost on the cooler head of one
who has seen other lands. Father Xavier, thou
art a neutral, for thy dwelling is on the dividing
ridge between the two countries, and I appeal to
thee to know if these Helvetians have much of this
quality of evening?
The worthy monk met the question in the spirit
with which it was asked, for the elasticity of the
air, and the heavenly tranquillity and bewitching
loveliness of the hour, well disposed him to be
joyous.
To maintain my character as an impartial
judge, he answered, I will say that each region
has its own advantages. If Switzerland is the
most wonderful and imposing, Italy is the most
winning. The latter leaves more durable
impressions
and is more fondly cherished. One strikes
the senses, but the other slowly winds its way into
the affections; and he who has freely vented his
admiration in exclamations and epithets in one,
will, in the end, want language to express all the
secret longings, the fond recollections, the deep
repinings, that he retains for the other.
Fairly reasoned, friend Melchior, and like an
able umpire, leaving to each his share of
consolation
and vanity. Herr Mller, dost thou agree
in a decision that gives thy muchvaunted
Switzerland
so formidable a rival?
Signore, answered the meek traveller, I see
enough to admire and love in both, as is always
the fact with that which God hath formed. This
is a glorious world for the happy, and most might
be so, could they summon courage to be innocent.
The good Augustine will tell thee that this
bears hard on certain points of theology, in which
our common nature is treated with but indifferent
respect. He that would continue innocent must
struggle hard with his propensities.
The stranger was thoughtful, and Sigismund,
whose eye had been earnestly riveted on his face,
thought that it denoted more of peace then usual.
Signore, rejoined the Herr Mller, when time
had been given for reflection, I believe it is good
for us to know unhappiness. He that is permitted
too much of his own will gets to be headstrong,
and, like the overfed bullock, difficult to be
managed
;
whereas, he who lives under the displeasure
of his fellow-creatures is driven to look closely
into himself, and comes, at last, to chasten his
spirit by detecting its faults.
Art thou a follower of Calvin? demanded the
Augustine suddenly, surprised to hear opinions so
healthful in the mouth of a dissenter from the true
church.
Father, I belong neither to Rome nor to the
religion of Geneva. I am a humble worshipper
of God, and a believer in the blessed mediation of
his holy Son.
How!Where dost thou find such sentiments
out of the pale of the church?
In mine own heart. This is my temple, holy
Augustine, and I never enter it without adoration
for its Almighty founder. A cloud was over the
roof of my father at my birth, and I have not been
permitted to mingle much with men; but the
solitude
of my life has driven me to study my own
nature, which I hope has become none the worse
for the examination. I know I am an unworthy
and sinful man, and I hope others are as much
better than I as their opinions of themselves would
give reason to think.
The words of the Herr Mller, which lost none
of their weight by his unaffected and quiet manner,
excited curiosity. At first, most of the listeners
were disposed to believe him one of those
exaggerated
spirits who exalt themselves by a pretended
self-abasement, but his natural, quiet, and
thoughtful
deportment soon produced a more favorable
opinion. There was a habit of reflection, a
retreating
inward look about his eye, that revealed the
character of one long and truly accustomed to
look more at himself than at others, and which
wrought singularly in his behalf.
We may not all have these flattering opinions
of ourselves that thy words would seem to imply,
Signor Mller, observed the Genoese, his tone
changing to one better suited to soothe the feelings
of the person addressed, while a shade insensibly
stole over his own venerable features; neither
are all at peace that so seem. If it will be any
consolation to thee to know that others are probably
no more happy than thyself, I will add that I have
known much pain, and that, too, amid
circumstances
which most would deem fortunate, and
which, I fear, a great majority of mankind might
be disposed to envy.
I should be base indeed to seek consolation in
such a source! I do not complain, Signore, though
my whole life has so passed that I can hardly say
that I enjoy it. It is not easy to smile when we
know that all frown upon us; else could I be
content
.
As it is, I rather feel than repine.
This is a most singular condition of the mind;
whispered Adelheid to young Sigismund; for both
had been deeply attentive listeners to the calm but
strong language of the Herr Mller. The young
man did not answer, and his fair companion saw,
with surprise, that he was pale, and with difficulty
noticed her remark with a smile.
The frowns of men, my son, observed the
monk, are usually reserved for those who offend
its ordinances. The latter may not be always just,
but there is a common sentiment which refuses to
visit innocence, even in the narrow sense in which
we understand the word, with undeserved
displeasure
.
The Herr Mller looked earnestly at the
Augustine
,
and he seemed about to answer; but,
checking the impulse, he bowed in submission. At
the same time, a wild, painful smile gleamed on
his face.
I agree with thee, good canon, rejoined the
simple-minded baron: we are much addicted to
quarrelling with the world, but, after all, when we
look closely into the matter, it will commonly be
found that the cause of our grievances exists in
ourselves.
Is there no Providence, father? exclaimed
Adelheid, a little reproachfully for one of her
respectful
habits and great filial tenderness. Can
we recall the dead to life, or keep those quick
whom God is pleased to destroy?
Thou hast me, girl!there is a truth in this
that no bereaved parent can deny!
This remark produced an embarrassed pause,
during which the Herr Mller gazed furtively
about him, looking from the face of one to that of
another, as if seeking for some countenance on
which he could rely. But he turned away to the
view of those hills which had been so curiously
wrought by the finger of the Almighty, and seemed
to lose himself in their contemplation.
This is some spirit that has been bruised by
early indiscretion, said the Signor Grimaldi, in a
low voice, and whose repentance is strangely
mixed with resignation. I know not whether such
a man is most to be envied or pitied. There is a
fearful mixture of resignation and of suffering in
his air.
He has not the mien of a stabber or a knave,
answered the baron. If he comes truly of the
Mllers of the Emmen Thal, or even of those of
Entlibuch, I should know something of his history.
They are warm burghers, and mostly of fair name.
It is true, that in my youth one of the family got
out of favor with the councils, on account of some
concealment of their lawful claims in the way of
revenue, but the man made an atonement that was
deemed sufficient in amount, and the matter was
forgotten. It is not usual, Herr Mller, to meet
citizens in our canton who go for neither Rome
nor Calvin.
It is not usual, mein Herr, to meet men placed
as I am. Neither Rome nor Calvin is sufficient
for me;I have need of God!
I fear thou hast taken life?
The stranger bowed, and his face grew livid,
seemingly with the intensity of his own thoughts.
Melchior de Willading so disliked the expression,
that he turned away his eyes in uneasiness. The
other glanced frequently at the forward part of the
bark, and he seemed struggling hard to speak, but,
for some strong reason, unable to effect his
purpose
.
Uncovering himself, at length, he said
steadily, as if superior to shame, while he fully felt
the import of his communication, but in a voice
that was cautiously suppressed
I am Balthazar, of your canton, Herr Baron,
and I pray your powerful succor, should those
untamed spirits on the forecastle come to discover
the truth. My blood hath been made to curdle
to-day whilst listening to their heartless threats
and terrible maledictions. Without this fear, I
should have kept my secret,for God knows I am
not proud of my office!
The general and sudden surprise, accompanied
as it was by a common movement of aversion,
induced the Signor Grimaldi to demand the reason.
Thy name is not in much favour apparently,
Herr Mller, or Herr Balthazar, whichever it is
thy pleasure to be called, observed the Genoese,
casting a quick glance around the circle. There
is some mystery in it, that to me needs
explanation
.
Signore, I am the headsman of Berne.
Though long schooled in the polished habits of
his high condition, which taught him ordinarily to
repress strong emotions, the Signor Grimaldi could
not conceal the start which this unexpected
announcement
produced, for he had not escaped the
usual prejudices of men.
Truly, we have been fortunate in our associate,
Melchior, he said drily, turning without
ceremony
from the man whose modest, quiet mien had
lately interested him so much, but whose manner
he now took to be assumed,few pausing to
investigate
the motives of those who are condemned
of opinion:here has been much excellent and
useful morality thrown away upon a very unworthy
subject!
The baron received the intelligence of the real
name of their travelling companion with less
feeling
.
He had been greatly puzzled to account for
the singular language he had heard, and he found
relief in so brief a solution of the difficulty.
The pretended name, after all, then, is only a
cloak to conceal the truth! I knew the Mllers of
the Emmen Thal so well, that I had great difficulty
in fitting the character which the honest man gave
of himself fairly upon any one of them all. But it
is now clear enough, and doubtless Balthazar has
no great reason to be proud of the turn which
Fortune
has played his family in making them
executioners
.
Is the office hereditary? demanded the
Genoese, quickly.
It is. Thou knowest that we of Berne have
great respect for ancient usages. He that is born
to the Brgerschaft will die in the exercise of his
rights, and he that is born out of its venerable pale
must be satisfied to live out of it, unless he has gold
or favor. Our institutions are a hint from nature,
which leaves men as they are created, preserving
the order and harmony of society by venerable
and well-defined laws, as is wise and necessary.
In nature, he that is born strong remains strong,
and he that has little force must be content with
his feebleness.
The Signor Grimaldi looked like one who felt
contrition.
Art thou, in truth, an hereditary executioner?
he asked, addressing Balthazar himself.
Signore, I am: else would hand of mine have
never taken life. 'Tis a hard duty to perform,
even under the obligations and penalties of the
law;otherwise, it were accursed!
Thy fathers deemed it a privilege!
We suffer for their error: Signore, the sins of
the fathers, in our case, have indeed been visited
on the children to the latest generations.
The countenance of the Genoese grew brighter,
and his voice resumed the polished tones in which
he usually spoke.
Here has been some injustice of a certainty,
he said, or one of thy appearance would not be
found in this cruel position. Depend on our
authority
to protect thee, should the danger thou
seemest to apprehend really occur. Still the laws
must be respected, though not always of the rigid
impartiality that we might wish. Thou hast
owned
the imperfection of human nature, and it is not
wonderful that its work should have flaws.
I complain not now of the usage, which to me
has become habit, but I dread the untamed fury of
these ignorant and credulous men, who have taken
a wild fancy that my presence might bring a curse
upon the bark.
There are accidental situations which contain
more healthful morals than can be drawn from a
thousand ingenious and plausible homilies, and in
which facts, in their naked simplicity, are far more
eloquent than any meaning that can be conveyed
by words. Such was the case with this meek and
unexpected appeal of Balthazar. All who heard
him saw his situation under very different colors
from those in which it would have been regarded
had the subject presented itself under ordinary
circumstances
.
A common and painful sentiment
attested
strongly against the oppression that had
given
birth to his wrongs, and the good Melchior de
Willading himself wondered how a case of this
striking injustice could have arisen under the laws
of Berne.
Vol. I. I
CHAPTER VI.
Methought I saw a thousand fearful wrecks,
A thousand men that fishes gnawed upon;
Wedges of gold, great anchors, heaps of pearl,
Inestimable stones, unvalued jewels,
All scattered in the bottom of the sea.
Richard III.
The flitting twilight was now on the wane, and
the shades of evening were gathering fast over
the deep basin of the lake. The figure of Maso,
as he continued to pace his elevated platform, was
drawn dark and distinct against the southern sky,
in which some of the last rays of the sun still
lingered
,
but objects on both shores were getting to
be confounded with the shapeless masses of the
mountains. Here and there a pale star peeped
out, though most of the vault that stretched across
the confined horizon was shut in by dusky clouds.
A streak of dull, unnatural light was seen in the
quarter which lay above the meadows of the
Rhone, and nearly in a direction with the peak of
Mont Blanc, which, though not visible from this
portion of the Leman, was known to lie behind the
ramparts of Savoy, like a monarch of the hills
entrenched
in his citadel of rocks and ice.
The change, the lateness of the hour, and the
unpleasant reflections left by the short dialogue
with Balthazar, produced a strong and common
desire to see the end of a navigation that was
beginning
to be irksome. Those objects which had
lately yielded so much and so pure a delight were
now getting to be black and menacing, and the
very sublimity of the scale on which Nature had
here thrown together her elements was an
additional
source of uncertainty and alarm. Those
fairy-like, softly-delineated, natural arabesques,
which had so lately been dwelt upon with rapture,
were now converted into dreary crags that
seemed
to beetle above the helpless bark, giving un
pleasant admonitions of the savage and
inhospitable
properties of their iron-bound bases, which
were known to prove destructive to all who were
cast against them while the elements were in
disorder
.
These changes in the character of the scene,
which in some respects began to take the aspect
of omens, were uneasily witnessed by all in the
stern of the bark, though the careless laughter, the
rude joke, and the noisy cries, which from time to
time arose on the forecastle, sufficiently showed
that the careless spirits it held were still indulging
in the coarse enjoyments most suited to their
habits
.
One individual, however, was seen stealing
from the crowd, and establishing himself on the
pile of freight, as if he had a mind more addicted
to reflection, and less disposed to unmeaning
revelry
,
than most of those whom he had just
abandoned
.
This was the Westphalian student, who,
wearied with amusements that were below the
level of his acquirements, and suddenly struck
with the imposing aspect of the lake and the
mountains
,
had stolen apart to muse on his distant home
and the beings most dear to him, under an
excitement
that suited those morbid sensibilities which
he had long encouraged by a very subtle
metaphysical
system of philosophy. Until now, Maso
had paced his lofty post with his eye fixed chiefly
on the heavens in the direction of Mont Blanc,
occasionally
turning it, however, over the motionless
bulk of the bark, but when the student placed
himself
across his path, he stopped and smiled at the
abstracted air and riveted regard with which the
youth gazed at a star.
Art thou an astronomer, that thou lookest so
closely at yonder shining world? demanded II
Maledetto, with the superiority that the mariner
afloat is wont successfully to assume over the
unhappy
wight of a landsman, who is very liable to
admit his own impotency on the novel and
dangerous
element:the astrologer himself would
not study it more deeply.
This is the hour agreed upon between me and
one that I love to bring the unseen principle of our
spirits together, by communing through its
medium
.
I have heard of such means of intercourse.
Dost see more than others by reason of such an
assistant?
I see the object which is gazed upon, at this
moment, by kind blue eyes that have often looked
upon me in affection. When we are in a strange
land, and in a fearful situation, such a communion
has its pleasures!
Maso laid his hand upon the shoulder of the
student
,
which he pressed with the force of a vice.
Thou art right, he said, moodily; make the
most of thy friendships, and, if there are any
that love thee, tighten the knot by all the means
thou hast. None know the curse of being deserted
in this selfish and cruel battle of interest better
than I! Be not ashamed of thy star, but gaze at
it till thy eye-strings crack. See the bright eyes
of her that loves thee in its twinkling, her constancy
in its lustre, and her melancholy in its sadness;
lose not the happy moments, for there will soon
be a dark curtain to shut out its view.
The Westphalian was struck with the singular
energy as well as with the poetry of the mariner,
and he distrusted the obvious allusion to the clouds,
which were, in fact, fast covering the vault above
their heads.
Dost thou like the night? he demanded,
turning
from his star in doubt.
It might be fairer. This is a wild region, and
your cold Swiss lakes sometimes become too hot
for the stoutest seaman's heart. Gaze at thy star,
young man, while thou mayest, and bethink thee
of the maiden thou lovest and of all her kindness;
we are on a crazy water, and pleasant thoughts
should not be lightly thrown away.
Maso walked away, leaving the student alarmed,
uneasy at he knew not what, and yet bent with
childish eagerness on regarding the little luminary
that occasionally was still seen wading among
volumes of vapor. At this instant, a shout of
unmeaning, clamorous merriment arose on the
forecastle.
Il Maledetto did not remain any longer on the
pile, but abandoning it to the new occupant, he
descended among the silent, thoughtful party who
were in possession of the cleared space near the
stern. It was now so dark that some little
attention
was necessary to distinguish faces, even
at trifling distances. But, by means of moving
among these privileged persons with great
coolness
and seeming indifference, he soon succeeded
in placing himself near the Genoese and the
Augustine
.
Signore, he said, in Italian, raising his cap
to the former with the same marked respect as
before, though it was evidently no easy matter to
impress him with the deference that the obscure
usually feel for the greatthis is likely to prove
an unfortunate end to a voyage that began with
so fair appearances. I could wish that your
eccellenza
,
with all this noble and fair company, was
safely landed in the town of Vvey.
I 2
Dost thou mean that we have cause to fear
more than delay?
Signore, the mariner's life is one of unequal
chances: now he floats in a lazy calm, and
presently
he is tossed between heaven and earth, in a
way to make the stoutest heart sick. My
knowledge
of these waters is not great, but there are
signs making themselves seen in the sky, here
above the peak that lies in the direction of Mont
Blanc, that would trouble me, were this our own
blue but treacherous Mediterranean.
What thinkest thou of this, father; a long
residence in the Alps must have given thee some
insight into their storms?
The Augustine had been grave and thoughtful
from the moment that he ceased to converse with
Balthazar. He, too, had been struck with the
omens, and, long used to study the changes of the
weather, in a region where the elements sometimes
work their will on a scale commensurate with the
grandeur of the mountains, his thoughts had been
anxiously recurring to the comforts and security
of some of those hospitable roofs in the city to
which they were bound, and which were always
ready to receive the clavier of St. Bernard, in
return
for the services and self-denial of his
brotherhood
.
With Maso, I could wish we were safely
landed
,
answered the good canon; the intense heat
that a day like this creates in our valleys and on
the lakes so weakens the sub-strata, or foundations
of air, that the cold masses which collect around
he glaciers sometimes descend like avalanches
from their heights, to fill the vacuum. The shock
is
fearful, even to those who meet it in the glens
and among the rocks, but the plunge of such a
column of air upon one of the lakes is certain to be
terrible.
And thou thinkest there is danger of one of
these phenomena at present?
I know not; but I would we were housed!
That unnatural light above, and this deep
tranquillity
below, which surpasses an ordinary calm
have already driven me to my aves.
The reverend Augustine speaks like a book
man, and one who has passed his time, up in his
mountain-convent, in study and reflection,
rejoined
Maso; whereas the reasons I have to offer
savor more of the seaman's practice. A calm
like this, will be followed, sooner or later, by a
commotion in the atmosphere. I like not the
absence
of the breeze from the land, on which
Baptiste
counted so surely, and, taking that symptom
with the signs of yonder hot sky, I look soon to
see this extraordinary quiet displaced by some
violent
struggle among the winds. Nettuno, too,
my faithful dog, has given notice, by the manner
in which he snuffs the air, that we are not to pass
the night in this motionless condition.
I had hoped ere this to be quietly in our
haven
.
What means yonder bright light? Is it a
star in the heavens, or does it merely lie against
the side of the huge mountain?
There shines old Roger de Blonay! cried
the baron, heartily; he knows of our being in
the bark, and he has fired his beacon that we may
steer by its light.
The conjecture seemed probable, for, while the
day remained, the castle of Blonay, seated on the
bosom of the mountain that shelters Vvey to the
north-east, had been plainly visible. It had been
much admired, a pleasing object in a view that
was so richly studded with hamlets and castles,
and Adelheid had pointed it out to Sigismund as
the immediate goal of her journey. The lord
of Blonay being apprized of the intended visit,
nothing was more probable than that he, an old
and tried friend of Melchior de Willading's,
should show this sign of impatience; partly in
compliment to those whom he expected, and
partly as a signal that might be really useful to
those who navigated the Leman, in a night that
threatened so much murky obscurity.
The Signor Grimaldi rightly deemed the
circumstances
grave, and, calling to him his friend
and Sigismund, he communicated the
apprehensions
of the monk and Maso. A braver man than
Melchior de Willading did not dwell in all
Switzerland
,
but he did not hear the gloomy predictions
of the Genoese without shaking in every limb.
My poor enfeebled Adelheid! he said,
yielding
to a father's tenderness: what will become
of this frail plant, if exposed to a tempest in an
unsheltered bark?
She will be with her father, and with her
father's friend, answered the maiden herself; for
the narrow limits to which they were necessarily
confined, and the sudden burst of feeling in the
parent, which had rendered him incautious in
pitching his voice, made her the mistress of the
cause of alarm. I have heard enough of what
the good Father Xavier and this mariner have
said, to know that we are in a situation that might
be better; but am I not with tried friends? I
know already what the Herr Sigismund can do
in behalf of my life, and come what may, we
have all a beneficent guardian in One, who will
not leave any of us to perish without
remembering
we are his children.
This girl shames us all, said the Signor
Grimaldi
;
but it is often thus with these fragile
beings, who rise the firmest and noblest in
moments
when prouder man begins to despair. They
put their trust in God, who is a prop to sustain
even those who are feebler than our gentle
Adelheid
.
But we will not exaggerate the causes of
apprehension, which, after all, may pass away
like many other threatening dangers, and leave
us hours of felicitation and laughter in return for
a few minutes of fright.
Say, rather of thanksgiving, observed the
clavier, for the aspect of the heavens is getting
to be fearfully solemn. Thou, who art a mariner
hast thou nothing to suggest?
We have the simple expedient of our sweeps,
father; but, after neglecting their use so long, it
is now too late to have recourse to them. We
could not reach Vvey by such means, with this
bark loaded to the water's edge, before the night
would change, and, the water once fairly in
motion
,
they could not be used at all.
But we have our sails, put in the Genoese;
they at least may do us good service when the
wind shall come.
Maso shook his head, but he made no answer.
After a brief pause, in which he seemed to study
the heavens still more closely, he went to the spot
where the patron yet lay lost in sleep, and shook
him rudely.Ho! Baptiste! awake! there is
need here of thy counsel and of thy commands.
The drowsy owner of the bark rubbed his eyes,
and slowly regained the use of his faculties.
There is not a breath of wind, he muttered;
why didst awake me, Maso?One that hath
led thy life should know that sleep is sweet to
those who toil.
Ay, 'tis their advantage over the pampered
and idle. Look at the heavens, man, and let us
know what thou thinkest of their appearance. Is
there the stuff in thy Winkelried to ride out a
storm like this we may have to encounter?
Thou talkest like a foolish quean that has been
frightened by the fluttering of her own poultry.
The lake was never more calm, or the bark in
greater safety.
Dost see yonder bright light; here, over the
tower of thy Vvey church?
Ay, 'tis a gallant star! and a fair sign for the
mariner.
Fool, 'tis a hot flame in Roger de Blonay's
beacon. They begin to see that we are in
danger
on the shore, and they cast out their signals
to give us notice to be active. They think us
bestirring
ourselves like stout men, and those used
to the water, while, in truth, we are as
undisturbed
as if the bark were a rock that might
laugh at the Leman and its waves. The man is
benumbed, continued Maso, turning away
towards
the anxious listeners; he will not see that
which is getting to be but too plain to all the
others in his vessel.
Another idle and general laugh from the
forecastle
came to contradict this opinion of Maso's,
and to prove how easy it is for the ignorant to
exist in security, even on the brink of destruction.
This was the moment, when nature gave the first
of those signals that were intelligible to vulgar
capacities. The whole vault of the heavens was
now veiled, with the exception of the spot so often
named, which lay nearly above the brawling
torrents of the Rhone. This fiery opening
resembled
a window admitting of fearful glimpses
into the dreadful preparations that were
making
up among the higher peaks of the Alps. A
flash of red quivering light was emitted, and
a distant, rumbling rush, that was not thunder
but rather resembled the wheelings of a thousand
squadrons into line, followed the flash. The
forecastle was deserted to a man, and the hillock
of freight was again darkly seen peopled with
crouching human forms. Just then the bark
which had so long lain in a state of complete rest,
slowly and heavily raised its bows, as if laboring
under its great and unusual burthen, while a
sluggish
swell passed beneath its entire length, lifting
the whole mass, foot by foot, and passing away by
the stern, to cast itself on the shores of Vaud.
'Tis madness to waste the precious moments
longer! said Maso hurriedly, on whom this plain
and intelligent hint was not lost. Signori, we
must be bold and prompt, or we shall be
overtaken
by the tempest unprepared. I speak not for
myself, since, by the aid of this faithful dog, and
favored by my own arms, I have always the shore
for a hope. But there is one in the bark I would
wish to save, even at some hazard to myself.
Baptiste
is unnerved by fear, and we must act for
ourselves
or perish!
What wouldest thou? demanded the Signor
Grimaldi; he that can proclaim the danger
should have some expedient to divert it?
More timely exertion would have given us the
resource of ordinary means; but, like those who
die in their sins, we have foolishly wasted most
precious minutes. We must lighten the bark,
though it cost the whole of her freight.
A cry from Nicklaus Wagner announced that
the spirit of avarice was still active as ever in his
bosom. Even Baptiste, who had lost all his
dogmatism
and his disposition to command, under the
imposing omens which had now made themselves
apparent even to him, loudly joined in the protest
against this waste of property. It is rare that any
sudden and extreme proposal, like this of Maso's,
meets with a quick echo in the judgments of those
to whom the necessity is unexpectedly presented.
The danger did not seem sufficiently imminent to
have recourse to an expedient so decided; and,
though startled and aroused, the untamed spirits
of those who crowded the menaced pile were
rather in a state of uneasiness, than of that fierce
excitement to which they were so capable of
being
wrought, and which was in some degree
necessary
to induce even them, thriftless and
destitute
as they were, to be the agents of effecting so
great a destruction of property. The project of
the cool and calculating Maso would therefore
have failed entirely, but for another wheeling of
those airy squadrons, and a second wave which
lifted the groaning bark until the loosened yards
swung creaking above their heads. The canvass
flapped, too, in the darkness, like some huge bird
of prey fluttering its feathers previously to taking
wing.
Holy and just Ruler of the land and the sea!
exclaimed the Augustine, remember thy
repentant
children, and have us, at this awful moment,
in thy omnipotent protection!
The winds are come down, and even the dumb
lake sends us the signal to be ready! shouted
Maso. Overboard with the freight, if ye would
live!
A sudden heavy plunge into the water, proved
that the mariner was in earnest. Notwithstanding
the imposing and awful signs with which they
were surrounded, every individual of the nameless
herd bethought him of the pack that contained his
own scanty worldly effects, and there was a
general
and quick movement, with a view to secure
them. As each man succeeded in effecting his
own object, he was led away by that community
of feeling which rules a multitude. The common
rush was believed to be with a view to succor
Maso, though each man secretly knew the falsity
of the impression as respected his own particular
case; and box after box began to tumble into the
water, as new and eager recruits lent themselves
to the task. The impulse was quickly imparted
from one to another, until even young Sigismund
was active in the work. On these slight accidents
do the most important results depend, when the
hot impulses that govern the mass obtain the
ascendant
.
It is not to be supposed that either Baptiste, or
Nicklaus Wagner, witnessed the waste of their
joint effects with total indifference. So far from
this, each used every exertion in his power to
prevent
it, not only by his voice, but with his hands.
One menaced the lawthe other threatened Maso
with condign punishment for his interference with
a patron's rights and duties; but their
remonstrances
were uttered to inattentive ears. Maso
knew himself to be irresponsible by situation, for
it was not an easy matter to bring him within the
grasp of the authorities; and as for the others,
most of them were far too insignificant to feel
much apprehension for a reparation that would be
most likely, if it fell at all, to fall on those who
were more able to bear it. Sigismund alone
exerted
himself under a sense of his liabilities; but
he worked for one that was far dearer to him than
gold, and little did he bethink him of any other
consequences than those which might befall the
precious life of Adelheid de Willading.
The meagre packages of the common
passengers
had been thrown in a place of safety, with
the sort of unreflecting instinct with which we
take care of our limbs when in danger. This
timely precaution permitted each to work with a
zeal that found no drawback in personal interest,
and the effect was in proportion. A hundred hands
were busy, and nearly as many throbbing hearts
lent their impulses to the accomplishment of the
one important object.
Baptiste and his people, aided by laborers of the
Vol. I. K
port, had passed an entire day in heaping that pile
on the deck of the Winkelried, which was now
crumbling to pieces with a rapidity that seemed
allied to magic. The patron and Nicklaus
Wagner
bawled themselves hoarse, with uttering
useless
threats and deprecations, for by this time the
laborers in the work of destruction had received
some such impetus as the rolling stone acquires by
the increased momentum of its descent. Packages,
boxes, bales, and everything that came to hand,
were hurled into the water frantically, and
without
other thought than of the necessity of
lightening
the groaning bark of its burthen. The
agitation
of the lake, too, was regularly increasing,
wave following wave, in a manner to cause the
vessel to pitch heavily, as it rose upon the coming,
or sunk with the receding swell. At length, a
shout announced that, in one portion of the pile,
the deck was attained!
The work now proceeded with greater security
to those engaged, for, hitherto the motion of the
bark, and the unequal footing, frequently rendered
their situations, in the darkness and confusion, to
the last degree hazardous. Maso now abandoned
his own active agency in the toil, for no sooner
did he see the others fairly and zealously enlisted
in the undertaking, than he ceased his personal
efforts
to give those directions which, coming from
one accustomed to the occupation, were far more
valuable than any service that could be derived
from a single arm.
Thou art known to me, Signor Maso, said
Baptiste
,
hoarse with his impotent efforts to restrain
the torrent, and thou shalt answer for this, as
well as for other of thy crimes, so soon as we
reach the haven of Vvey!
Dotard! thou would'st carry thyself and all
with thee, by thy narrowness of spirit, to a port
from which, when it is once entered, none ever
sail again.
It lieth between ye both, rejoined Nicklaus
Wagner; thou art not less to blame than these
madmen, Baptiste. Hadst thou left the town at
the hour named in our conditions, this danger could
not have overtaken us.
Am I a god to command the winds! I would
that I had never seen thee or thy cheeses, or that
thou wouldst relieve me of thy presence, and go
after them into the lake.
This comes of sleeping on duty; nay, I know
not but that a proper use of the oars would still
bring us in, in safety, and without necessary harm
to the property of any. Noble Baron de
Willading
,
here may be occasion for your testimony,
and, as a citizen of Berne, I pray you to heed well
the circumstances.
Baptiste was not in a humor to bear these
merited
reproaches, and he rejoined upon the aggrieved
Nicklaus in a manner that would speedily have
brought their ill-timed wrangle to an issue, had not
Maso passed rudely between them, shoving them
asunder with the sinews of a giant. This repulse
served to keep the peace for the moment, but the
wordy war continued with so much acrimony, and
with so many unmeasured terms, that Adelheid
and her maids, pale and terror-struck by the
surrounding
scene as they were, gladly shut their
ears, to exclude epithets of such bitterness and
menace that they curdled the blood. Maso passed
on among the workmen, when he had interposed
between the disputants. He gave his orders with
perfect self-possession, though his understanding
eye perceived that, instead of magnifying the
danger
,
he had himself not fully anticipated its extent.
The rolling of the waves was now incessant, and
the quick, washing rush of the water, a sound
familiar
to the seaman, announced that they had
become
so large that their summits broke, sending
their lighter foam ahead. There were symptoms,
too, which proved that their situation was
understood
by those on the land. Lights were flashing
along the strand near Vvey, and it was not
difficult
to detect, even at the distance at which they
lay, the evidences of a strong feeling among the
people of the town.
I doubt not that we have been seen, said
Melchior de Willading, and that our friends are
busy in devising means to aid us. Roger de Blonay
is not a man to see us perish without an effort, nor
would the worthy bailiff, Peter Hofmeister, be idle,
knowing that a brother of the brgerschaft, and
an old school associate, hath need of his
assistance
.
None can come to us, without running an
equal risk with ourselves, answered the Genoese.
It were better that we should be left to our own
exertions. I like the coolness of this unknown
mariner, and I put my faith in God!
A new shout proclaimed that the deck had been
gained, on the other side of the bark. Much the
greater part of the deck-load had now
irretrievably
disappeared, and the movements of the relieved
vessel were more lively and sane. Maso called to
him one or two of the regular crew, and together
they rolled up the canvass, in a manner peculiar
to the latine rig; for a breath of hot air, the first
of any sort that had been felt for many hours,
passed athwart the bark. This duty was
performed
,
as canvass is known to be furled at need, but
it was done securely. Maso then went among the
laborers again, encouraging them with his voice,
and directing their efforts with his counsel.
Thou art not equal to thy task, he said,
addressing
one who was vainly endeavoring to roll
a bale to the side of the vessel, a little apart from
the rest of the busy crowd; thou wilt do better
to assist the others, than to waste thy force here.
I feel the strength to remove a mountain! Do
we not work for our lives?
The mariner bent forward, and looked into the
other's face. These frantic and ill-directed efforts
came from the Westphalian student.
Thy star has disappeared, he rejoined,
smiling
for
Maso had smiled in scenes far more
imposing, than even that with which he was now
surrounded.
She gazes at it still; she thinks of one that
loves her, who is journeying far from the
fatherland
.
Hold! Since thou wilt have it so, I will help
thee to cast this bale into the water. Place thine
arm thus; an ounce of well-directed force is worth
a pound that acts against itself.
Stooping together, their united strength did that
which had baffled the single efforts of the scholar.
The package rolled to the gangway, and the
German
,
frenzied with excitement, shouted aloud! The
bark lurched, and the bale went over the side, as
if the lifeless mass were suddenly possessed with
the desire to perform the evolution which its inert
weight had so long resisted. Maso recovered his
footing, which had been deranged by the
unexpected
movement, with a seaman's dexterity, but
his companion was no longer at his side. Kneeling
on the gangway, he perceived the dark bale
disappearing
in the element, with the feet of the
Westphalian
dragging after. He bent forward to grasp
the rising body, but it never returned to the
surface
,
being entangled in the cords, or, what was
equally probable, retained by the frantic grasp of
the student, whose mind had yielded to the awful
character of the night.
K 2
The life of Il Maledetto had been one of great
vicissitudes and peril. He had often seen men pass
suddenly into the other state of existence, and had
been calm himself amid the cries, the groans, and,
what is far more appalling, the execrations of the
dying, but never before had he witnessed so brief
and silent an end. For more than a minute, he
hung suspended over the dark and working water,
expecting to see the student return; and, when
hope was reluctantly abandoned, he arose to his
feet, a startled and admonished man. Still
discretion
did not desert him. He saw the
uselessness
,
and even the danger, of distracting the
attention
of the workmen, and the ill-fated scholar was
permitted to pass away without a word of regret
or a comment on his fate. None knew of his loss
but the wary mariner, nor was his person missed
by any of those who had spent the day in his
company
.
But she to whom he had plighted his faith
on the banks of the Elbe long gazed at that pale
star, and wept in bitterness that her feminine
constancy
met with no return. Her true affections
long outlived their object, for his image was
deeply
enshrined in a warm female heart. Days,
weeks, months, and years passed for her in the
wasting cheerlessness of hope deferred, but the
dark Leman never gave up its secret, and he to
whom her lover's fate alone was known little
bethought
him of an accident which, if not forgotten,
was but one of many similar frightful incidents in
his eventful career.
Maso re-appeared among the crowd, with the
forced composure of one who well knew that
authority
was most efficient when most calm. The
command of the vessel was now virtually with
him, Baptiste, enervated by the extraordinary
crisis
,
and choking with passion, being utterly
incapable
of giving a distinct or a useful order. It was
fortunate for those in the bark that the substitute
was so good, for more fearful signs never
impended
over the Leman than those which darkened the
hour.
We have necessarily consumed much time in
relating these events, the pen not equalling the
activity
of the thoughts. Twenty minutes, however,
had not passed since the tranquillity of the lake
was first disturbed, and so great had been the
exertions
of those in the Winkelried, that the time
appeared to be shorter. But, though it had been
so well employed, neither had the powers of the
air been idle. The unnatural opening in the
heavens
was shut, and, at short intervals, those
fearful
wheelings of the arial squadrons were
drawing
nearer. Thrice had fitful breathings of warm
air passed over the bark, and occasionally, as she
plunged into a sea that was heavier than common,
the faces of those on board were cooled, as it
might be with some huge fan. These were no
more, however, than sudden changes in the
atmosphere
,
of which veins were displaced by the
distant
struggle between the heated air of the lake
and that which had been chilled on the glaciers,
or, they were the still more simple result of the
violent agitation of the vessel.
The deep darkness which shut in the vault,
giving
to the embedded Leman the appearance of a
gloomy, liquid glen, contributed to the awful
sublimity
of the night. The ramparts of Savoy were
barely distinguishable from the flying clouds,
having
the appearance of black walls, seemingly
within
reach of the hand; while the more varied and
softer ctes of Vaud lay an indefinable and
sombre
mass, less menacing, it is true, but equally
confused and unattainable.
Still the beacon blazed in the grate of old Roger
de Blonay, and flaring torches glided along the
strand. The shore seemed alive with human
beings
,
able as themselves to appreciate and to feel
for their situation.
The deck was now cleared, and the travellers
were collected in a group between the masts
Pippo had lost all his pleasantry under the dread
signs of the hour, and Conrad, trembling with
superstition
and terror, was free from hypocrisy.
They, and those with them, discoursed on their
chances, on the nature of the risks they ran, and
on its probable causes.
I see no image of Maria, nor even a
pitiful
lamp to any of the blessed, in this accursed
bark! said the juggler, after several had
hazarded
their quaint and peculiar opinions. Let the
patron come forth, and answer for his
negligence
.
The passengers were about equally divided
between
those who dissented from and those who
worshipped with Rome. This proposal, therefore,
met with a mixed reception. The latter protested
against the neglect, while the former, equally
under
the influence of abject fear, were loud in
declaring
that the idolatry itself might cost them all
their lives.
The curse of heaven alight on the evil tongue
that first uttered the thought! muttered the
trembling
Pippo between his teeth, too prudent to fly
openly in the face of so strong an opposition, and
yet too credulous not to feel the omission in every
nerveHast nothing by thee, pious Conrad, that
may avail a Christian?
The pilgrim reached forth his hand with a
rosary
and cross. The sacred emblem passed from
mouth to mouth, among the believers, with a zeal
little short of that they had manifested in
unloading
the deck. Encouraged by this sacrifice, they
called loudly upon Baptiste to present himself.
Confronted with these unnurtured spirits, the
patron
shook in every limb, for, between anger and
abject fear, his self-command had by this time
absolutely
deserted him. To the repeated appeals to
procure a light, that it might be placed before a
picture of the mother of God which Conrad
produced
,
he objected his Protestant faith, the
impossibility
of maintaining the flame while the bark
pitched so violently, and the divided opinions of
the passengers. The Catholics bethought them of
the country and influence of Maso, and they
loudly
called upon him, for the love of God! to come
and enforce their requests. But the mariner was
occupied on the forecastle, lowering one anchor
after another into the water, passively assisted by
the people of the bark, who wondered at a
precaution
so useless, since no rope could reach the
bottom
,
even while they did not dare deny his orders.
Something was now said of the curse that had
alighted on the vessel, in consequence of its
patron's
intention to embark the headsman.
Baptiste
trembled to the skin of his crown, and his
blood crept with a superstitious awe.
Dost think there can really be aught in this!
he asked, with parched lips and a faltering
tongue.
All distinction of faith was lost in the general
ridicule. Now the Westphalian was gone, there
was not a man among them to doubt that a
navigation
,
so accompanied, would be cursed.
Baptiste
stammered, muttered many incoherent
sentences
,
and finally, in his impotency, he permitted
the dangerous secret to escape him.
The intelligence that Balthazar was among them
produced a solemn and deep silence. The fact,
however, furnished as conclusive evidence of the
cause of their peril to the minds of these untutored
beings, as a mathematician could have received
from the happiest of his demonstrations. New
light broke in upon them, and the ominous stillness
was followed by a general demand for the patron
to point out the man. Obeying this order, partly
under the influence of a terror that was allied to
his moral weakness, and partly in bodily fear, he
shoved the headsman forward, substituting the
person
of the proscribed man for his own, and,
profiting
by the occasion, he stole out of the crowd.
When the Herr Mller, or as he was now
known and called, Balthazar, was rudely pushed
into the hands of these ferocious agents of
superstition
,
the apparent magnitude of the discovery
induced a general and breathless pause. Like the
treacherous calm that had so long reigned upon
the lake, it was a precursor of a fearful and
violent
explosion. Little was said, for the occasion
was too ominous for a display of vulgar feeling, but
Conrad, Pippo, and one or two more, silently
raised
the fancied offender in their arms, and bore
him desperately towards the side of the bark.
Call on Maria, for the good of thy soul!
whispered the Neapolitan, with a strange mixture
of Christian zeal, in the midst of all his ferocity.
The sound of words like these usually conveys
the idea of charity and love, but, notwithstanding
this gleam of hope, Balthazar still found himself
borne towards his fate.
On quitting the throng that clustered together in
a dense body between the masts, Baptiste
encountered
his old antagonist, Nicklaus Wagner. The
fury which had so long been pent in his breast
suddenly
found vent, and, in the madness of the
moment
,
he struck him. The stout Bernese grappled
his assailant, and the struggle became fierce as
that of brutes. Scandalized by such a spectacle,
offended by the disrespect, and ignorant of what
else was passing nearfor the crowd had uttered
its resolutions in the suppressed voices of men
determined
the
Baron de Willading and the Signor
Grimaldi advanced with dignity and firmness to
prevent the shameful strife. At this critical
moment
the voice of Balthazar was heard above the
roar of the coming wind, not calling on Maria, as
he had been admonished, but appealing to the two
old nobles to save him. Sigismund sprang
forward
like a lion, at the cry, but too late to reach
those who were about to cast the headsman from
the gangway, he was just in time to catch the body,
by its garments, when actually sailing in the air.
By a vast effort of strength its direction was
diverted
.
Instead of alighting in the water,
Balthazar
encountered the angry combatants, who,
driven
back on the two nobles, forced the whole four
over the side of the bark into the water.
The struggle between the two bodies of air
ceased, that on the surface of the lake yielding
to the avalanche from above, and the tempest came
howling upon the bark.
CHAPTER VII.
and now the glee
Of the loud hills shakes with their mountain-mirth.
Byron
.
It is necessary to recapitulate a little, in order
to connect events. The signs of the hour had
been gradually but progressively increasing. While
the lake was unruffled, a stillness so profound
prevailed
,
that sounds from the distant port, such as
the heavy fall of an oar, or a laugh from the
waterman
,
had reached the ears of those in the
Winkelried
,
bringing with them the feeling of security,
and the strong charm of a calm at even. To
these succeeded the gathering in the heavens, and
the roaring of the winds, as they came rushing
down the sides of the Alps, in their first descent
into the basin of the Leman. As the sight grew
useless, except as it might study the dark omens
of the impending vault, the sense of hearing
became
doubly acute, and it had been a powerful
agent in heightening the vague but acute
apprehensions
of the travellers. The rushes of the
wind, which at first were broken, at intervals
resembling
the roar of a chimney-top in a gale, had
soon reached the fearful grandeur of those arial
wheelings of squadrons, to which we have more
than once alluded, passing off in dread mutterings,
that, in the deep quiet of all other things, bore a
close affinity to the rumbling of a surf upon the
sea-shore. The surface of the lake was first
broken
after one of these symptoms, and it was this
infallible sign of a gale which had assured Maso
there was no time to lose. This movement of the
element in a calm is a common phenomenon on
waters that are much environed with elevated and
irregular head-lands, and it is a certain proof that
wind is on some distant portion of the sheet. It
occurs frequently on the ocean, too, where the
mariner is accustomed to find a heavy sea setting
in one direction, the effects of some distant storm,
while the breeze around him is blowing in its
opposite
.
It had been succeeded by the single
rolling
swell, like the outer circle of waves produced
by dropping a stone into the water, and the
regular
and increasing agitation of the lake, until the
element broke as in a tempest, and that seemingly
of its own volition, since not a breath of air was
stirring. This last and formidable symptom of
the force of the coming gust, however, had now
become so unequivocal, that, at the moment when
the three travellers and the patron fell from her
gangway, the Winkelried, to use a seaman's
phrase, was literally wallowing in the troughs of
the seas.
A dull unnatural light preceded the winds, and
notwithstanding the previous darkness, the nature
of the accident was fully apparent to all. Even
the untamed spirits that had just been bent upon
so fierce a sacrifice to their superstitious dread,
uttered cries of horror, while the piercing shriek
of Adelheid sounded, in that fearful moment, as
if beings of super-human attributes were riding in
the gale. The name of Sigismund was heard,
too, in one of those wild appeals that the frantic
suffer to escape them, in their despair. But the
interval between the plunge into the water and the
swoop of the tempest was so short, that, to the
senses of the travellers, the whole seemed the
occurrence
of the same teeming moment.
Maso had completed his work on the forecastle,
had seen that other provisions which he had
ordered
were duly made, and had reached the tiller,
just in time to witness and to understand all that
occurred. Adelheid and her female attendants
were already lashed to the principal masts, and
ropes were given to the others around her, as
indispensable
precautions; for the deck of the bark,
now cleared of every particle of its freight, was
as exposed and as defenceless against the power
of the wind, as a naked heath. Such was the
situation
of the Winkelried, when the omens of the
night changed to their dread reality.
Instinct, in cases of sudden and unusual danger
must do the office of reason. There was no
necessity
to warn the unthinking but panic-struck
crowd to provide for their own safety, for every
man in the centre of the barge threw his body flat
Vol. I. L
on the deck, and grasped the cords that Maso had
taken care to provide for that purpose, with the
tenacity with which all who possess life cling to
the means of existence. The dogs gave beautiful
proofs of the secret and wonderful means that
nature
has imparted, to answer the ends of their
creation. Old Uberto crouched, cowering, and
oppressed with a sense of helplessness, at the side
of his master, while the Newfoundland follower of
the mariner went leaping from gangway to
gangway
,
snuffing the heated air, and barking wildly,
as if he would challenge the elements to close for
the strife.
A vast body of warm air had passed unheeded
athwart the bark, during the minute that preceded
the intended sacrifice of Balthazar. It was the
forerunner of the hurricane, which had chased it
from the bed where it had been sleeping, since the
warm and happy noon-tide. Ten thousand
chariots
at their speed could not have equalled the
rumbling that succeeded, when the winds came
booming over the lake. As if too eager to permit
anything within their fangs to escape, they brought
with them a wild, dull light, which filled while it
clouded the atmosphere, and which, it was
scarcely
fanciful to imagine, had been hurried down, in
their vortex, from those chill glaciers, where they
had so long been condensing their forces for the
present descent. The waves were not increased,
but depressed by the pressure of this atmospheric
column, though it took up hogshead, of water from
their crests, scattering it in fine penetrating spray,
till the entire space between the heavens and the
earth seemed saturated with its particles.
The Winkelried received the shock at a moment
when the lee-side of her broad deck was
wallowing
in the trough, and its weather was protruded
on the summit of a swell. The wind howled,
when it struck the pent limits, as if angered at being
thwarted, and there was a roar under the wide
gangways, resembling that of lions. The reeling
vessel was raised in a manner to cause those on
board to believe it about to be lifted bodily from
the water, but the ceaseless rolling of the element
restored the balance. Maso afterwards affirmed
that nothing but this accidental position, which
formed a sort of lee, prevented all in the bark from
being swept from the deck, before the first gust of
the hurricane.
Sigismund had heard the heart-rending appeal
of Adelheid, and, notwithstanding the awful strife
of the elements and the fearful character of the
night, he alone breasted the shock on his feet.
Though aided by a rope, and bowed like a reed,
his herculean frame trembled under the shock, in a
way to render even his ability to resist seriously
doubtful. But, the first blast expended, he sprang
to the gangway, and leaped into the cauldron of
the lake unhesitatingly, and yet in the possession
of all his faculties. He was desperately bent on
saving a life so dear to Adelheid, or on dying in
the attempt.
Maso had watched the crisis with a seaman's
eye, a seaman's resources, and a seaman's
coolness
.
He had not refused to quit his feet, but
kneeling on one knee, he pressed the tiller down,
lashed it, and clinging to the massive timber, faced
the tempest with the steadiness of a water-god.
There was sublimity in the intelligence,
deliberation
,
and calculating skill, with which this solitary,
unknown, and nearly hopeless, mariner obeyed his
professional instinct, in that fearful concussion of
the elements, which, loosened from every restraint,
now appeared abandoned to their own wild and
fierce will. He threw aside his cap, pushed
forward
his thick but streaming locks, as veils to
protect
his eyes, and watched the first encounter of
the wind, as the wary but sullen lion keeps his gaze
on the hostile elephant. A grim smile stole across
his features, when he felt the vessel settle again
into its watery bed, after that breathless moment
in which there had been reason to fear it might
actually be lifted from its proper element. Then
the precaution, which had seemed so useless and
incomprehensible to others, came in play. The
bark made a fearful whirl from the spot where it
had so long lain, yielding to the touch of the gust
like a vane turning on its pivot, while the water
gurgled several streaks on deck. But the cables
were no sooner taut than the numerous anchors
resisted, and brought the bark head to wind. Maso
felt the yielding of the vessel's stern, as she swung
furiously round, and he cheered aloud. The
trembling of the timbers, the dashing against the
pointed beak, and that high jet of water, which shot
up over the bows and fell heavily on the
forecastle
,
washing aft in a flood, were so many
evidences
that the cables were true. Advancing from
his post, with some such dignity as a master of
fence displays in the exercise of his art, he
shouted
for his dog.
Nettuno!Nettuno!where art thou, brave
Nettuno?
The faithful animal was whining near him,
unheard
in that war of the elements. He waited only
for this encouragement to act. No sooner was
his master's voice heard, than, barking bravely, he
snuffed the gale, dashed to the side of the vessel,
and leaped into the boiling lake.
When Melchior de Willading and his friend
returned
to the surface, after their plunge, it was
like men making their appearance in a world
abandoned
to the infernal humors of the fiends of
darkness
.
The reader will understand it was at the
instant of the swoop of the winds, that has just
been detailed, for what we have taken so many
pages to describe in words, scarce needed a
minute
of time in the accomplishment.
Maso knelt on the verge of the gangway,
sustaining
himself by passing an arm around a shroud,
and, bending forward, he gazed into the cauldron
of the lake with aching eyes. Once or twice, he
thought he heard the stifled breathing of one who
struggled with the raging water; but, in that roar
of the winds, it was easy to be deceived. He
shouted encouragement to his dog, however, and
gathering a small rope rapidly, he made a heaving
coil of one of its ends. This he cast far from him,
with a peculiar swing and dexterity, hauling-in,
and repeating the experiments, steadily and with
unwearied industry. The rope was necessarily
thrown at hazard, for the misty light prevented
more than it aided vision; and the howling of the
powers of the air filled his ears with sounds that
resembled the laugh of devils.
In the cultivation of the youthful manly
exercises
,
neither of the old nobles had neglected the
useful skill of being able to buffet with the waves.
But both possessed what was far better, in such
a strait, than the knowledge of a swimmer, in that
self-command and coolness in emergencies which
they are apt to acquire, who pass their time in
encountering
the hazards and in overcoming the
difficulties of war. Each retained a sufficiency
of recollection, therefore, on coming to the surface,
to understand his situation, and not to increase the
danger by the ill-directed and frantic efforts that
usually drown the frightened. The case was
sufficiently
desperate, at the best, without the
additional
risk of distraction, for the bark had already
drifted to some unseen spot, that, as respects them,
was quite unattainable. In this uncertainty, it
L 2
would have been madness to steer amid the waste
of waters, as likely to go wrong as right, and they
limited their efforts to mutual support and
encouragement
,
placing their trust in God.
Not so with Sigismund. To him the roaring
tempest was mute, the boiling and hissing lake had
no horrors, and he had plunged into the fathomless
Leman as recklessly as he could have leaped to
land. The shriek, the Sigismund! oh,
Sigismund
!
of Adelheid, was in his ears, and her cry
of anguish thrilled on every nerve. The athletic
young Swiss was a practised and expert swimmer,
or it is improbable that even these strong impulses
could have overcome the instinct of
self-preservation
.
In a tranquil basin, it would have been
no extraordinary or unusual feat for him to
conquer
the distance between the Winkelried and the
shores of Vaud; but, like all the others, on casting
himself into the water, he was obliged to shape
his course at random, and this, too, amid such a
driving spray as rendered even respiration difficult.
As has been said, the waves were compressed into
their bed rather than augmented by the wind; but,
had it been otherwise, the mere heaving and
settling
of the element, while it obstructs his speed,
offers a support rather than an obstacle to the
practised swimmer.
Notwithstanding all these advantages, the
strength of his impulses, and the numberless
occasions
on which he had breasted the surges of the
Mediterranean, Sigismund, on recovering from his
plunge, felt the fearful chances of the risk he ran,
as the stern soldier meets the hazards of battle, in
which he knows if there is victory there is also
death. He dashed the troubled water aside, though
he swam blindly, and each stroke urged him farther
from the bark, his only hope of safety. He was
between dark rolling mounds, and, on rising to
their summits, a hurricane of mist made him glad
to sink again within a similar shelter. The
breaking
crests of the waves, which were glancing off
in foam, also gave him great annoyance, for such
was their force, that, more than once, he was
hurled
helpless as a log before them. Still he swam
boldly, and with strength; nature having gifted
him with more than the usual physical energy of
man. But, uncertain in his course, unable to see
the length of his own body, and pressed hard upon
by the wind, even the spirit of Sigismund
Steinbach
could not long withstand so many adverse
circumstances. He had already turned, wavering
in purpose, thinking to catch a glimpse of the bark
in the direction he had come, when a dark mass
floated immediately before his eyes, and he felt
the cold clammy nose of the dog, scenting about
his face. The admirable instinct, or we might
better say, the excellent training of Nettuno, told
him that his services were not needed here, and,
barking with wild delight, as if in mockery of the
infernal din of the tempest, he sheered aside, and
swam swiftly on. A thought flashed like lightning
on the brain of Sigismund. His best hope was in
the inexplicable faculties of this animal. Throwing
forward an arm, he seized the bushy tail of the
dog, and suffered himself to be dragged ahead, he
knew not whither, though he seconded the
movement
with his own exertions. Another bark
proclaimed
that the experiment was successful, and
voices, rising as it were from the water, close at
hand, announced the proximity of human beings.
The brunt of the hurricane was past, and the
washing of the waves, which had been stilled by
the roar and the revelry of the winds, again
became
audible.
The strength of the two struggling old men was
sinking fast. The Signor Grimaldi had, thus far,
generously sustained his friend, who was less
expert
than himself in the water, and he continued
to cheer him with a hope he did not feel himself,
nobly refusing to the last to separate their fortunes.
How dost find thyself, old Melchior? he
asked
.
Cheer thee, friendI think there is
succor
at hand.
The water gurgled at the mouth of the baron,
who was near the gasp.
'Tis latebless thee, dearest GaetanoGod
be with my childmy Adelheidpoor Adelheid!
The utterance of this precious name, under a
father's agony of spirit, most probably saved his
life. The sinewy arm of Sigismund, directed by
the words, grasped his dress, and he felt at once
that a new and preserving power had interposed
between him and the caverns of the lake. It was
time, for the water had covered the face of the
failing baron, ere the muscular arm of the youth
came to perform its charitable office.
Yield thee to the dog, Signore, said
Sigismund
,
clearing his mouth of water to speak
calmly
,
once assured of his own burthen; trust to his
sagacity, and,God keep us in mind!all may
yet be well!
The Signor Grimaldi retained sufficient presence
of mind to follow this advice, and it was probably
quite as fortunate that his friend had so far lost his
consciousness, as to become an unresisting burthen
in the hands of Sigismund.
Nettuno!gallant Nettuno!swept past them
on the gale for the first time, the partial hushing of
the winds permitting the clear call of Maso to reach
so far. The sound directed the efforts of
Sigismund
,
though the dog had swum steadily away
the moment he had the Genoese in his gripe, and
with a certainty of manner that showed he was at
no loss for a direction.
But Sigismund had taxed his powers too far.
He, who could have buffeted an ordinary sea for
hours, was now completely exhausted by the
unwonted
exertions, the deadening influence of the
tempest, and the log-like weight of his burthen.
He would not desert the father of Adelheid, and
yet each fainting and useless stroke told him to
despair. The dog had already disappeared in the
darkness, and he was even uncertain again of the
true position of the bark. He prayed in agony for
a single glimpse of the rocking masts and yards,
or to catch one syllable of the cheering voice of
Maso. But in both his wishes were vain. In place
of the former, he had naught but the veiled misty
light, that had come on with the hurricane; and,
instead of the latter, his ears were filled with the
washing of the waves and the roars of the gusts.
The blasts now descended to the surface of the
lake, and now went whirling and swelling upward,
in a way to lead the listener to fancy that the
viewless winds might, for once, be seen. For a
single painful instant, in one of those
disheartening
moments of despair that will come over the
stoutest, his hand was about to relinquish its hold
of the baron, and to make the last natural struggle
for life; but that fair and modest picture of maiden
loveliness and truth, which had so long haunted his
waking hours and adorned his night-dreams,
interposed
to prevent the act. After this brief and
fleeting weakness, the young man seemed endowed
with new energy. He swam stronger, and with
greater apparent advantage, than before.
Nettunogallant Nettuno!again drove over
him, bringing with it the chilling certainty, that,
turned from his course by the rolling of the water,
he had thrown away these desperate efforts, by
taking a direction which led him from the bark.
While there was the smallest appearance of success,
no difficulties, of whatever magnitude, could
entirely
extinguish hope; but when the dire conviction
that he had been actually aiding, instead of
diminishing
,
the danger, pressed upon Sigismund, he
abandoned his efforts. The most he endeavored
or hoped to achieve, was to keep his own head and
that of his companion above the fatal element,
while he answered the cry of Maso with a shout
of despair.
Nettuno!gallant Nettuno!again flew past
on the gale.
This cry might have been an answer, or it might
merely be the Italian encouraging his dog to bear
on the body, with which it was already loaded.
Sigismund uttered a shout, which he felt must be
the last. He struggled desperately, but in vain:
the world and its allurements were vanishing from
his thoughts, when a dark line whirled over him,
and fell thrashing upon the very wave which
covered
his face. An instinctive grasp caught it, and
the young soldier felt himself impelled ahead. He
had seized the rope which the mariner had not
ceased
to throw, as the fisherman casts his line, and he
was at the side of the bark, before his confused
faculties enabled him to understand the means
employed for his rescue.
Maso took a hasty turn with the rope, and,
stooping
forward, favored by a roll of the vessel, he
drew the Baron de Willading upon deck.
Watching
his time, he repeated the experiment, always with
admirable coolness and dexterity, placing
Sigismund
also in safety. The former was
immediately
dragged senseless to the centre of the bark,
where he received those attentions that had just
been eagerly offered to the Signior Grimaldi, and
with the same happy results. But Sigismund
motioned all away from himself, knowing that
their cares were needed elsewhere. He staggered
forward a few paces, and then, yielding to a
complete
exhaustion of his power, he fell at full length
on the wet planks. He long lay panting,
speechless
,
and unable to move, with a sense of death on
his frame.
Nettuno! gallant, gallant Nettuno!shouted
the indefatigable Maso, still at his post on the
gangway
,
whence he cast his rope with unchanging
perseverance. The fitful winds, which had already
played so many fierce antics that eventful night,
sensibly lulled, and, giving one or two sighs, as if
regretting that they were about to be curbed again
by that almighty Master, from whose benevolent
hands they had so furtively escaped, as suddenly
ceased blowing. The yards creaked, swinging
loosely above the crowded deck, and the dull
washing
of water filled the ear. To these diminished
sounds were to be added the barking of the dog,
who was still abroad in the darkness, and a
struggling
noise like the broken and smothered attempts
of human voices. Although the time appeared an
age to all who awaited the result, scarcely five
minutes had elapsed since the accident occurred
and the hurricane had reached them. There was
still hope, therefore, for those who yet remained
in the water. Maso felt the eagerness of one who
had already been successful beyond his hopes, and,
in his desire to catch some guiding signal, he leaned
forward, till the rolling lake washed into his face.
Ha! gallantgallant Nettuno!
Men certainly spoke, and that near him. But
the sounds resembled words uttered beneath a
cover. The wind whistled, too, though but for a
moment, and then it seemed to sail upward into
the dark vault of the heavens. Nettuno barked
audibly, and his master answered with another
shout, for the sympathy of man in his kind is
inextinguishable.
My brave, my noble Nettuno!
The stillness was now imposing, and Maso
heard the dog growl. This ill-omened signal
was undeniably followed by smothered voices.
The latter became clearer, as if the mocking winds
were willing that a sad exhibition of human frailty
should be known, or, what is more probable,
violent
passion had awakened stronger powers of
speech. This much the mariner understood.
Loosen thy grasp, accursed Baptiste!
Wretch, loosen thine own!
Is God naught with thee?
Why dost throttle so, infernal Nicklaus?
Thou wilt die damned!
Thou chokestvillainpardon!pardon!
He heard no more. The merciful elements
interposed
to drown the appalling strife. Once or
twice the dog howled, but the tempest came across
the Leman again in its might, as if the short pause
had been made merely to take breath. The winds
took a new direction; and the bark, still held by
its anchors, swung wide off from its former
position
,
tending in towards the mountains of Savoy.
During the first burst of this new blast, even Maso
was glad to crouch to the deck, for millions of
infinitely
fine particles were lifted from the lake, and
driven on with the atmosphere with a violence to
take away his breath. The danger of being swept
before the furious tide of the driving element was
also an accident not impossible. When the lull
returned, no exertion of his faculties could catch a
single sound foreign to the proper character of
the scene, such as the plash of the water, and the
creaking of the long, swinging yards.
The mariner now felt a deep concern for his
dog He called to him until he grew hoarse, but
fruitlessly. The change of position, with the
constant
and varying drift of the vessel, had carried
them beyond the reach of the human voice. More
time was expended in summoning Nettuno!
gallant
Nettuno! than had been consumed in the
passage
of all the events which it has been necessary
to our object to relate so minutely, and always
with the same want of success. The mind of Maso
was pitched to a degree far above the opinions and
habits of those with whom his life brought him
ordinarily
in contact, but as even fine gold will
become
tarnished by exposure to impure air, he had
not entirely escaped the habitual weaknesses of the
Italians of his class. When he found that no cry
could recall his faithful companion, he threw
himself
upon the deck in a paroxysm of passion, tore
his hair, and wept audibly.
Nettuno! my brave, my faithful Nettuno! he
said. What are all these to me, without thee!
Thou alone lovedst methou alone hast passed
with me through fair and foulthrough good and
evil, without change, or wish for another master!
When the pretended friend has been false, thou hast
remained faithful! When others were sycophants,
thou wert never a flatterer!
Struck with this singular exhibition of sorrow,
the good Augustine, who, until now, like all the
others, had been looking to his own safety, or
employed
in restoring the exhausted, took advantage
of the favorable change in the weather, and
advanced
with the language of consolation.
Thou hast saved all our lives, bold mariner,
he said; and there are those in the bark who
will know how to reward thy courage and skill.
Forget, then, thy dog, and indulge in a grateful
heart to Maria and the saints, that they have been
our friends and thine in this exceeding jeopardy.
Father, I have eaten with the animalslept
with the animalfought, swum, and made merry
with him, and I could now drown with him! What
Vol. I. M
are thy nobles and their gold to me, without my
dog? The gallant brute will die the death of
despair
,
swimming about in search of the bark in the
midst of the darkness, until even one of his high
breed and courage must suffer his heart to burst.
Christians have been called into the dread
presence, unconfessed and unshrived, to-night; and
we should bethink us of their souls, rather than
indulge
in this grief in behalf of one that, however
faithful, ends but an unreasoning and irresponsible
existence.
All this was thrown away upon Maso, who
crossed
himself habitually at the allusion to the drowned,
but who did not the less bewail the loss of his dog,
whom he seemed to love, like the affection that
David bore for Jonathan, with a love surpassing
that of women. Perceiving that his counsel was
useless, the good Augustine turned away, to kneel
and offer up his own orisons of gratitude, and to
bethink him of the dead.
Nettuno!
povera, carissima bestia!
continued
Maso, whither art thou swimming, in this infernal
quarrel between the air and water? Would I were
with thee, dog! No mortal shall ever share the love
I bore thee,
povero Nettuno!
I will never take
another to my heart, like thee!
The outbreaking of Maso's grief was sudden,
and it was brief in its duration. In this respect
it might be likened to the hurricane that had just
passed. Excessive violence, in both cases,
appeared
to bring its own remedy, for the irregular
fitful gusts from the mountains had already ceased,
and were succeeded by a strong but steady gale
from the north; and the sorrow of Maso soon
ended its characteristic plaints, to take a more
continued and even character.
During the whole of the foregoing scenes, the
common passengers had crouched to the deck,
partly in stupor, partly in superstitious dread, and,
much of the time, from a positive inability to move,
without incurring the risk of being driven from
the defenceless vessel into the lake. But, as the
wind diminished in force, and the motion of the
bark became more regular, they rallied their
senses, like men who had been in a trance, and
one by one they rose to their feet. About this time
Adelheid heard the sound of her father's voice,
blessing her care, and consoling her sorrow. The
north wind blew away the canopy of clouds, and
the stars shone upon the angry Leman, bringing
with them some such promise of divine aid as the
pillar of fire afforded to the Israelites in their
passage
of the Red Sea. Such an evidence of
returning
peace brought renewed confidence. All in the
bark, passengers as well as crew, took courage at
the benignant signs, while Adelheid wept, in
gratitude
and joy, over the gray hairs of her father.
Maso had now obtained complete command of
the Winkelried, as much by the necessity of the
case, as by the unrivalled skill and courage he had
manifested during the fearful minutes of their
extreme
jeopardy. No sooner did he succeed in
staying
his own grief, than he called the people about
him, and issued his orders for the new measures
that had become necessary.
All who have ever been subject to their
influence
know that there is nothing more uncertain
than the winds. Their fickleness has passed into
a proverb; but their inconstancy, as well as their
power, from the fanning air to the destructive
tornado
,
are to be traced to causes that are
sufficiently
clear, though hid in their nature from the
calculations of our forethought. The tempest of
the night was owing to the simple fact, that a
condensed
and chilled column of the mountains had
pressed upon the heated substratum of the lake,
and the latter, after a long resistance, suddenly
finding vent for its escape, had been obliged to let
in the cataract from above. As in all
extraordinary
efforts, whether physical or moral, reaction
would seem to be a consequence of excessive
action
,
the currents of air, pushed beyond their proper
limits, were now setting back again, like a tide on
its reflux. This cause produced the northern gale
that succeeded the hurricane.
The wind that came from off the shores of Vaud
was steady and fresh. The barks of the Leman
are not constructed for beating to windward, and
it might even have been questioned, whether the
Winkelried would have borne her canvass against
so heavy a breeze. Maso, however, appeared to
understand himself thoroughly, and as he had
acquired
the influence which hardihood and skill are
sure to obtain over doubt and timidity in situations
of hazard, he was obeyed by all on board with
submission, if not with zeal. No more was heard
of the headsman or of his supposed agency in the
storm; and, as he prudently kept himself in the
back-ground, so as not to endanger a revival of
the superstition of his enemies, he seemed entirely
forgotten.
The business of getting the anchors occupied a
considerable time, for Maso refused, now there
existed no necessity for the sacrifice, to permit a
yarn to be cut; but, released from this hold on the
water, the bark whirled away, and was soon
driving
before the wind. The mariner was at the
helm, and, causing the head-sail to be loosened, he
steered directly for the rocks of Savoy. This
manuvre excited disagreeable suspicions in the
minds of several on board, for the lawless
character
of their pilot had been more than suspected in
the course of their short acquaintance, and the
coast towards which they were furiously rushing
was known to be iron-bound, and, in such a gale,
fatal to all who came rudely upon its rocks.
Half-an-hour
removed their apprehensions. When near
enough to the mountains to feel their deadening
influence on the gale, the natural effect of the
eddies
,
formed by their resistance to the currents, he
luffed-to and set his main-sail. Relieved by this
wise precaution, the Winkelried now wore her
canvass gallantly, and she dashed along the shore
of Savoy with a foaming beak, shooting past
ravine
,
valley, glen, and hamlet, as if sailing in air.
In less than an hour, St. Gingoulph, or the
village
through which the dividing line between the
territories of Switzerland and those of the King
of Sardinia passes, was abeam, and the excellent
calculations of the sagacious Maso became still
more apparent. He had foreseen another shift of
wind, as the consequence of all this poise and
counterpoise
,
and he was here met by the true breeze
of the night. The last current came out of the
gorge of the Valais, sullen, strong, and hoarse,
bringing him, however, fairly to windward of his
port. The Winkelried was cast in season, and,
when the gale struck her anew, her canvass drew
fairly, and she walked out from beneath the
mountains
into the broad lake, like a swan obeying its
instinct.
The passage across the width of the Leman, in
that horn of the crescent and in such a breeze,
required
rather more than an hour. This time was
occupied among the common herd in
self-felicitations
,
and in those vain boastings that distinguish
the vulgar who have escaped an imminent danger
without any particular merit of their own. Among
those whose spirits were better trained and more
rebuked, there were attentions to the sufferers and
deep thanksgivings with the touching intercourse
of the grateful and happy. The late scenes, and
M 2
the fearful fate of the patron and Nicholaus
Wagner
,
cast a shade upon their joy, but all inwardly
felt that they had been snatched from the jaws of
death.
Maso shaped his course by the beacon that still
blazed in the grate of old Roger de Blonay. With
his eye riveted on the luff of his sail, his hip
bearing
hard against the tiller, and a heart that relieved
itself, from time to time, with bitter sighs, he ruled
the bark like a presiding spirit.
At length the black mass of the ctes of Vaud
took more distinct and regular forms. Here and
there, a tower or a tree betrayed its outlines
against the sky, and then the objects on the
margin
of the lake began to stand out in gloomy relief
from the land. Lights flared along the strand, and
cries reached them from the shore. A dark
shapeless
pile stood directly atwhart their watery path,
and, at the next moment, it took the aspect of a
ruined castle-like edifice. The canvass flapped
and was handed, the Winkelried rose and set more
slowly and with a gentler movement, and glided
into the little, secure, artificial haven of La Tour
de Peil. A forest of latine yards and low masts
lay before them, but, by giving the bark a rank
sheer, Maso brought her to her berth, by the side
of another lake craft, with a gentleness of collision
that, as the mariners have it, would not have
broken
an egg.
A hundred voices greeted the travellers; for
their approach had been seen and watched with
intense anxiety. Fifty eager Vvaisans poured
upon her deck, in a noisy crowd, the instant it
was possible. Among others, a dark shaggy
object
bounded foremost. It leaped wildly forward,
and Maso found himself in the embraces of
Nettuno
.
A little later, when delight and a more
tempered feeling permitted examination, a lock of
human hair was discovered entangled in the teeth
of the dog, and the following week the bodies of
Baptiste and the peasant of Berne were found,
still clenched in the desperate death-gripe, washed
upon the shores of Vaud.
CHAPTER VIII.
The moon is up; by Heaven a lovely eve!
Long streams of light o'er glancing waves expand;
Now lads on shore may sigh and maids believe:
Such be our fate when we return to land!
Byron
.
The
approach of the Winkelried had been seen
from Vvey throughout the afternoon and evening.
The arrival of the Baron de Willading and his
daughter was expected by many in the town, the
rank and influence of the former in the great
canton
rendering him an object of interest to more
than those who felt affection for his person and
respect for his upright qualities. Roger de Blonay
had not been his only youthful friend, for the place
contained another, with whom he was intimate by
habit, if not from a community of those principles
which are the best cement of friendships.
The officer charged with the especial
supervision
of the districts or circles, into which Berne
had caused its dependent territory of Vaud to be
divided, was termed a
bailli
, a title that our word
bailiff will scarcely render, except as it may strictly
mean a substitute for the exercise of authority that
is the property of another, but which, for the want
of a better term, we may be compelled
occasionally
to use. The bailli, or bailiff, of Vvey was
Peter Hofmeister, a member of one of those
families
of the brgerschaft, or the municipal
aristocracy
of the canton, which found its institutions
venerable, just, and, and if one might judge from
their language, almost sacred, simply because it
had been in possession of certain exclusive
privileges
under their authority, that were not only
comfortable
in their exercise but fecund in other
worldly
advantages. This Peter Hofmeister was, in the
main, a hearty, well-meaning, and somewhat
benevolent
person, but, living as he did under the secret
consciousness that all was not as it should be, he
pushed his opinions on the subject of vested
interests
,
and on the stability of temporal matters, a
little into extremes, pretty much on the same
principle
as that on which the engineer expends the
largest portion of his art in fortifying the weakest
point of the citadel, taking care that there shall be
a constant flight of shot, great and small, across
the most accessible of its approaches. By one of
the exclusive ordinances of those times, in which
men were glad to get relief from the violence and
rapacity of the baron and the satellite of the prince,
ordinances that it was the fashion of the day to
term liberty, the family of Hofmeister had come
into the exercise of a certain charge, or monopoly,
that, in truth, had always constituted its wealth
and importance, but of which it was accustomed
to speak as forming its principal claim to the
gratitude
of the public, for duties that had been
performed
not only so well, but for so long a period,
by an unbroken succession of patriots descended
from the same stock. They who judged of the
value attached to the possession of this charge, by
the animation with which all attempts to relieve
them of the burthen were repelled, must have been
in error; for, to hear their friends descant on the
difficulties of the duties, of the utter impossibility
that they should be properly discharged by any
family that had not been in their exercise just one
hundred and seventy-two years and a half, the
precise
period of the hard servitude of the
Hofmeisters
,
and the rare merit of their self-devotion to
the common good, it would seem that they were
so many modern Curtii, anxious to leap into the
chasm of uncertain and endless toil, to save the
Republic from the ignorance and peculations of
certain interested and selfish knaves, who wished
to enjoy the same high trusts, for a motive so
unworthy
as that of their own particular advantage.
This subject apart, however, and with a strong
reservation in favor of the supremacy of Berne,
on whom his importance depended, a better or a
more philanthropic man than Peter Hofmeister
would not have been easily found. He was a
hearty
laugher, a hard drinker, a common and peculiar
failing of the age, a great respecter of the law, as
was meet in one so situated, and a bachelor of
sixty-eight, a time of life that, by referring his
education
to a period more remote by half a century,
than that in which the incidents of our legend took
place, was not at all in favor of any very romantic
predilection in behalf of the rest of the human
race. In short, the Herr Hofmeister was a bailiff,
much as Balthazar was a headsman, on account
of some particular merit or demerit, (it might now
be difficult to say which,) of one of his ancestors,
by the laws of the canton, and by the opinions of
men. The only material difference between them
was in the fact, that the one greatly enjoyed his
station, while the other had but an indifferent relish
for his trust.
When Roger de Blonay, by the aid of a good
glass, had assured himself that the bark which lay
off St. Saphorin, in the even tide, with yards
acock-bill
,
and sails pendent in their picturesque
drapery, contained a party of gentle travellers
who occupied the stern, and saw by the plumes
and robes that a female of condition was among
them, he gave an order to prepare the beacon-fire,
and descended to the port, in order to be in
readiness
to receive his friend. Here he found the
bailiff
,
pacing the public promenade, which is washed
by the limpid water of the lake, with the air of a
man who had more on his mind than the daily
cares of office. Although the Baron de Blonay
was a Vaudois, and looked upon all the
functionaries
of his country's conquerors with a species of
hereditary dislike, he was by nature a man of mild
and courteous qualities, and the meeting was, as
usual, friendly in the externals, and of seeming
cordiality. Great care was had by both to speak
in the second person; on the part of the Vaudois,
that it might be seen he valued himself as, at least,
the equal of the representative of Berne, and, on
that of the bailiff, in order to show that his office
made him as good as the head of the oldest house
in all that region.
Thou expectest to see friends from Genf in
yonder bark? said the Herr Hofmeister,
abruptly
.
And thou?
A friend, and one more than a friend;
answered
the bailiff, evasively. My advices tell
me that Melchior de Willading will sojourn among
us during the festival of the Abbaye, and secret
notice has been sent that there will be another
here, who wishes to see our merry-making,
without
pretension to the honors that he might fairly
claim.
It is not rare for nobles of mark, and even
princes, to visit us on these occasions, under
feigned
names and without the
eclat
of their rank; for
the great, when they descend to follies, seldom
like to bring their high condition within their
influence
.
The wiser they. I have my own troubles with
these accursed fooleries, forit may be a
weakness
,
but it is one that is officialI cannot help
imagining
that a bailiff cuts but a shabby figure before
the people, in the presence of so many gods and
goddesses. To own to thee the truth, I rejoice
that he who cometh, cometh as he doth.Hast
letters of late date from Berne?
None; though report says that there is like to
be a change among some of those who fill the
public
trusts.
So much the worse! growled the bailiff. Is
it to be expected that men who never did an hour's
duty in a charge can acquit themselves like those
who have, it might be said, sucked in practice
with their mother's milk?
Ay; this is well enough for thee; but others
say that even the Erlachs had a beginning.
Himmel! Am I a heathen to deny this? As
many beginnings as thou wilt, good Roger, but I
like not thy ends. No doubt an Erlach is mortal,
like all of us, and even a created being; but a man
is not a charge. Let the clay die, if thou wilt,
but, if thou wouldst have faithful or skilful servants,
look to the true successor. But we will have
none of this to-day.Hast many guests at
Blonay
?
Not one. I look for the company of Melchior
de Willading and his daughterand yet I like not
the time! There are evil signs playing about the
high peaks and in the neighborhood of the Dents,
since the sun has set!
Thou art ever in a storm up in thy castle,
there! The Leman was never more peaceable,
and I should take it truly in evil part, were the
rebellious
lake to get into one of its fits of sudden
anger with so precious a freight on its bosom.
I do not think the Genfer See will regard even
a bailiff's displeasure! rejoined the Baron de
Blonay, laughing. I repeat it; the signs are
suspicious. Let us consult the watermen, for it
may be well to send a light-pulling boat to bring
the travellers to land.
Roger de Blonay and the bailiff walked towards
the little earthen mole, that partially protects the
roadstead of Vvey, and which is for ever forming
and for ever washing away before the storms of
winter, in order to consult some of those who were
believed to be expert in detecting the symptoms
that precede any important changes of the
atmosphere
.
The opinions were various. Most believed
there would be a gust; but, as the Winkelried was
known to be a new and well-built bark, and none
could tell how much beyond her powers she had
been loaded by the cupidity of Baptiste, and as it
was generally thought the wind would be as likely
to bring her up to her haven as to be against her,
there appeared no sufficient reason for sending off
the boat; especially as it was believed the bark
would be not only drier but safer than a smaller
craft, should they be overtaken by the wind. This
indecision, so common in cases of uncertainty, was
the means of exposing Adelheid and her father to
all those fearful risks they had just run.
When the night came on, the people of the town
began to understand that the tempest would be
grave for those who were obliged to encounter it,
even in the best bark on the Leman. The
darkness
added to the danger, for vessels had often run
against the land by miscalculating their distances;
and the lights were shown along the strand, by
order
of the bailiff, who manifested an interest so
unusual
in those on board the Winkelried, as to draw
about them more than the sympathy that would
ordinarily be felt for travellers in distress. Every
exertion that the case admitted was made in their
behalf, and, the moment the state of the lake
allowed
,
boats were sent off, in every probable
direction
,
to their succor. But the Winkelried was
running along the coast of Savoy, ere any
ventured
forth, and the search proved fruitless. When
the rumor spread, however, that a sail was to be
discerned coming out from under the wide shadow
of the opposite mountains, and that it was steering
for La Tour de Peil, a village with a far safer
harbor
than that of Vvey, and but an arrow's flight
from the latter town, crowds rushed to the spot.
The instant it was known that the missing party
was in her, the travellers were received with
cheers of delight and cries of hearty greeting.
The bailiff and Roger de Blonay hastened
forward
to receive the Baron de Willading and his
friends, who were carried in a tumultuous and
joyful
manner into the old castle that adjoins the port,
and from which, in truth, the latter derives its
name. The Bernois noble was too much affected
with the scenes through which he had so lately
passed, and with the strong and ungovernable
tenderness
of Adelheid, who had wept over him as
a mother sobs over her recovered child, to
exchange
greetings with him of Vaud, in the hearty,
cordial manner that ordinarily characterized their
meetings. Still their peculiar habits shone through
the restraint.
Thou seest me just rescued from the fishes of
thy Leman, dear de Blonay, he said, squeezing
the other's hand with emotion, as, leaning on his
shoulder, they went into the chteau. But for
yonder brave youth, and as honest a mariner as
ever floated on water, fresh or salt, all that is left
of old Melchior de Willading would, at this
moment
,
Vol. I. N
be of less value than the meanest fr in thy
lake!
God be praised that thou art as we see thee!
We feared for thee, and boats are out at this
moment
in search of thy bark: but it has been wiser
ordered. This brave young man, who, I see, is
both a Swiss and a soldier, is doubly welcome
among us,in the two characters just named, and
as one that hath done thee and us so great a
service
.
Sigismund received the compliments which he
so well merited with modesty. The bailiff,
however
,
not content with making the usual
felicitations
,
whispered in his ear that a service like this,
rendered to one of its most esteemed nobles, would
not be forgotten by the Councils on a proper
occasion
.
Thou art happily arrived, Herr Melchior, he
then added, aloud; come as thou wilt, floating
or sailing in air. We have thee among us none
the worse for the accident, and we thank God, as
Roger de Blonay has just so well observed. Our
Abbaye is like to be a gallant ceremony, for divers
gentlemen of name are in the town, and I hear of
more that are pricking forward among the
mountains
from countries beyond the Rhine. Hadst thou
no other companions in the bark but these I see
around us?
There is another, and I wonder that he is not
here! 'Tis a noble Genoese, that thou hast often
heard me name, Sire de Blonay, as one that I love.
Gaetano Grimaldi is a name familiar to thee, or
the words of friendship have been uttered in an
idle ear.
I have heard so much of the Italian that I can
almost fancy him an old and tried acquaintance.
When thou first returnedst from the Italian wars,
thy tongue was never weary of recounting his
praises: it was Gaetano said thisGaetano thought
thusGaetano did that! Surely he is not of thy
company?
He, and no other! A lucky meeting on the
quay of Genf brought us together again after a
separation of full thirty years, and, as if Heaven
had reserved its trials for the occasion, we have
been made to go through the late danger in
company
.
I had him in my arms in that fearful
moment
,
Roger, when the sky, and the mountains,
and all of earth, even to that dear girl, were
fading, as I thought for ever, from my sight,he,
that had already been my partner in so many
risks, who had bled for me, watched for me,
ridden
for me, and did all other things that love could
prompt for me, was brought by Providence to be
my companion in the awful strait through which I
have just passed!
While the Baron was still speaking, his friend
entered with the quiet and dignified mien he
always
maintained, when it was not his pleasure to
throw aside the reserve of high station, or when
he yielded to the torrents of feeling that sometimes
poured through his southern temperament, in a
way to unsettle the deportment of mere
convention
.
He was presented to Roger de Blonay and
the bailiff, as the person just alluded to, and as the
oldest and most tried of the friends of his
introducer
.
His reception by the former was natural
and warm, while the Herr Hofmeister was so
particular
in his professions of pleasure and respect
as to excite not only notice but surprise.
Thanks, thanks, good Peterchen, said the
Baron de Willading, for such was the familiar
diminutive by which the bustling bailiff was
usually
addressed by those who could take the liberty;
thanks, honest Peterchen; thy kindness to
Gaetano
is so much love shown to myself.
I honor thy friends as thyself, Herr von
Willading
,
returned the bailiff; for thou hast a claim
to the esteem of the brgerschaft and all its
servants
;
but the homage paid to the Signor
Grimaldi
is due on his own account. We are but
poor Swiss, that dwell in the midst of wild
mountains
,
little favored by the sun if ye will, and less
known to the world;but we have our manners!
A man that hath been intrusted with authority as
long as I were unfit for his trust, did he not tell,
as it might be by instinct, when he has those in
his presence that are to be honored. Signore, the
loss of Melchior von Willading before our haven,
would have made the lake unpleasant to us all, for
months, not to say years; but, had so great a
calamity
arrived as that of your death by means of
our waters, I could have prayed that the
mountains
might fall into the basin, and bury the
offending
Leman under their rocks!
Melchior de Willading and old Roger de
Blonay
laughed heartily at Peterchen's hyperbolical
compliments; though it was quite plain that the
worthy bailiff himself fancied he had said a clever
thing.
I thank you, Signore, no less than my friend
de Willading, returned the Genoese, a gleam of
humor lighting his eye. This courteous
reception
quite outdoes us of Italy; for I doubt if there
be a man south of the Alps, who would be willing
to condemn either of our seas to so overwhelming
a punishment, for a fault so venial, or at least so
natural. I beg, however, that the lake may be
pardoned; since, at the worst, it was but a
secondary
agent in the affair, and, I doubt not, it would
have treated us as it treats all travellers, had we
kept out of its embraces. The crime must be
imputed
to the winds, and as they are the offspring
of the hills, I fear it will be found that these very
mountains, to which you look for retribution, will
be convicted at last as the true devisers and
abettors
of the plot against our lives.
The bailiff chuckled and simpered, like a man
pleased equally with his own wit and with that he
had excited in others, and the discourse changed;
though, throughout the night, as indeed was the
fact on all other occasions during his visit, the
Signor Grimaldi received from him so marked and
particular attentions, as to create a strong
sentiment
in favor of the Italian among those who had
been chiefly accustomed to see Peterchen enact
the busy, important, dignified, local functionary.
Attention was now paid to the first wants of the
travellers, who had great need of refreshments
after
the fatigues and exposure of the day. To
obtain
the latter, Roger de Blonay insisted that they
should ascend to his castle, in whose grate the
welcoming
beacon still blazed. By means of
chars
-banc
, the peculiar vehicle of the country, the
short distance was soon overcome, the bailiff, not
a little to the surprise of the owner of the house,
insisting on seeing the strangers safely housed
within
its walls. At the gate of Blonay, however,
Peterchen
took his leave, making a hundred apologies
for his absence, on the ground of the extensive
duties that had devolved on his shoulders in
consequence
of the approaching fte.
We shall have a mild winter, for I have never
known the Herr Hofmeister so courteous;
observed
Roger de Blonay, while showing his guests
into the castle. Thy Bernese authorities,
Melchior
,
are little apt to be lavish of their
compliments
to us poor nobles of Vaud.
Signore, you forget the interest of our friend,
observed the laughing Genoese. There are other
N 2
and better bailiwicks, beyond a question, in the
gifts of the Councils, and the Signor de Willading
has a loud voice in their disposal. Have I found
a solution for this zeal?
Thou hast not, returned the baron, for
Peterchen
hath little hope beyond that of dying where
he has lived, the deputed ruler of a small district.
The worthy man should have more credit for a
good heart, his own, no doubt, being touched at
seeing those who are, as it may be, redeemed from
the grave. I owe him grace for the kindness, and
should a better thing really offer, and could my
poor voice be of account, why, I do not say it
should be silent; it is serving the public well, to
put men of these kind feelings into places of trust.
This opinion appeared very natural to the
listeners
,
all of whom, with the exception of the Signor
Grimaldi, joined in echoing the sentiment. The
latter, more experienced in the windings of the
human heart, or possessing some reasons known
only to himself, merely smiled at the remarks that
he heard, as if he thoroughly understood the
difference
between the homage that is paid to station,
and that which a generous and noble nature is
compelled
to yield to its own impulses.
An hour later, the light repast was ended, and
Roger de Blonay informed his guests that they
would be well repaid for walking a short distance,
by a look at the loveliness of the night. In sooth,
the change was already so great, that it was not
easy for the imagination to convert the soft and
smiling scene that lay beneath and above the
towers
of Blonay, into the dark vault and the angry
lake from which they had so lately escaped.
Every cloud had already sailed far away towards
the plains of Germany, and the moon had climbed
so high above the ragged Dent de Jaman as to
suffer its rays to stream into the basin of the
Leman
.
A thousand pensive stars spangled the vault
images of the benign omnipotence which
unceasingly
pervades and governs the universe,
whatever
may be the local derangements or accidental
struggles of the inferior agents. The foaming and
rushing waves had gone down nearly as fast as
they had arisen, and, in their stead, remained
myriads
of curling ridges along which the glittering
moonbeams danced, rioting with mild impunity on
the surface of the placid sheet. Boats were out
again, pulling for Savoy or the neighboring
villages
;
and the whole view betokened the renewed
confidence of those who trusted habitually to the
fickle and blustering elements.
There is a strong and fearful resemblance
between
the human passions and these hot and angry
gusts of nature; observed the Signor Grimaldi,
after they had stood silently regarding the scene
for several musing minutesalike quick to be
aroused and to be appeased; equally ungovernable
while in the ascendant, and admitting the influence
of a wholesome reaction, that brings a more sober
tranquillity, when the fit is over. Your northern
phlegm may render the analogy less apparent, but
it is to be found as well among the cooler
temperaments
of the Teutonic stock, as among us of
warmer blood. Do not this placid hill-side, yon
lake, and the starry heavens, look as if they
regretted
their late unseemly violence, and wished
to cheat the beholder into forgetfulness of their
attack on our safety, as an impetuous but generous
nature would repent it of the blow given in anger,
or of the cutting speech that had escaped in a
moment
of spleen? What hast thou to say to my
opinion, Signor Sigismund, for none know better
than thou the quality of the tempest we have
encountered
?
Signore, answered the young soldier,
modestly
,
you forget this brave mariner, without
whose coolness and forethought all would have
been lost. He has come up to Blonay, at our own
request, but, until now, he has been overlooked.
Maso came forward at a signal from Sigismund,
and stood before the party to whom he had
rendered
so signal aid, with a composure that was
not easily disturbed.
I have come up to the castle, Signore, at your
commands, he said, addressing the Genoese;
but, having my own affairs on hand, must now
beg to know your pleasure?
We have, in sooth, been negligent of thy merit.
On landing, my first thought was of thee, as thou
knowest: but other things had caused me to forget
thee. Thou art, like myself, an Italian?
Signore, I am.
Of what country?
Of your own, Signore; a Genoese, as I have
said before.
The other remembered the circumstance, though
it did not seem to please him. He looked around,
as if to detect what others thought, and then
continued
his questions.
A Genoese! he repeated, slowly: if this be
so, we should know something of each other.
Hast ever heard of me, in thy frequent visits to
the port?
Maso smiled; at first, he appeared disposed to
be facetious; but a dark cloud passed over his
swarthy lineaments, and he lost his pleasantry, in
an air of thoughtfulness that struck his
interrogator
as singular.
Signore, he said, after a pause, most that
follow my manner of life know something of your
eccellenza; if it is only to be questioned of this
that I am here, I pray leave to be permitted to go
my way.
No, by San Francesco! thou quittest us not so
unceremoniously. I am wrong to assume the
manner
of a superior with one to whom I owe my
life, and am well answered. But there is a heavy
account to be settled between us, and I will do
something towards wiping out the balance, which
is so greatly against me, now; leaving thee to apply
for a further statement, when we shall both be
again in our own Genoa.
The Signor Grimaldi had reached forth an arm,
while speaking, and received a well-filled purse
from his countryman and companion, Marcelli.
This was soon emptied of its contents, a fair show
of sequins, all of which were offered to the
mariner
,
without reservation. Maso looked coldly at
the glittering pile, and, by his hesitation, left a
doubt whether he did not think the reward
insufficient
.
I tell thee it is but the present gage of further
payment. At Genoa our account shall be fairly
settled; but this is all that a traveller can
prudently
spare. Thou wilt come to me in our own town,
and we will look to all thy interests.
Signore, you offer that for which men do all
acts, whether of good or of evil. They jeopard
their souls for this very metal; mock at God's
laws; overlook the right; trifle with justice, and
become devils incarnate to possess it; and yet,
though nearly penniless, I am so placed as to be
compelled to refuse what you offer.
I tell thee, Maso, that it shall be increased
here-after
orwe
are not so poor as to go a-begging!
Good Marcelli, empty thy hoards, and I will have
recourse to Melchior de Willading's purse for our
wants, until we can get nearer to our own
supplies
.
And is Melchior de Willading to pass for
nothing
,
in all this! exclaimed the Baron; put up
thy gold, Gaetano, and leave me to satisfy the
honest mariner for the present. At a later day,
he can come to thee, in Italy: but here, on my
own ground, I claim the right to be his banker.
Signore, returned Maso, earnestly and with
more of gentle feeling than he was accustomed to
betray, you are both liberal beyond my desires,
and but too well disposed for my poor wants. I
have come up to the castle at your order, and to
do you pleasure, but not in the hope to get money.
I am poor; that it would be useless to deny, for
appearances are against me here he laughed,
his auditors thought in a manner that was forced
but poverty and meanness are not always
inseparable
.
You have more than suspected to-day
that my life is free, and I admit it; but it is a
mistake
to believe that, because men quit the high-road
which some call honesty, in any particular
practice
,
they are without human feeling. I have been
useful in saving your lives, Signori, and there is
more pleasure in the reflection, than I should
find in having the means to earn twice the gold
ye offer. Here is the Signor Capitano, he added,
taking Sigismund by the arm, and dragging him
forward, lavish your favors on him, for no
practice of mine could have been of use without
his bravery. If ye give him all in your treasuries,
even to its richest pearl, ye will do no more than
reason.
As Maso ceased, he cast a glance towards the
attentive, breathless Adelheid, that continued to
utter his meaning even after the tongue was silent.
The bright suffusion that covered the maiden's
face was visible even by the pale moonlight, and
Sigismund shrunk back from his rude grasp in the
manner in which the guilty retire from notice.
These opinions are creditable to thee, Maso,
returned the Genoese, affecting not to understand
his more particular meaning, and they excite a
stronger wish to be thy friend. I will say no more
on the subject at present, for I see thy humor.
Thou wilt let me see thee at Genoa?
The expression of Maso's countenance was
inexplicable
,
but he retained his usual indifference
of manner.
Signor Gaetano, he said, using a mariner's
freedom in the address, there are nobles in
Genoa that might better knock at the door of your
palace than I; and there are those, too, in the city
that would gossip, were it known that you received
such guests.
This is tying thyself too closely to an evil and
a dangerous trade. I suspect thee to be of the
contraband, but surely it is not a pursuit so free
from danger, of so much repute, or, judging by
thy attire, of so much profit even, that thou
needest
be wedded to it for life. Means can be found
to relieve thee from its odium, by giving thee a
place in those customs with which thou hast so
often trifled.
Maso laughed outright.
So it is, Signore, in this moral world of ours:
he who would run a fair course in any particular
trust has only to make himself dangerous to be
bought up. Your thief-takers are desperate rogues
out of business; your tide-waiter has got his art by
cheating the revenue; and I have been in lands
where it was said, that all they who most fleeced
the people began their calling as suffering patriots.
The rule is firmly enough established without the
help of my poor name, and, by your leave, I will
remain as I am; one that hath his pleasure in
living
amid risks, and who takes his revenge of the
authorities by railing at them when defeated, and
in laughing at them when in success.
Young man, thou hast in thee the materials of
a better life!
Signore, this may be true, answered Maso,
whose countenance again grew dark; we boast
of being the lords of the creation, but the bark of
poor Baptista was not less master of its
movements
,
in the late gust, than we are masters of our
fortunes. Signor Grimaldi, I have in me the
materials that make a man; but the laws, and
the opinions, and the accursed strife of men, have
left me what I am. For the first fifteen years of
my career, the church was to be my
steppingstone
to a cardinal's hat or a fat priory; but the
briny sea-water washed out the necessary
unction
.
Thou art better born than thou seemestthou
hast friends who should be grieved at this?
The eye of Maso flashed, but he bent it aside, as
if bearing down, by the force of an indomitable
will, some sudden and fierce impulse.
I was born of woman! he said, with singular
emphasis.
And thy motheris she not pained at thy
present coursedoes she know of thy career?
The haggard smile to which this question gave
birth induced the Genoese to regret that he had
put it. Maso evidently struggled to subdue some
feeling which harrowed his very soul, and his
success
was owing to such a command of himself as
men rarely obtain.
She is dead, he answered, huskily; she is a
saint with the angels. Had she lived, I should
never have been a mariner, andand laying
his hand on his throat, as if to keep down the
sense of suffocation, he smiled, and added,
laughingly
,ay,
and the good Winkelried would have
been a wreck.
Maso, thou must come to me at Genoa. I
must see more of thee, and question thee further
of thy fortunes. A fair spirit has been perverted
in thy fall, and the friendly aid of one who is not
without influence may still restore its tone.
The Signor Grimaldi spoke warmly, like one
who sincerely felt regret, and his voice had all the
melancholy and earnestness of such a sentiment.
The truculent nature of Maso was touched by
this show of interest, and a multitude of fierce
passions were at once subdued. He approached
the noble Genoese, and respectfully took his hand.
Pardon the freedom, Signore, he said more
mildly, intently regarding the wrinkled and
attenuated
fingers, with the map-like tracery of veins,
that he held in his own brown and hard palm;
this is not the first time that our flesh has
touched
each other, though it is the first time that our
hands have joined. Let it now be in amity. A
humor has come over me, and I would crave your
pardon, venerable noble, for the freedom.
Signore
,
you are aged, and honored, and stand high,
doubtless, in Heaven's favor, as in that of man
grant me, then, your blessing, ere I go my way.
As Maso preferred this extraordinary request,
he knelt with an air of so much reverence and
sincerity
as to leave little choice as to granting it.
The Genoese was surprised, but not disconcerted.
With perfect dignity and self-possession, and with
a degree of feeling that was not unsuited to the
occasion, the fruit of emotions so powerfully
awakened
,
he pronounced the benediction. The mariner
arose, kissed the hand which he still held, made a
hurried sign of salutation to all, leaped down the
declivity on which they stood, and vanished among
the shadows of a copse.
Sigismund, who had witnessed this unusual
scene with surprise, watched him to the last, and
he saw, by the manner in which he dashed his
Vol. I. O
hand across his eyes, that his fierce nature had
been singularly shaken. On recovering his
thoughts, the Signor Grimaldi, too, felt certain
there had been no mockery in the conduct of
their inexplicable preserver, for a hot tear had
fallen
on his hand ere it was liberated. He was
himself
strongly agitated by what had passed, and,
leaning on his friend, he slowly re-entered the
gates of Blonay.
This extraordinary demand of Maso's has
brought up the sad image of my own poor son,
dear Melchior, he said; would to Heaven that he
could have received this blessing, and that it might
have been of use to him, in the sight of God! Nay,
he may yet hear of itfor, canst thou believe it,
I have thought that Maso may be one of his
lawless associates, and that some wild desire to
communicate this scene has prompted the strange
request I granted.
The discourse continued, but it became secret,
and of the most confidential kind. The rest of the
party soon sought their beds, though lamps were
burning in the chambers of the two old nobles to
a late hour of the night.
CHAPTER IX.
Where are my Switzers? Let them guard the door:
What is the matter?
Hamlet
.
The
American autumn, or fall, as we poetically
and affectionately term this generous and mellow
season among ourselves, is thought to be
unsurpassed
,
in its warm and genial lustre, its bland and
exhilarating airs, and its admirable constancy, by
the decline of the year in nearly every other
portion
of the earth. Whether attachment to our
own fair and generous land, has led us to
over-estimate
its advantages or not, and bright and
cheerful
as our autumnal days certainly are, a fairer
morning never dawned upon the Alleghanies, than
that which illumined the Alps, on the
reappearance
of the sun after the gust of the night which
has been so lately described. As the day
advanced
,
the scene grew gradually more lovely, until
warm and glowing Italy itself could scarce
present
a landscape more winning, or one possessing
a fairer admixture of the grand and the soft, than
that which greeted the eye of Adelheid de
Willading
,
as, leaning on the arm of her father, she
issued
from the gate of Blonay, upon its elevated
and gravelled terrace.
It has already been said that this ancient and
historical building stood against the bosom of the
mountains, at the distance of a short league
behind
the town of Vvey. All the elevations of
this region are so many spurs of the same vast
pile, and that on which Blonay has now been
seated
from the earliest period of the middle ages
belongs
to that particular line of rocky ramparts,
which separates the Valais from the centre
cantons
of the confederation of Switzerland, and which
is commonly known as the range of the Oberland
Alps. This line of snow-crowned rocks terminates
in perpendicular precipices on the very margin of
the Leman, and forms, on the side of the lake,
a part of that magnificent setting which renders
the south-eastern horn of its crescent so
wonderfully
beautiful. The upright natural wall that
overhangs Villeneuve and Chillon stretches along
the verge of the water, barely leaving room for a
carriage-road, with here and there a cottage
at its base, for the distance of two leagues, when
it diverges from the course of the lake, and,
withdrawing inland, it is finally lost among the
minor eminences of Fribourg. Every one has
observed
those sloping declivities, composed of the
washings of torrents, the
dbris
of precipices, and
what may be termed the constant drippings of
perpendicular
eminencies, and which lie like broad
buttresses at their feet, forming a sort of foundation
or basement for the superincumbent mass. Among
the Alps, where nature has acted on so sublime a
scale, and where all the proportions are duly
observed
,
these
dbris
of the high mountains
frequently
contain villages and towns; or form vast
fields, vineyards, and pasturages, according to
their elevation or their exposure towards the sun.
It may be questioned, in strict geology, whether
the variegated acclivity that surrounds Vvey,
rich in villages and vines, hamlets and castles, has
been thus formed, or whether the natural
convulsions
which expelled the upper rocks from the
crust of the earth left their bases in the present
broken and beautiful forms; but the fact is not
important to the effect, which is that just named,
and which gives to these vast ranges of rock
secondary
and fertile bases, that, in other regions,
would be termed mountains of themselves.
The castle and family of Blonay, for both still
exist, are among the oldest of Vaud. A square,
rude tower, based upon a foundation of rock, one
of those ragged masses that thrust their naked
heads occasionally through the soil of the declivity,
was the commencement of the hold. Other edifices
have been reared around this nucleus in different
ages, until the whole presents one of those
peculiar
and picturesque piles, that ornament so many
both of the savage and of the softer sites of
Switzerland
.
The terrace towards which Adelheid and her
father advanced was an irregular walk, shaded by
venerable trees that had been raised near the
principal
or the carriage gate of the castle, on a ledge
of those rocks that form the foundation of the
buildings themselves. It had its parapet walls, its
seats, its artificial soil, and its gravelled
alles
, as
is usual with these antiquated ornaments; but it
also had, what is better than these, one of the most
sublime and lovely views that ever greeted human
eyes. Beneath it lay the undulating and teeming
declivity, rich in vines, and carpeted with sward,
here dotted by hamlets, there park-like and rural
with forest trees, while there was no quarter that
did not show the roof of a chteau or the tower
of some rural church. There is little of
magnificence
in Swiss architecture, which never much
surpasses, and is, perhaps, generally inferior to our
own; but the beauty and quaintness of the sites,
the great variety of the surfaces, the hill-sides, and
the purity of the atmosphere, supply charms that
are peculiar to the country. Vvey lay at the
water-side
,
many hundred feet lower, and seemingly
on a narrow strand, though in truth enjoying
ample
space; while the houses of St. Saphorin,
Corsier
,
Montreux, and of a dozen more villages, were
clustered together, like so many of the compact
habitations of wasps stuck against the mountains.
But the principal charm was in the Leman. One
who had never witnessed the lake in its fury, could
not conceive the possibility of danger in the
tranquil
shining sheet that was now spread like a liquid
mirror, for leagues, beneath the eye. Some six or
seven barks were in view, their sails drooping in
negligent forms, as if disposed expressly to become
models for the artist, their yards inclining as chance
O 2
had cast them, and their hulls looming large, to
complete the picture. To these near objects must
be added the distant view, which extended to the
Jura in one direction, and which in the other was
bounded by the frontiers of Italy, whose arial
limits were to be traced in that region which
appears
to belong neither to heaven nor to earth, the
abode of eternal frosts. The Rhone was shining,
in spots, among the meadows of the Valais, for
the elevation of the castle admitted of its being
seen, and Adelheid endeavored to trace among the
mazes of the mountains the valleys which led to
those sunny countries, towards which they
journeyed
.
The sensations of both father and daughter,
when they came beneath the leafy canopy of the
terrace, were those of mute delight. It was
evident
,
by the expression of their countenances, that
they were in a favorable mood to receive
pleasurable
impressions; for the face of each was full
of that quiet happiness which succeeds sudden and
lively joy. Adelheid had been weeping; but,
judging
from the radiance of her eyes, the healthful
and brightening bloom of her cheeks, and the
struggling smiles that played about her ripe lips,
the tears had been sweet, rather than painful.
Though still betraying enough of physical frailty
to keep alive the concern of all who loved her,
there was a change for the better in her
appearance
,
which was so sensible as to strike the least
observant of those who lived in daily
communication
with the invalid.
If pure and mild air, a sunny sky, and
ravishing
scenery, be what they seek who cross the Alps,
my father, said Adelheid, after they had stood a
moment, gazing at the magnificent panorama,
why should the Swiss quit his native land? Is
there in Italy aught more soft, more winning, or
more healthful, than this?
This spot has often been called the Italy of our
mountains. The fig ripens near yonder village of
Montreux, and, open to the morning sun while it
is sheltered by the precipices above, the whole of
that shore well deserves its happy reputation. Still
they whose spirits require diversion, and whose
constitutions need support, generally prefer to go
into countries where the mind has more
occupation
,
and where a greater variety of employments
help the climate and nature to complete the cure.
But thou forgettest, father, it is agreed between
us that I am now to become strong, and active,
and laughing, as we used to be at Willading, when
I first grew into womanhood.
If I could but see those days again, darling,
my own closing hours would be calm as those of
a saintthough Heaven knows I have little
pretension
to that blessed character in any other
particular
.
Dost thou not count a quiet conscience and a
sure hope as something, father?
Have it as thou wilt, girl. Make a saint of
me, or a bishop, or a hermit, if thou wilt; the only
reward I ask is, to see thee smiling and happy, as
thou never failedst to be during the first eighteen
years of thy life. Had I foreseen that thou wert
to return from my good sister so little like thyself,
I would have forbidden the visit, much as I love
her, and all that are her's. But the wisest of us
are helpless mortals, and scarce know our own
wants from hour to hour. Thou saidst, I think,
that this brave Sigismund honestly declared his
belief that my consent could never be given to one
who had so little to boast of, in the way of birth
and fortune? There was, at least, good sense, and
modesty, and right feeling, in the doubt, but he
should have thought better of my heart.
He said this; returned Adelheid, in a timid
and slightly trembling voice, though it was quite
apparent by the confiding expression of her eye,
that she had no longer any secret from her parent.
He had too much honor to wish to win the
daughter
of a noble without the knowledge and
approbation
of her friends.
That the boy should love thee, Adelheid, is
natural; it is an additional proof of his own merit
but that he should distrust my affection and
justice
is an offence that I can scarce forgive. What
are ancestry and wealth to thy happiness?
Thou forget'st, dear sir, he is yet to learn that
my happiness, in any measure, depends on his.
Adelheid spoke quickly and with warmth.
He knew I was a father and that thou art an
only child; one of his good sense and right way
of thinking should have better understood the
feelings
of a man in my situation, than to doubt his
natural affection.
As he has never been the parent of an only
daughter, father, answered the smiling Adelheid,
for, in her present mood, smiles came easily, he
may not have felt or anticipated all that thou
imagin'st. He knew the prejudices of the world
on the subject of noble blood, and they are few
indeed
,
that, having much, are disposed to part with
it to him who hath little.
The lad reasoned more like an old miser than
a young soldier, and I have a great mind to let
him feel my displeasure for thinking so meanly of
me. Have we not Willading, with all its fair lands,
besides our rights in the city, that we need go
begging
money of others, like needy mendicants!
Thou hast been in the conspiracy against my
character, girl, or such a fear could not have given
either uneasiness for a moment.
I never thought, father, that thou would'st
reject him on account of poverty, for I knew our
own means sufficient for all our own wants; but I
did believe that he who could not boast the
privileges
of nobility might fail to gain thy favor.
Are we not a republic?is not the right of the
brgerschaft the one essential right in Bernewhy
should I raise obstacles about that on which the
laws are silent?
Adelheid listened, as a female of her years would
be apt to listen to words so grateful, with a charmed
ear; and yet she shook her head, in a way to
express
an incredulity that was not altogether free
from apprehension.
For thy generous forgetfulness of old opinions
in behalf of my happiness, dearest father, she
resumed
,
the tears starting unbidden to her
thoughtful
blue eye, I thank thee fervently. It is true
that we are inhabitants of a republic, but we are
not the less noble.
Dost thou turn against thyself, and hunt up
reasons why I should not do that which thou hast
just acknowledged to be so necessary to prevent
thee from following thy brothers and sisters to
their early graves?
The blood rushed in a torrent to the face of
Adelheid, for though, weeping and in the moment
of tender confidence which succeeded her
thanks-givings
for the baron's safety, she had thrown
herself
on his bosom, and confessed that the
hopelessness
of the sentiments with which she met the
declared
love of Sigismund was the true cause of the
apparent malady that had so much alarmed her
friends, the words which had flowed spontaneously
from her heart, in so tender a scene, had never
appeared
to her to convey a meaning so strong, or
one so wounding to virgin-pride, as that which her
father, in the strength of his masculine habits, had
now given them.
In God's mercy, father, I shall live, whether
united to Sigismund or not, to smooth thine own
decline and to bless thy old age. A pious
daughter
will never be torn so cruelly from one to whom
she is the last and only stay. I may mourn this
disappointment, and foolishly wish, perhaps, it
might have been otherwise; but ours is not a house
of which the maidens die for their inclinations in
favor of any youths, however deserving!
Noble or simple, added the baron, laughing,
for he saw that his daughter spoke in sudden pique,
rather than from her excellent heart. Adelheid,
whose good sense, and quick recollections,
instantly
showed her the weakness of this little display of
female feeling, laughed faintly in her turn, though
she repeated his words as if to give still more
emphasis to her own.
This will not do, my daughter. They who
profess the republican doctrine, should not be too
rigid in their constructions of privileges. If
Sigismund
be not noble, it will not be difficult to obtain
for him that honorable distinction, and, in failure
of male line, he may bear the name and sustain the
honors of our family. In any case he will become
of the brgerschaft, and that of itself will be all that
is required in Berne.
In Berne, father, returned Adelheid, who had
so far forgotten the recent movement of pride as to
smile on her fond and indulgent parent, though,
yielding to the waywardness of the happy, she
continued to trifle with her own feelingsit is
true. The brgerschaft will be sufficient for all
the purposes of office and political privileges, but
will it suffice for the opinions of our equals, for the
prejudices of society, or for your own perfect
contentment
,
when the freshness of gratitude shall
have passed?
Thou puttest these questions, girl, as if
employed
to defeat thine own causeDost not truly love
the boy, after all?
On this subject, I have spoken sincerely and as
became thy child, frankly returned Adelheid.
He saved my life from imminent peril, as he has
now saved thine, and although my aunt, fearful of
thy displeasure, would not that thou should'st hear
the tale, her prohibition could not prevent
gratitude
from having its way. I have told thee that
Sigismund has declared his feelings, although he
nobly abstained from even asking a return, and I
should not have been my mother's child, could I
have remained entirely indifferent to so much worth
united to a service so great. What I have said of
our prejudices is, then, rather for your reflection,
dearest sir, than for myself. I have thought much
of all this, and am ready to make any sacrifice to
pride, and to bear all the remarks of the world, in
order to discharge a debt to one to whom I owe
so much. But, while it is natural, perhaps
unavoidable
,
that I should feel thus, thou art not
necessarily
to forget the other claims upon thee. It
is true that, in one sense, we are all to each other,
but there is a tyrant that will scarce let any escape
from his reign; I mean opinion. Let us then not
deceive ourselvesthough we of Berne affect the
republic, and speak much of liberty, it is a small
state, and the influence of those that are larger and
more powerful among our neighbors rules in every
thing that touches opinion. A noble is as much a
noble in Berne, in all but what the law bestows, as
he is in the Empireand thou knowest we come
of the German root, which has struck deep into
these prejudices.
The Baron de Willading had been much
accustomed
to defer to the superior mind and more
cultivated
understanding of his daughter, who, in the
retirement of her father's castle, had read and
reflected
far more than her years would have
probably
permitted in the busier scenes of the world.
He felt the justice of her remark, and they had
walked the entire length of the terrace in profound
silence, before he could summon the ideas
necessary
to make a suitable answer.
The truth of what thou sayest, is not to be
denied
,
he at length said, but it may be palliated.
I have many friends in the German courts, and
favors may be had; letters of nobility will give
the youth the station he wants, after which he can
claim thy hand without offence to any opinions,
whether of Berne or elsewhere.
I doubt if Sigismund will willingly become a
party to this expedient. Our own nobility is of
ancient origin; it dates from a period anterior to
the existence of Berne as a city, and is much older
than our institutions. I remember to have heard
him say, that when a people refuse to bestow these
distinctions themselves, their citizens can never
receive them from others without a loss of
dignity
and character, and one of his moral firmness
might hesitate to do what he thinks wrong for a
boon so worthless as that we offer.
By the soul of William Tell! should the
unknown
peasant dareBut he is a brave boy,
and twice has he done the last service to my race!
I love him, Adelheid, little less than thyself; and
we will win him over to our purpose gently, and
by degrees. A maiden of thy beauty and years,
to say nothing of thy other qualities, thy name,
the lands of Willading, and the rights of Berne,
are matters, after all, not to be lightly refused by
a nameless soldier, who hath naught
But his courage, his virtues, his modesty, and
his excellent sense, father!
Thou wilt not let me have the naked
satisfaction
of vaunting my own wares! I see Gaetano
Grimaldi making signs at his window, as if he
were about to come forth: go thou to thy
chamber
,
that I may discourse of this troublesome
matter
with that excellent friend; in good season thou
shalt know the result.
Adelheid kissed the hand that she held in her
own, and left him with a thoughtful air. As she
descended from the terrace, it was not with the
same elastic step as she had come up half an hour
before.
Early deprived of her mother, this
strong-minded
but delicate girl had long been accustomed to
make her father a confidant of all her hopes,
thoughts, and pictures of the future. Owing to
her peculiar circumstances, she would have had
less hesitation than is usual to her sex in avowing
to her parent any of her attachments; but a dread
that the declaration might conduce to his
unhappiness
,
without in any manner favoring her own
cause, had hitherto kept her silent. Her
acquaintance
with Sigismund had been long and intimate.
Rooted esteem and deep respect lay at the bottom
of her sentiments, which were, however, so lively
as to have chased the rose from her cheek in the
endeavor to forget them, and to have led her
sensitive
father to apprehend that she was suffering
under that premature decay which had already
robbed him of his other children. There was in
truth no serious ground for this apprehension, so
natural to one in the place of the Baron de
Willading
;
for, until thought and reflection paled her
cheek, a more blooming maiden than Adelheid, or
one that united more perfect health with feminine
delicacy, did not dwell among her native
mountains
.
Vol. I. P
She had quietly consented to the Italian
journey, in the expectation that it might serve to
divert her mind from brooding over what she had
long considered hopeless, and with the natural
desire
to see lands so celebrated, but not under any
mistaken opinions of her own situation. The
presence
of Sigismund, so far as she was concerned,
was purely accidental, although she could not
prevent
the pleasing idea from obtrudingan idea so
grateful to her womanly affections and maiden
pridethat the young soldier, who was in the
service
of Austria, and who had become known to
her in one of his frequent visits to his native land,
had gladly seized this favorable occasion to return
to his colors. Circumstances, which it is not
necessary
to recount, had enabled Adelheid to make
the youth acquainted with her father, though the
interdictions of her aunt, whose imprudence had
led to the accident which nearly proved so fatal,
and from whose consequences she had been saved
by Sigismund, prevented her from explaining all
the causes she had for showing him respect and
esteem. Perhaps the manner in which this young
and imaginative though sensible girl was
compelled
to smother a portion of her feelings gave them
intensity, and hastened that transition of sentiment
from gratitude to affection, which, in another case,
might have only been produced by a more open
and prolonged association. As it was, she scarcely
knew herself how irretrievably her happiness was
bound up in that of Sigismund, though she had so
long cherished his image in most of her
day-dreams
,
and had unconsciously admitted his
influence
over her mind and hopes, until she learned
that they were reciprocated.
The Signor Grimaldi appeared on one end of
the terrace, as Adelheid de Willading descended
at the other. The old nobles had separated late
on the previous night, after a private and
confidential
communication that had shaken the soul of the
Italian, and drawn strong and sincere
manifestations
of sympathy from his friend. Though so
prone to sudden shades of melancholy, there was
a strong touch of the humorous in the native
character
of the Genoese, which came so quick upon
his more painful recollection, as greatly to relieve
their weight, and to render him, in appearance at
least, a happy, while the truth would have shown
that he was a sorrowing, man. He had been
making his orisons with a grateful heart, and he
now came forth into the genial mountain air, like
one who had relieved his conscience of a heavy
debt. Like most laymen of the Catholic
persuasion
,
he thought himself no longer bound to
maintain
a grave and mortified exterior, when worship
and penitence were duly observed, and he joined
his friend with a cheerfulness of air and voice that
an ascetic, or a puritan, might have attributed to
levity, after the scenes through which he had so
lately passed.
The Virgin and San Francesco keep thee in
mind, old friend! said the Signor Grimaldi,
cordially
kissing the two cheeks of the Baron de
Willading. We both have reason to remember
their care, though, heretic as thou art, I doubt not
thou hast already found some other mediators to
thank, that we now stand on this solid terrace of
the Signor de Blonay, instead of being worthless
clay at the bottom of yonder treacherous lake.
I thank God for this, as for all his mercies
for thy life, Gaetano, as well as for mine own.
Thou art right, thou art right, good Melchior;
'twas no affair for any but Him who holds the
universe
in the hollow of his hand, in good faith, for
a minute later would have gathered both with our
fathers. Still thou wilt permit me, Catholic as I
am, to remember the intercessors on whom I called
in the moment of extremity.
This is a subject on which we have never
agreed, and on which we probably never shall,
answered the Bernese, with somewhat of the reserve
of one conscious of a stronger dissidence than he
wished to express, as they turned and commenced
their walk up and down the terrace, though I
believe it is the only matter of difference that ever
existed between us.
Is it not extraordinary, returned the Genoese,
that men should consort together in good and
evil, bleed for each other, love each other, do all
acts of kindness to each other, as thou and I have
done, Melchior, nay, be in the last extremity, and
feel more agony for the friend than for one's self,
and yet entertain such opinions of their respective
creeds, as to fancy the unbeliever in the devil's
claws all this time, and to entertain a latent
distrust
that the very soul which, in all other matters,
is deemed so noble and excellent, is to be
everlastingly
damned for the want of certain opinions and
formalities that we ourselves have been taught to
think essential?
To tell thee the truth, returned the Swiss,
rubbing his forehead like a man who wished to
brighten up his ideas, as one would brighten old
silver, by friction; this subject, as thou well
knowest, is not my strong side. Luther and
Calvin
,
with other sages, discovered that it was
weakness
to submit to dogmas, without close
examination
,
merely because they were venerable, and
they winnowed the wheat from the chaff. This
we call a reform. It is enough for me that men
so wise were satisfied with their researches and
changes, and I feel little inclination to disturb a
decision that has now received the sanction of
nearly two centuries of practice. To be plain
with thee, I hold it discreet to reverence the
opinions of my fathers.
Though it would seem not of thy grandfathers,
said the Italian, drily, but in perfect good humor.
By San Francesco! thou wouldst have made a
worthy cardinal, had chance brought thee into the
world fifty leagues farther south, or west, or east.
But this is the way with the world, whether it be
your Turk, your Hindoo, or your Lutheran, and I
fear it is much the same with the children of St.
Peter too. Each has his arguments for faith, or
politics, or any interest that may be named, which
he uses like a hammer to knock down the bricks
of his opponent's reasons, and when he finds
himself
in the other's intrenchments, why he gathers
together the scattered materials in order to build
a wall for his own protection. Then what was
oppression yesterday is justifiable defence to-day;
fanaticism becomes logic; and credulity and pliant
submission get, in two centuries, to be deference
to the venerable opinion of our fathers! But let it
gothou wert speaking of thanking God, and in
that, Roman though I am, I fervently and devoutly
join with or without saints' intercession.
The honest baron did not like his friend's
allusions
,
though they were much too subtle for his
ready comprehension, for the intellect of the Swiss
was a little frosted by constant residence among
snows and in full view of glaciers, and it wanted
the volatile play of the Genoese's fancy, which
was apt to expand like air rarefied by the warmth
of the sun. This difference of temperament,
however
,
so far from lessening their mutual kindness,
was, most probably, the real cause of its existence,
since it is well known that friendship, like love, is
more apt to be generated by qualities that vary a
little from our own than by a perfect homogeneity
of character and disposition, which is more liable
P 2
to give birth to rivalry and contention, than when
each party has some distinct capital of his own
on which to adventure, and with which to keep
alive the interest of him who, in that particular
feature, may be but indifferently provided. All
that is required for a perfect community of feeling
is a mutual recognition of, and a common respect
for, certain great moral rules, without which there
can exist no esteem between the upright. The
alliance
of knaves depends on motives so hackneyed
and obvious, that we abstain from any illustration
of its principle as a work of supererogation. The
Signor Grimaldi and Melchior de Willading were
both very upright and justly-minded men, as men
go, in intention at least, and their opposite
peculiarities
and opinions had served, during hot youth,
to keep alive the interest of their communications,
and were not likely, now that time had mellowed
their feelings and brought so many recollections
to strengthen the tie, to overturn what they had
been originally the principal instruments in creating.
Of thy readiness to thank God, I have never
doubted, answered the baron, when his friend had
ended the remark just recorded, but we know
that his favors are commonly shown to us here
below by means of human instruments. Ought
we not, therefore, to manifest another sort of
gratitude
in favor of the individual who was so
serviceable
in last night's gust?
Thou meanest my untractable countryman? I
have bethought me much since we separated of his
singular refusal, and hope still to find the means
of conquering his obstinacy.
I hope thou may'st succeed, and thou well
know'st that I am always to be counted on as an
auxiliary. But he was not in my thoughts at the
instant; there is still another who nobly risked
more than the mariner in our behalf, since he
risked life.
This is beyond question, and I have already
reflected much on the means of doing him good.
He is a soldier of fortune, I learn, and if he will
take service in Genoa, I will charge myself with
the care of his preferment. Trouble not thyself,
therefore, concerning the fortunes of young
Sigismund
;
thou knowest my means, and canst not
doubt my will.
The baron cleared his throat, for he had a
secret
reluctance to reveal his own favorable
intentions
towards the young man, the last lingering
feeling of worldly pride, and the consequence of
prejudices which were then universal, and which
are even now far from being extinct. A vivid
picture
of the horrors of the past night luckily flashed
across his mind, and the good genius of his young
preserver triumphed.
Thou knowest the youth is a Swiss, he said,
and, in virtue of the tie of country, I claim at
least an equal right to do him good.
We will not quarrel for precedence in this
matter, but thou wilt do well to remember that I
possess especial means to push his interests;
means that thou canst not by possibility use.
That is not proved; interrupted the Baron
de Willading. I have not thy particular station,
it is true, Signor Gaetano, nor thy political power,
nor thy princely fortune; but, poor as I am in
these, there is a boon in my keeping that is worth
them all, and which will be more acceptable to
the boy, or I much mistake his mettle, than any
favors that thou hast named or canst name.
The Signor Grimaldi had pursued his walk, with
eyes thoughtfully fastened on the ground; but he
now raised them, in surprise, to the countenance
of his friend, as if to ask an explanation. The
baron was not only committed by what had
escaped
him, but he was warming with opposition,
for the best may frequently do very excellent things,
under the influence of motives of but a very
indifferent
aspect.
Thou knowest I have a daughter, resumed
the Swiss firmly, determined to break the ice at
once, and expose a decision which he feared his
friend might deem a weakness.
Thou hast; and a fairer, or a modester, or a
tenderer, and yet, unless my judgment err, a firmer
at need, is not to be found among all the excellent
of her excellent sex. But thou wouldst scarce
think of bestowing Adelheid in reward for such a
service on one so little known, or without her wishes
being consulted?
Girls of Adelheid's birth and breeding are ever
ready to do what is meet to maintain the honor of
their families. I deem gratitude to be a debt that
must not stand long uncancelled against the name
of Willading.
The Genoese looked grave, and it was evident
he listened to his friend with something like
displeasure
.
We who have so nearly passed through life,
good Melchior, he said, should know its
difficulties
and its hazards. The way is weary, and
it has need of all the solace that affection and a
community of feeling can yield to lighten its cares.
I have never liked this heartless manner of
trafficking
in the tenderest ties, to uphold a failing line or
a failing fortune; and better it were that Adelheid
should pass her days unwooed in thy ancient
castle
,
than give her hand, under any sudden impulse
of sentiment, not less than under a cold
calculation
of interest. Such a girl, my friend, is not to
be bestowed without much care and reflection.
By the mass! to use one of thine own favorite
oaths, I wonder to hear thee talk thus!thou, whom
I knew a hot-blooded Italian, jealous as a Turk,
and maintaining at thy rapier's point that women
were like the steel of thy sword, so easily tarnished
by rust, or evil breath, or neglect, that no father
or brother could be easy on the score of honor,
until the last of his name was well wedded, and
that, too, to such as the wisdom of her advisers
should choose! I remember thee once saying thou
couldst not sleep soundly till thy sister was a wife
or a nun.
This was the language of boyhood and
thoughtless
youth, and bitterly rebuked have I been for
having used it. I wived a beauteous and noble
virgin, de Willading; but I much fear that, while
my fair conduct in her behalf won her respect and
esteem, I was too late to win her love. It is a
fearful
thing to enter on the solemn and grave ties of
married life, without enlisting in the cause of
happiness
the support of the judgment, the fancy, the
tastes, with the feelings that are dependent on
them, and, more than all, those wayward
inclinations
,
whose workings too often baffle human
foresight
.
If the hopes of the ardent and generous
themselves are deceived in the uncertain lottery of
wedlock, the victim will struggle hard to maintain
the delusion; but when the calculations of others
are parent to the evil, a natural inducement, that
comes of the devil I fear, prompts us to aggravate,
instead of striving to lessen, the evil.
Thou dost not speak of wedlock as one who
found the condition happy, poor Gaetano?
I have told thee what I fear was but too true,
returned the Genoese, with a heavy sigh. My
birth, vast means, and I trust a fair name, induced
the kinsmen of my wife to urge her to a union,
that I have since had reason to fear her feelings
did not lead her to form. I had a terrible ally too
in the acknowledged unworthiness of him who had
captivated her young fancy, and whom, as age
brought reflection, her reason condemned. I was
accepted, therefore, as a cure to a bleeding heart
and broken peace, and my office, at the best, was
not such as a good man could desire, or a proud
man tolerate. The unhappy Angiolina died in
giving
birth to her first child, the unhappy son of
whom I have told thee so much. She found peace
at last in the grave!
Thou hadst not time to give thy manly
tenderness
and noble qualities an opportunity; else, my
life on it, she would have come to love thee,
Gaetano
,
as all love thee who know thee! returned
the baron, warmly.
Thanks, my kind friend; but beware of
making
marriage a mere convenience. There may
be folly in calling each truant inclination that deep
sentiment and secret sympathy which firmly knits
heart to heart, and doubtless a common fortune
may bind the worldly-minded together; but this is
not the holy union which keeps noble qualities in a
family, and which fortifies against the seductions
of a world that is already too strong for honesty.
I remember to have heard from one that
understood
his fellow-creatures well, that marriages of
mere propriety tend to rob woman of her greatest
charm, that of superiority to the vulgar feeling of
worldly calculations, and that all communities in
which they prevail become, of necessity, selfish
beyond the natural limits, and eventually corrupt.
This may be true;but Adelheid loves the
youth.
Ha! This changes the complexion of the affair.
How dost thou know this?
From her own lips. The secret escaped her,
under the warmth and sincerity of feeling that the
late events so naturally excited.
And Sigismund!he has thy approbation?
for I will not suppose that one like thy daughter
yielded her affections unsolicited.
He hasthat ishe has. There is what the
world will be apt to call an obstacle, but it shall
count for nothing with me. The youth is not
noble.
The objection is serious, my honest friend. It
is not wise to tax human infirmity too much, where
there is sufficient to endure from causes that
cannot
be removed. Wedlock is a precarious
experiment
,
and all unusual motives for disgust should
be cautiously avoided.I would he were noble.
The difficulty shall be removed by the
Emperor's
favor. Thou hast princes in Italy, too, that
might be prevailed on to do us this grace, at need?
What is the youth's origin and history, and by
what means has a daughter of thine been placed
in a situation to love one that is simply born?
Sigismund is a Swiss, and of a family of
Bernese
burghers, I should think, though, to confess
the truth, I know little more than that he has
passed
several years in foreign service, and that he
saved my daughter's life from one of our
mountain
accidents, some two years since, as he has
now saved thine and mine. My sister, near whose
castle the acquaintance commenced, permitted the
intercourse, which it would now be too late to
think of prohibiting. And, to speak honestly, I
begin
to rejoice the boy is what he is, in order that
our readiness to receive him to our arms may be
the more apparent. If the young fellow were the
equal of Adelheid in other things, as he is in
person
and character, he would have too much in his
favor.No, by the faith of Calvin!him whom
thou stylest a hereticI think I rejoice that the
boy is not noble!
Have it as thou wilt, returned the Genoese,
whose countenance continued to express distrust
and thought, for his own experience had made him
wary on the subject of doubtful or ill-assorted
alliances
;
let his origin be what it may, he shall not
need gold. I charge myself with seeing that the
lands of Willading shall be fairly balanced: and
here comes our hospitable host to be witness of
the pledge.
Roger de Blonay advanced upon the terrace to
greet his guests, as the Signor Grimaldi concluded.
The three old men continued their walk for an hour
longer, discussing the fortunes of the young pair,
for Melchior de Willading was as little disposed
to make a secret of his intentions with one of his
friends as with the other.
CHAPTER X.
But I have not the time to pause
Upon these gewgaws of the heart.
Werner
.
Though
the word castle is of common use in
Europe, as applied to ancient baronial edifices, the
thing itself is very different in style, extent, and
cost, in different countries. Security, united to
dignity and the means of accommodating a train
of followers suited to the means of the noble, being
the common object, the position and defences of
the place necessarily varied according to the
general
aspect of the region in which it stood. Thus
ditches and other broad expanses of water were
much depended on in all low countries, as in
Flanders
,
Holland, parts of Germany, and much of
France; while hills, spurs of mountains, and more
especially the summits of conical rocks, were
sought in Switzerland, Italy, and wherever else
these natural means of protection could readily be
found. Other circumstances, such as climate,
wealth, the habits of a people, and the nature of
the feudal rights, also served greatly to modify the
appearance and extent of the building. The ancient
hold in Switzerland was originally little more than
a square solid tower, perched upon a rock, with
turrets at its angles. Proof against fire from
without
,
it had ladders to mount from floor to floor,
and often contained its beds in the deep recesses of
the windows, or in alcoves wrought in the massive
wall. As greater security or greater means enabled,
offices and constructions of more importance arose
around its base, inclosing a court. These
necessarily
followed the formation of the rock, until, in
time, the confused and inartificial piles, which are
now seen mouldering on so many of the minor
spurs of the Alps, were created.
As is usual in all ancient holds, the Rittersaal
the Salle des Chevaliersor the knights' hall, of
Blonay, as it is differently called in different
languages
,
was both the largest and the most
laboriously
decorated apartment of the edifice. It was
no longer in the rude gaol-like keep that grew, as
it were, from the living rock, on which it had been
reared with so much skill as to render it difficult to
ascertain where nature ceased and art commenced;
but it had been transferred, a century before the
occurrences related in our tale, to a more modern
portion of the buildings that formed the
south-eastern
angle of the whole construction. The room
was spacious, square, simple, for such is the fashion
of the country, and lighted by windows that looked
on one side towards Valais, and on the other over
the whole of the irregular, but lovely declivity, to
the margin of the Leman, and along that beautiful
sheet, embracing hamlet, village, city, castle, and
purple mountain, until the view was limited by the
Vol. I. Q
hazy Jura. The window on the latter side of the
knights' hall, had an iron balcony at a giddy height
from the ground, and in this airy look-out
Adelheid
had taken her seat, when, after quitting her
father, she mounted to the apartment common to
all the guests of the castle.
We have already alluded generally to the
personal
appearance and to the moral qualities of the
Baron de Willading's daughter, but we now
conceive
it necessary to make the reader more
intimately
acquainted with one who is destined to act
no mean part in the incidents of our tale. It has
been said that she was pleasing to the eye, but her
beauty was of a kind that depended more on
expression
,
on a union of character with feminine
grace, than on the vulgar lines of regularity and
symmetry. While she had no feature that was
defective
,
she had none that was absolutely faultless,
though all were combined with so much harmony,
and the soft expression of the mild blue eye
accorded
so well with the gentle play of a sweet mouth,
that the soul of their owner seemed ready at all
times to appear through these ingenuous tell-tales
of her thoughts. Still, maidenly reserve sate in
constant watch over all, and it was when the
spectator
thought himself most in communion with her
spirit, that he most felt its pure and correcting
influence
.
Perhaps a cast of high intelligence, of a
natural power to discriminate, which much
surpassed
the limited means accorded to females of
that age, contributed their share to hold those near
her in respect, and served in some degree as a mild
and wise repellant, to counteract the attractions of
her gentleness and candor. In short, one cast
unexpectedly
in her society would not have been
slow to infer, and he would have decided
correctly
,
that Adelheid de Willading was a girl of warm
and tender affections, of a playful but regulated
fancy, of a firm and lofty sense of all her duties,
whether natural or merely the result of social
obligations
,
of melting pity, and yet of a habit and
quality to think and act for herself, in all those
cases in which it was fitting for a maiden of her
condition and years to assume such self-control.
It was now more than a year since Adelheid had
become fully sensible of the force of her
attachment
for Sigismund Steinbach, and during all that
time she had struggled hard to overcome a feeling
which she believed could lead to no happy result.
The declaration of the young man himself, a
declaration
that was extorted involuntarily and in a
moment of powerful passion, was accompanied by
an admission of its uselessness and folly, and it
first opened her eyes to the state of her own
feelings
.
Though she had listened, as all of her sex will
listen, even when the passion is hopeless, to such
words coming from lips they love, it was with a
self-command that enabled her to retain her own
secret, and with a settled and pious resolution to
do that which she believed to be her duty to
herself
,
to her father, and to Sigismund. From that
hour she ceased to see him, unless under
circumstances
when it would have drawn suspicion on her
motives to refuse, and while she never appeared to
forget her heavy obligations to the youth, she
firmly
denied herself the pleasure of even mentioning
his name when it could be avoided. But of all
ungrateful and reluctant tasks, that of striving to
forget is the least likely to succeed. Adelheid was
sustained only by her sense of duty and the desire
not to disappoint her father's wishes, to which habit
and custom had given nearly the force of law with
maidens of her condition, though her reason and
judgment no less than her affections were both
strongly enlisted on the other side. Indeed, with
the single exception of the general unfitness of a
union between two of unequal stations, there was
nothing to discredit her choice, if that may be
termed choice which, after all, was more the result
of spontaneous feeling and secret sympathy than of
any other cause, unless it were a certain
equivocal
reserve, and a manifest uneasiness, whenever
allusion was made to the early history and to the
family of the soldier. This sensitiveness on the
part of Sigismund had been observed and
commented
on by others as well as by herself, and it
had been openly ascribed to the mortification of
one who had been thrown, by chance, into an
intimate
association that was much superior to what
he was entitled to maintain by birth; a weakness
but too common, and which few have strength of
mind to resist or sufficient pride to overcome.
The intuitive watchfulness of affection, however,
led Adelheid to a different conclusion; she saw
that he never affected to conceal, while with equal
good taste he abstained from obtrusive allusions to
the humble nature of his origin, but she also
perceived
that there were points of his previous
history
on which he was acutely sensitive, and which
at first she feared must be attributed to the
consciousness
of acts that his clear perception of moral
truth condemned, and which he could wish
forgotten
.
For some time Adelheid clung to this
discovery
as to a healthful and proper antidote to her
own truant inclinations, but native rectitude
banished
a suspicion which had no sufficient ground, as
equally unworthy of them both. The effects of a
ceaseless mental struggle, and of the fruitlessness
of her efforts to overcome her tenderness in behalf
of Sigismund, have been described in the fading of
her bloom, in the painful solicitude of a
countenance
naturally so sweet, and in the settled
melancholy
of her playful and mellow eye. These
were the real causes of the journey undertaken by
her father, and, in truth, of most of the other
events which we are about to describe.
The prospect of the future had undergone a
sudden change. The color, though more the
effect
of excitement than of returning healthfor
the tide of life, when rudely checked, does not
resume
its currents at the first breath of happiness
again brightened her cheek and imparted
brilliancy
to her looks, and smiles stole easily to those
lips which had long been growing pallid with
anxiety
.
She leaned forward from the balcony, and
never before had the air of her native mountains
seemed so balmy and healing. At that moment
the subject of her thoughts appeared on the
verdant
declivity, among the luxuriant nut-trees that
shade the natural lawn of Blonay. He saluted her
respectfully, and pointed to the glorious panorama
of the Leman, The heart of Adelheid beat
violently
;
she struggled for an instant with her fears
and her pride, and then, for the first time in her
life, she made a signal that she wished him to join
her.
Notwithstanding the important service that the
young soldier had rendered to the daughter of the
Baron de Willading, and the long intimacy which
had been its fruit, so great had been the reserve
she had hitherto maintained, by placing a constant
restraint on her inclinations, though the simple
usages
of Switzerland permitted greater familiarity of
intercourse than was elsewhere accorded to
maidens
of rank, that Sigismund at first stood rooted to
the ground, for he could not imagine the waving
of the hand was meant for him. Adelheid saw
his embarrassment, and the signal was repeated.
The young man sprang up the acclivity with the
rapidity of the wind, and disappeared behind the
walls of the castle.
The barrier of reserve, so long and so
successfully
Q 2
observed by Adelheid, was now passed, and
she felt as if a few short minutes must decide her
fate. The necessity of making a wide circuit in
order to enter the court still afforded a little time
for reflection, however, and this she endeavored to
improve by collecting her thoughts and
recovering
her self-possession.
When Sigismund entered the knights' hall, he
found the maiden still seated near the open window
of the balcony, pale and serious, but perfectly
calm, and with such an expression of radiant
happiness
in her countenance as he had not seen
reigning
in those sweet lineaments for many painful
months. The first feeling was that of pleasure at
perceiving how well she bore the alarms and
dangers
of the past night. This pleasure he expressed,
with the frankness admitted by the habits of the
Germans.
Thou wilt not suffer, Adelheid, by the exposure
on the lake! he said, studying her face until the
tell-tale blood stole to her very temples.
Agitation of the mind is a good antidote to the
consequences of bodily exposure. So far from
suffering by what has passed, I feel stronger to-day
and better able to endure fatigue, than at any time
since we came through the gates of Willading.
This balmy air, to me, seems Italy, and I see no
necessity to journey farther in search of what they
said was necessary to my health, agreeable objects
and a generous sun.
You will not cross the St. Bernard! he
exclaimed
in a tone of disappointment,
Adelheid smiled, and he felt encouraged, though
the smile was ambiguous. Notwithstanding the
really noble sincerity of the maiden's disposition,
and her earnest desire to set his heart at ease,
nature
,
or habit, or education, for we scarcely know
to which the weakness ought to be ascribed,
tempted
her to avoid a direct explanation.
Why need one desire aught that is more
lovely
than this? she answered, evasively. Here is
a warm air, such a scene as Italy can scarcely
surpass, and a friendly roof. The experience of
the last twenty-four hours gives little
encouragement
for attempting the St. Bernard,
notwithstanding
the fair promises of hospitality and welcome
that have been so liberally held out by the good
canon.
Thy eye contradicts thy tongue, Adelheid; thou
art happy and well enough to use pleasantry
to-day
.
For heaven's sake, do not neglect to profit
by this advantage, however, under a mistaken
opinion that Blonay is the well-sheltered Pisa.
When the winter shall arrive, thou wilt see that
these mountains are still the icy Alps, and the
winds will whistle through this crazy castle, as
they are wont to sing in the naked corridors of
Willading.
We have time before us, and can think of this.
Thou wilt proceed to Milan, no doubt, as soon as
the revels of Vvey are ended.
The soldier has little choice but duty. My long
and frequent leaves of absence of late,leaves
that have been liberally granted to me on account
of important family-concerns,impose an
additional
obligation to be punctual, that I may not seem
forgetful of favors already enjoyed. Although we
allowe a heavy debt to nature, our voluntary
engagements
have ever seemed to me the most serious.
Adelheid listened with breathless attention.
Never before had he uttered the word family, in
reference to himself, in her presence. The
allusion
appeared to have created unpleasant
recollections
in the mind of the young man himself, for
when he ceased to speak his countenance fell, and
he even appeared to be fast forgetting the presence
of his fair companion. The latter turned
sensitively
from a subject which she saw gave him
pain, and endeavored to call his thoughts to other
things. By an unforeseen fatality, the very
expedient
adopted hastened the explanation she would
now have given so much to postpone.
My father has often extolled the site of the
Baron de Blonay's castle, said Adelheid, gazing
from the window, though all the fair objects of the
view floated unheeded before her eyes: but,
until
now, I have always suspected that friendly
feeling
had a great influence on his descriptions.
You did him injustice then, answered
Sigismund
,
advancing to the opening: of all the
ancient
holds of Switzerland, Blonay is perhaps
entitled
to the palm, for possessing the fairest site.
Regard yon treacherous lake, Adelheid! Can we
fancy that sleeping mirror the same boiling
cauldron
on which we were so lately tossed, helpless
and nearly hopeless?
Hopeless, Sigismund, but for thee!
Thou forgett'st the daring Italian, without
whose coolness and skill we must indeed have
irredeemably
perished.
And what would it be to me if the worthless
bark were saved, while my father and his friend
were abandoned to the frightful fate that befell the
patron and that unhappy peasant of Berne!
The pulses of the young man beat high, for there
was a tenderness in the tones of Adelheid to which
he was unaccustomed, and which, indeed, he had
never before discovered in her voice.
I will go seek this brave mariner, he said,
trembling lest his self-command should be again
lost by the seductions of such a communion:it
is time he had more substantial proofs of our
gratitude.
No, Sigismund, returned the maiden firmly,
and in a way to chain him to the spot, thou must
not quit me yet.I have much to saymuch that
touches my future happiness, and, I am perhaps
weak enough to believe, thine.
Sigismund was bewildered, for the manner of
his companion, though the color went and came
in sudden and bright flashes across her pure brows,
was miraculously calm and full of dignity. He
took the seat to which she silently pointed, and sat
motionless as if carved in stone, his faculties
absorbed
in the single sense of hearing. Adelheid
saw that the crisis was arrived, and that retreat,
without an appearance of levity that her
character
and pride equally forbade, was impossible. The
inbred and perhaps the inherent feelings of her sex
would now have caused her again to avoid the
explanation
,
at least as coming from herself, but that
she was sustained by a high and holy motive.
Thou must find great delight, Sigismund, in
reflecting on thine own good acts to others. But
for thee Melchior de Willading would have long
since been childless; and but for thee his daughter
would now be an orphan. The knowledge that
thou hast had the power and the will to succor
thy friends must be worth all other knowledge!
As connected with thee, Adelheid, it is, he
answered in a low voice: I would not exchange
the secret happiness of having been of this use to
thee, and to those thou lovest, for the throne of the
powerful prince I serve. I have had my secret
wrested from me already, and it is vain attempting
to deny it, if I would. Thou knowest I love thee;
and, in spite of myself, my heart cherishes the
weakness. I rather rejoice, than dread, to say,
that it will cherish it until it cease to feel. This
is more than I ever intended to repeat to thy
modest
ears, which ought not to be wounded by idle
declarations like these, butthou smilest
Adelheid
!can
thy gentle spirit mock at a hopeless
passion!
Why should my smile mean mockery?
Adelheid!naythis never can be. One of
my birthmy ignoble, nameless origin, cannot
even intimate his wishes, with honor, to a lady
of thy name and expectations!
Sigismund, it
can
be. Thou hast not well
calculated
either the heart of Adelheid de Willading,
or the gratitude of her father.
The young man gazed earnestly at the face of
the maiden, which, now that she had disburthened
her soul of its most secret thought, reddened to
the temples, more however with excitement than
with shame, for she met his ardent look with the
mild confidence of innocence and affection. She
believed, and she had every reason so to believe,
that her words would give pleasure, and, with the
jealous watchfulness of true love, she would not
willingly let a single expression of happiness
escape
her. But, instead of the brightening eye,
and the sudden expression of joy that she expected,
the young man appeared overwhelmed with feelings
of a very opposite, and indeed of the most painful,
character. His breathing was difficult, his look
wandered, and his lips were convulsed. He passed
his hand across his brow, like a man in intense
agony, and a cold perspiration broke out, as by a
dreadful inward working of the spirit, upon his
forehead and temples, in large visible drops.
Adelheid  dearest Adelheid  thou knowest
not what thou sayest!One like me can never
become thy husband.
Sigismund!why this distress? Speak to me
ease thy mind by words. I swear to thee that
the consent of my father is accompanied on my
part by a willing heart. I love thee, Sigismund
wouldst thou have mecan I say more?
The young man gazed at her incredulously, and
then, as thought became more clear, as one regards
a much-prized object that is hopelessly lost. He
shook his head mournfully, and buried his face in
his hands.
Say no more, Adelheid  for my sakefor
thine own sake, say no morein mercy, be silent!
Thou never canst be mineNo, nohonor forbids
it; in thee it would be madness, in me dishonor
we can never be united. What fatal weakness
has kept me near theeI have long dreaded this
Dreaded!
Nay, do not repeat my words,for I scarce
know what I say. Thou and thy father have
yielded, in a moment of vivid gratitude, to a
generous
,
a noble impulsebut it is not for me to
profit
by the accident that has enabled me to gain this
advantage. What would all of thy blood, all of
the republic say, Adelheid, were the noblest born,
the best endowed, the fairest, gentlest, best maiden
of the canton, to wed a nameless, houseless, soldier
of fortune, who has but his sword and some gifts
of nature to recommend him? Thy excellent father
will surely think better of this, and we will speak
of it no more!
Were I to listen to the common feelings of my
sex, Sigismund, this reluctance to accept what
both my father and myself offer might cause me
to feign displeasure. But, between thee and me,
there shall be naught but holy truth. My father
has well weighted all these objections, and he has
generously decided to forget them. As for me,
placed in the scale against thy merits, they have
never weighed at all. If thou canst not become
noble in order that we may be equals, I shall find
more happiness in descending to thy level, than by
living in heartless misery at the vain height where
I have been placed by accident.
Blessed, ingenuous girl!But what does it all
avail? Our marriage is impossible.
If thou knowest of any obstacle that would
render it improper for a weak, but virtuous girl
Hold, Adelheid!do not finish the sentence.
I am sufficiently humbledsufficiently debased
without this cruel suspicion.
Then why is our union impossiblewhen my
father not only consents, but wishes it may take
place?
Give me time for thoughtthou shalt know
all, Adelheid, sooner or later. Yes, this is, at the
least, due to thy noble frankness. Thou shouldst
in justice have known it long before.
Adelheid regarded him in speechless
apprehension
,
for the evident and violent physical struggles
of the young man too fearfully announced the
mental agony he endured. The color had fled
from her own face, in which the beauty of
expression
now reigned undisputed mistress; but it was
the expression of the mingled sentiments of
wonder
,
dread, tenderness, and alarm. He saw that
his own sufferings were fast communicating
themselves
to his companion, and, by a powerful effort,
he so far mastered his emotions as to regain a
portion
of his self-command.
This explanation has been too heedlessly
delayed
,
he continued: cost what it may, it shall
be no longer postponed. Thou wilt not accuse me
of cruelty, or of dishonest silence, but remember
the failing of human nature, and pity rather than
blame a weakness which may be the cause of as
much future sorrow to thyself, beloved Adelheid,
as it is now of bitter regret to me. I have never
concealed from thee that my birth is derived from
that class which, throughout Europe, is believed
to be of inferior rights to thine own; on this head,
I am proud rather than humble, for the invidious
distinctions of usage have too often provoked
comparisons, and I have been in situations to know
that the mere accidents of descent bestow neither
personal excellence, superior courage, nor higher
intellect. Though human inventions may serve to
depress the less fortunate, God has given fixed
limits
to the means of men. He that would be greater
than his kind, and illustrious by unnatural
expedients
,
must debase others to attain his end. By
different means than these there is no nobility, and
he who is unwilling to admit an inferiority which
exists only in idea can never be humbled by an
artifice so shallow. On the subject of mere birth,
as it is ordinarily estimated, whether it come from
pride, or philosophy, or the habit of commanding
as a soldier those who might be deemed my
superiors
as men, I have never been very sensitive.
Perhaps the heavier disgrace which crushes me
may have caused this want to appear lighter than
it otherwise might.
Disgrace! repeated Adelheid, in a voice that
was nearly choked. The word is fearful,
coming
from one of thy regulated mind, and as applied
to himself.
I cannot choose another. Disgrace it is by
the common consent of menby long and
enduring
opinionit would almost seem by the just
judgment of God. Dost thou not believe,
Adelheid
,
that there are certain races which are
deemed
accursed, to answer some great and unseen
endraces on whom the holy blessings of Heaven
never descend, as they visit the meek and
well-deserving
that come of other lines!
How can I believe this gross injustice, on the
part of a Power that is wise without bounds, and
forgiving to parental love?
Vol. I. R
Thy answer would be well, were this earth
the universe, or this state of being the last. But
he whose sight extends beyond the grave, who
fashions justice, and mercy, and goodness, on a
scale commensurate with his own attributes, and
not according to our limited means, is not to be
estimated by the narrow rules that we apply to
men. No, we must not measure the ordinances
of God by laws that are plausible in our own eyes.
Justice is a relative and not an abstract quality;
and, until we understand the relations of the
Deity to ourselves as well as we understand our
own relations to the Deity, we reason in the
dark.
I do not like to hear thee speak thus, Sigismund,
and, least of all, with a brow so clouded, and in
a voice so hollow!
I will tell my tale more cheerfully, dearest. I
have no right to make thee the partner of my
misery; and yet this is the manner I have
reasoned
,
and thought, and pondereday, until my brain
has grown heated, and the power to reason itself
has nearly tottered. Ever since that accursed
hour, in which the truth became known to me,
and I was made the master of the fatal secret,
have I endeavored to feel and reason thus.
What truth?what secret?If thou lovest
me, Sigismund, speak calmly and without reserve.
The young man gazed at her anxious face in
a way to show how deeply he felt the weight of
the blow he was about to give. Then, after a pause,
he continued.
We have lately passed through a terrible scene
together, dearest Adelheid. It was one that may
well lessen the distances set between us by human
laws and the tyranny of opinions. Had it been
the will of God that the bark should perish, what
a confused crowd of ill-assorted spirits would have
passed together into eternity! We had them, there,
of all degrees of vice, as of nearly all degrees of
cultivation, from the subtle iniquity of the wily
Neapolitan juggler to thine own pure soul. There
would have died in the Winkelried the noble of
high degree, the reverend priest, the soldier in the
pride of his strength, and the mendicant! Death
is an uncompromising leveller, and the depths of
the lake, at least, might have washed out all our
infamy, whether it came of real demerits or
merely
from received usage; even the luckless
Balthazar
,
the persecuted and hated headsman, might
have found those who would have mourned his
loss.
If any could have died unwept in meeting
such a fate, it must have been one that, in common,
awakes so little of human sympathy; and one too,
who, by dealing himself in the woes of others, has
less claim to the compassion that we yield to most
of our species.
Spare mein mercy, Adelheid, spare me
thou speakest of my father!
CHAPTER XI.
Fortune had smil'd upon Guelberto's birth,
The heir of Valdespesa's rich domain;
An only child, he grew in years and worth,
And well repaid a father's anxious pain.
Southey
.
As Sigismund uttered this communication, so
terrible to the ear of his listener, he arose and fled
from the room. The possession of a kingdom
would not have tempted him to remain and note
its effect. The domestics of Blonary observed his
troubled air and rapid strides as he passed them,
but, too simple to suspect more than the ordinary
impetuosity of youth, he succeeded in getting
through the inferior gate of the castle and into the
fields, without attracting any embarrassing
attention
to his movements. Here he began to breathe
more freely, and the load which had nearly choked
his respiration became lightened. For half an
hour the young man paced the greensward
scarcely
conscious whither he went, until he found that
his steps had again led him beneath the window
of the knights' hall. Glancing an eye upward, he
saw Adelheid still seated at the balcony, and
apparently
yet alone. He thought she had been
weeping, and he cursed the weakness which had
kept him from effecting the often-renewed
resolution
to remove himself, and his cruel fortunes, for
ever from before her mind. A second look,
however
,
showed him that he was again beckoned to
ascend! The revolutions in the purposes of lovers
are sudden and easily effected; and Sigismund,
through whose mind a dozen ill-digested plans of
placing the sea between himself and her he loved
had just been floating, was now hurriedly
retracing
his steps to her presence.
Adelheid had necessarily been educated under
the influence of the prejudices of the age and of
the country in which she lived. The existence of
the office of headsman in Berne, and the nature of
its hereditary duties, were well known to her; and,
though superior to the inimical feeling which had
so lately been exhibited against the luckless
Balthazar
,
she had certainly never anticipated a shock
so cruel as was now produced, by abruptly
learning
that this despised and persecuted being was the
father of the youth to whom she had yielded her
virgin affections. When the words which
proclaimed
the connexion had escaped the lips of
Sigismund
,
she listened like one who fancied that
her ears deceived her. She had prepared herself
to learn that he derived his being from some
peasant
or ignoble artisan, and, once or twice, as he
drew nearer to the fatal declaration, awkward
glimmerings of a suspicion that some repulsive
moral unworthiness was connected with his origin
troubled her-imagination; but her apprehensions
could not, by possibility, once turn in the direction
of the revolting truth. It was some time before
she was able to collect her thoughts, or to reflect
on the course it most became her to pursue. But,
as has been seen, it was long before she could
summon
the self-command to request what she now
saw was doubly necessary, another meeting with
her lover. As both had thought of nothing but his
last words during the short separation, there
appeared
no abruptness in the manner in which he
resumed the discourse, on seating himself at her
side, exactly as if they had not parted at all.
The secret has been torn from me, Adelheid.
The headsman of the canton is my father; were
the fact publicly known, the heartless and obdurate
laws would compel me to be his successor. He
has no other child, except a gentle girlone
innocent
and kind as thou.
Adelheid covered her face with both her hands,
as if to shut out a view of the horrible truth.
Perhaps
an instinctive reluctance to permit her
companion
to discover how great a blow had been
given by this avowal of his birth, had also its
influence
in producing the movement. They who
have passed the period of youth, and who can
recall
those days of inexperience and hope, when the
affections are fresh and the heart is untainted with
too much communion with the world,and,
especially
,
they who know of what a delicate
compound
R 2
of the imaginative and the real the
master-passion
is formed, how sensitively it regards all that
can reflect credit on the beloved object, and with
what ingenuity it endeavors to find plausible
excuses
for every blot that may happen, either by
accident or demerit, to tarnish the lustre of a
picture
that fancy has so largely aided in drawing,
will understand the rude nature of the shock that
she had received. But Adelheid de Willading,
though a woman in the liveliness and fervor of her
imagination, as well as in the proneness to conceive
her own ingenuous conceptions to be more
founded
in reality than a sterner view of things might
possibly have warranted, was a woman also in
the more generous qualities of the heart, and in
those enduring principles, which seem to have
predisposed
the better part of the sex to make the
heaviest sacrifices rather than be false to their
affections
.
While her frame shuddered, therefore,
with the violence and abruptness of the emotions
she had endured, dawnings of the right gleamed
upon her pure mind, and it was not long before
she was able to contemplate the truth with the
steadiness of principle, though it might, at the same
time, have been with much of the lingering
weakness
of humanity. When she lowered her hands,
she looked towards the mute and watchful
Sigismund
,
with a smile that caused the deadly paleness
of her features to resemble a gleam of the sun
lighting upon a spotless peak of her native
mountains
.
It would be vain to endeavor to conceal from
thee, Sigismund, she said, that I could wish this
were not so. I will confess even morethat
when the truth first broke upon me, thy repeated
services, and, what is even less pardonable, thy
tried worth, were for an instant forgotten in the
reluctance I felt to admit that my fate could ever
be united with one so unhappily situated. There
are moments when prejudices and habits are
stronger
than reason; but their triumph is short in
well-intentioned
minds. The terrible injustice of our
laws have never struck me with such force before,
though last night, while those wretched travellers
were so eager for the blood ofof
My father, Adelheid.
Of the author of thy being, Sigismund, she
continued, with a solemnity that proved to the
young man how deeply she reverenced the tie, I
was compelled to see that society might be cruelly
unjust; but now I find its laws and prohibitions
visiting one like thee, so far from joining in its
oppression
,
my soul revolts against the wrong.
Thanksthanksa thousand thanks!
returned
the young man, fervently. I did not expect
less than this from thee, Mademoiselle de
Willading
.
If thou didst not expect morefar more,
Sigismund
,
resumed the maiden, her ashen hue
brightened
to crimson, thou hast scarcely been less
unjust
than the world; and I will add, thou hast
never
understood that Adelheid de Willading, whose
name is uttered with so cold a form. We all have
moments of weakness; moments when the
seductions
of life, the worthless ties which bind together
the thoughtless and selfish in what are called the
interests of the world, appear of more value than
aught else. I am no visionary, to fancy imaginary
and factitious obligations superior to those which
nature and wisdom have createdfor if there be
much unjustifiable cruelty in the practices, there is
also much that is wise in the ordinances, of
society
or
to think that a wayward fancy is to be
indulged at any and every expense to the
feelings
and opinions of others. On the contrary, I
well know that so long as men exist in the
condition
in which they are, it is little more than
common
prudence to respect their habits; and that
ill-assorted
unions, in general, contain in themselves
a dangerous enemy to happiness. Had I always
known thy history, dread of the consequences, or
those cold forms which protect the fortunate,
would probably have interposed to prevent either
from learning much of the other's character.I
say not this, Sigismund, as by thy eye I see thou
wouldst think, in reproach for any deception, for I
well know the accidental nature of our
acquaintance
,
and that the intimacy was forced upon thee
by our own importunate gratitude, but simply, and
in explanation of my own feelings. As it is, we
are not to judge of our situation by ordinary rules,
and I am not now to decide on your pretensions
to my hand merely as the daughter of the Baron
de Willading receiving a proposal from one whose
birth is not noble, but as Adelheid should weigh
the claims of Sigismund, subject to some
diminution
of advantages, if thou wilt, that is perhaps
greater than she had at first anticipated.
Dost thou consider the acceptance of my hand
possible, after what thou knowest! exclaimed the
young man, in open wonder.
So far from regarding the question in that
manner, I ask myself if it will be rightif it be
possible, to reject the preserver of my own life,
the preserver of my father's life, Sigismund
Steinbach
,
because he is the son of one that men
persecute
?
Adelheid!
Do not anticipate my words, said the maiden
calmly, but in a way to check his impatience by
the quiet dignity of her manner. This is an
important
,
I might say a solemn decision, and it has
been presented to me suddenly and without
preparation
.
Thou wilt not think the worse of me, for
asking time to reflect before I give the pledge that,
in my eyes, will be for ever sacred. My father,
believing thee to be of obscure origin, and
thoroughly
conscious of thy worth, dear Sigismund,
authorized me to speak as I did in the beginning
of our interview; but my father may possibly think
the conditions of his consent altered by this
unhappy
exposure of the truth. It is meet that I tell
him all, for thou knowest I must abide by his
decision
.
This thine own sense and filial piety will
approve.
In spite of the strong objectionable facts that he
had just revealed, hope had begun to steal upon the
wishes of the young man, as he listened to the
consoling words of the single-minded and
affectionate
Adelheid. It would scarcely have been
possible
for a youth so endowed by nature, and one
so inevitably conscious of his own value, though
so modest in its exhibition, not to feel encouraged
by her ingenuous and frank admission, as she
betrayed
his influence over her happiness in the
undisguised
and simple manner related. But the
intention
to appeal to her father caused him to view
the subject more dispassionately, for his strong
sense was not slow in pointing out the difference
between the two judges, in a case like his.
Trouble him not, Adelheid; the consciousness
that his prudence denies what a generous feeling
might prompt him to bestow, may render him
unhappy
.
It is impossible that Melchior de Willading
should consent to give an only child to a son of
the headsman of his canton. At some other time,
when the recollections of the late storm shall be
less vivid, thine own reason will approve of his
decision.
His companion, who was thoughtfully leaning
her spotless brow on her hand, did not appear to
hear his words. She had recovered from the shock
given by the sudden announcement of his origin,
and was now musing intently, and with cooler
discrimination
,
on the commencement of their
acquaintance
,
its progress and all its little incidents,
down to the two grave events which had so
gradually and firmly cemented the sentiments of
esteem and admiration in the stronger and indelible
tie of affection.
If thou art the son of him thou namest, why
art thou known by the name of Steinbach, when
Balthazar bears another? demanded Adelheid,
anxious to seize even the faintest hold of hope.
It was my intention to conceal nothing, but to
lay before thee the history of my life, with all the
reasons that may have influenced my conduct,
returned Sigismund: at some other time, when
both are in a calmer state of mind, I shall dare to
entreat a hearing
Delay is unnecessaryit might even be
improper
.
It is my duty to explain every thing to
my father, and he may wish to know why thou
hast not always appeared what thou art. Do not
fancy, Sigismund, that I distrust thy motive, but
the wariness of the old and the confidence of the
young have so little in common!I would rather
that thou told me now.
He yielded to the mild earnestness of her
manner
,
and to the sweet, but sad, smile with which
she seconded the appeal.
If thou wilt hear the melancholy history,
Adelheid
,
he said, there is no sufficient reason why
I should wish to postpone the little it will be
necessary
to say. You are probably familiar with
the laws of the canton, I mean those cruel
ordinances
by which a particular family is condemned,
for a better word can scarcely be found, to
discharge
the duties of this revolting office. This
duty may have been a privilege in the dark ages,
but it is now become a tax that none, who have
been educated with better hopes, can endure to pay.
My father, trained from infancy to expect the
employment
,
and accustomed to its discharge in
contemplation
,
succeeded to his parent while yet
young; and, though formed by nature a meek and
even a compassionate man, he has never shrunk
from his bloody tasks, whenever required to fulfil
them by the command of his superiors. But,
touched
by a sentiment of humanity, it was his wish to
avert from me what his better reason led him to
think the calamity of our race. I am the eldest
born, and, strictly, I was the child most liable to
be called to assume the office, but, as I have heard,
the tender love of my mother induced her to
suggest
a plan by which I, at least, might be rescued
from the odium that had so long been attached to
our name. I was secretly conveyed from the
house while yet an infant; a feigned death
concealed
the pious fraud, and thus far, Heaven be
praised! the authorities are ignorant of my birth!
And thy mother, Sigismund; I have great
respect
for that noble mother, who, doubtless, is
endowed
with more than her sex's firmness and
constancy, since she must have sworn faith and
love to thy father, knowing his duties and the
hopelessness
of their being evaded? I feel a reverence
for a woman so superior to the weaknesses, and
yet so true to the real and best affections, of her
sex!
The young man smiled so painfully as to cause
his enthusiastic companion to regret that she had
put the question.
My mother is certainly a woman not only to
be loved, but in many particulars deeply to be
revered
.
My poor and noble mother has a thousand
excellencies, being a most tender parent, with a
heart so kind that it would grieve her to see injury
done even to the meanest living thing. She was
not a woman, surely, intended by God to be the
mother of a line of executioners!
Thou seest, Sigismund, said Adelheid, nearly
breathless in the desire to seek an excuse for her
own predilections, and to lessen the mental agony
he enduredthou seest that one gentle and
excellent
woman, at least, could trust her happiness
to thy family. No doubt she was the daughter of
some worthy and just-viewing burgher of the
canton
,
that had educated his child to distinguish
between
misfortune and crime?
She was an only child and an heiress, like
thyself
,
Adelheid; he answered, looking about him
as if he sought some object on which he might
cast part of the bitterness that loaded his heart.
Thou art not less the beloved and cherished of
thine own parent than was my excellent mother of
her's!
Sigismund, thy manner is startling!What
wouldst thou say?
Neufchtel, and other countries besides Berne,
have their privileged! My mother was the only
child of the headsman of the first. Thus thou
seest, Adelheid, that I boast my quarterings as
well as another. God be praised! we are not
legally
compelled, however, to butcher the
condemned
of any country but our own!
The wild bitterness with which this was uttered,
and the energy of his language, struck thrilling
chords on every nerve of his listener.
So many honors should not be unsupported;
he resumed. We are rich, for people of humble
wishes, and have ample means of living withou
the revenues of our chargeI love to put forth
our long-acquired honors! The means of a
respectable
livelihood are far from being wanted. I
have told you of the kind intentions of my mother
to redeem one of her children, at least, from the
stigma which weighed upon us all, and the birth
of a second son enabled her to effect this
charitable
purpose, without attracting attention. I was
nursed and educated apart, for many years, in
ignorance
of my birth. At a suitable age,
notwithstanding
the early death of my brother, I was sent
to seek advancement in the service of the house of
Austria, under the feigned name I bear. I will not
tell thee the anguish I felt, Adelheid, when the truth
was at length revealed! Of all the cruelties
inflicted
by society, there is none so unrighteous in its
nature as the stigma it entails in the succession of
crime or misfortune: of all its favors, none can
find so little justification, in right and reason, as
the privileges accorded to the accident of descent.
And yet we are much accustomed to honor
those that come of an ancient line, and to see some
part of the glory of the ancestor even in the most
remote descendant.
The more remote, the greater is the world's
deference. What better proof can we have of
the world's weakness? Thus the immediate child
of the hero, he whose blood is certain, who bears
the image of the father in his face, who has
listened
to his counsels, and may be supposed to have
derived, at least, some portion of his greatness
from the nearness of his origin, is less a prince
than he who has imbibed the current through a
hundred vulgar streams, and, were truth but known,
may have no natural claim at all upon the
much-prized
blood! This comes of artfully leading the
mind to prejudices, and of a vicious longing in
man to forget his origin and destiny, by wishing
to be more than nature ever intended he should
become.
Surely, Sigismund, there is something
justifiable
Vol. I. S
in the sentiment of desiring to belong to the
good and noble!
If good and noble were the same. Thou hast
well designated the feeling; so long as it is truly
a sentiment, it is not only excusable but wise; for
who would not wish to come of the brave, and
honest, and learned, or by what other greatness
they may be known?it is wise, since the legacy
of his virtues is perhaps the dearest incentive that
a good man has for struggling against the
currents
of baser interest; but what hope is left to
one like me, who finds himself so placed that he
can neither inherit nor transmit aught but disgrace!
I do not affect to despise the advantages of birth,
simply because I do not possess them; I only
complain
that artful combinations have perverted what
should be sentiment and taste, into a narrow and
vulgar prejudice, by which the really ignoble
enjoy
privileges greater than those perhaps who are
worthy of the highest honors man can bestow.
Adelheid had encouraged the digression, which,
with one less gifted with strong good sense than
Sigismund, might have only served to wound his
pride, but she perceived that he eased his mind by
thus drawing on his reason, and by setting up that
which should be in opposition to that which was.
Thou knowest, she answered, that neither
my father nor I am disposed to lay much stress on
the opinions of the world, as it concerns thee.
That is, neither will insist on nobility; but will
either consent to share the obloquy of a union with
an hereditary executioner?
Thou hast not yet related all it may be
necessary
to know that we may decide.
There is left little to explain. The expedient
of my kind parents has thus far succeeded. Their
two surviving children, my sister and myself, were
snatched, for a time at least, from their accursed
fortune, while my poor brother, who promised little,
was left, by a partiality I will not stop to examine,
to pass as the inheritor of our infernal privileges
Nay, pardon, dearest Adelheid, I will be more cool;
but death has saved the youth from the execrable
duties, and I am now the only male child of
Balthazar
yes,
he added, laughing frightfully, I,
too, have now a narrow monopoly of all the
honors
of our house!
Thouthou, Sigismundwith thy habits, thy
education, thy feelings, thou surely canst not be
required to discharge the duties of this horrible
office!
It is easy to see that my high privileges do not
charm you, Mademoiselle de Willading; nor can I
wonder at the taste. My chief surprise should be,
that you so long tolerate an executioner in your
presence.
Did I not know and understand the bitterness
of feeling natural to one so placed, this language
would cruelly hurt me, Sigismund; but thou canst
not truly mean there is a real danger of thy ever
being called to execute this duty? Should there
be the chance of such a calamity, may not the
influence
of my father avert it? He is not without
weight in the councils of the canton.
At present his friendship need not be taxed,
for none but my parents, my sister, and thou,
Adelheid, are acquainted with the facts I have just
related. My poor sister is an artless, but an
unhappy
girl, for the well-intentioned design of our
mother has greatly disqualified her from bearing
the truth, as she might have done, had it been kept
constantly before her eyes. To the world, a young
kinsman of my father appears destined to succeed
him, and there the matter must stand until fortune
shall decide differently. As respects my poor
sister, there is some little hope that the evil may be
altogether averted. She is on the point of a
marriage
here at Vvey, that may be the means of
concealing her origin in new ties. As for me,
time must decide my fate.
Why should the truth be ever known!
exclaimed
Adelheid, nearly gasping for breath, in her
eagerness to propose some expedient that should
rescue Sigismund for ever from so odious an office.
Thou sayest that there are ample means in thy
familyrelinquish all to this youth, on condition
that he assume thy place!
I would gladly beggar myself to be quit of
it
Nay, thou wilt not be a beggar while there is
wealth among the de Willadings. Let the final
decision, in respect to other things, be what it may,
this can we at least promise!
My sword will prevent me from being under
the necessity of accepting the boon thou wouldst
offer. With this good sword I can always
command
an honorable existence, should Providence
save me from the disgrace of exchanging it for that
of the executioner. But there exists an obstacle of
which thou hast not yet heard. My sister, who
has certainly no admiration for the honors that
have humiliated our race for so many generations
I might say ageshave we not ancient honors,
Adelheid, as well as thou?my sister is
contracted
to one who bargains for eternal secrecy on this
point, as the condition of his accepting the hand
and ample dowry of one of the gentlest of human
beings! Thou seest that others are not as
generous
as thyself, Adelheid! My father, anxious to
dispose of his child, has consented to the terms,
and as the youth who is next in succession to the
family-honors is little disposed to accept them, and
has already some suspicion of the deception as
respects
her, I may be compelled to appear in order
to protect the offspring of my unoffending sister
from the curse.
This was assailing Adelheid in a point where
she was the weakest. One of her generous
temperament
and self-denying habits could scarce
entertain the wish of exacting that from another
which she was not willing to undergo herself, and
the hope that had just been reviving in her heart
was nearly extinguished by the discovery. Still
she was so much in the habit of feeling under the
guidance of her excellent sense, and it was so
natural
to cling to her just wishes, while there was a
reasonable chance of their being accomplished,
that she did not despair.
Thy sister and her future husband know her
birth, and understand the chances they run.
She knows all this, and such is her generosity,
that she is not disposed to betray me in order to
serve herself. But this self-denial forms an
additional
obligation on my part to declare myself the
wretch I am. I cannot say that my sister is
accustomed
to regard our long-endured fortunes with
all the horror I feel, for she has been longer
acquainted
with the facts, and the domestic habits of
her sex have left her less exposed to the encounter
of the world's hatred, and perhaps she is partly
ignorant of all the odium we sustain. My long
absences in foreign services delayed the confidence
as respects myself, while the yearnings of a mother
towards an only daughter caused her to be received
into the family, though still in secret, several years
before I was told the truth. She is also much my
junior; and all these causes, with some difference
in our education, have less disposed her to misery
than I am; for while my father, with a cruel
kindness
,
had me well and even liberally instructed,
Christine was taught as better became the hopes
and origin of both. Now tell me, Adelheid, that
S 2
thou hatest me for my parentage, and despisest me
for having so long dared to intrude on thy
company
,
with the full consciousness of what I am for
ever present to my thoughts!
I like not to hear thee make these bitter
allusions
to an accident of this nature, Sigismund.
Were I to tell thee that I do not feel this
circumstance
with nearly, if not quite, as much
poignancy
as thyself, added the ingenuous girl, with a
noble frankness, I should do injustice to my
gratitude
and to my esteem for thy character. But
there is more elasticity in the heart of woman
than in that of thy imperious and proud sex. So
far from thinking of thee as thou wouldst fain
believe
,
I see naught but what is natural and
justifiable
in thy reserve. Remember, thou hast not
tempted my ears by professions and prayers, as
women are commonly entreated, but that the
interest
I feel in thee has been modestly and fairly
won. I can neither say nor hear more at present,
for this unexpected announcement has in some
degree
unsettled my mind. Leave me to reflect on
what I ought to do, and rest assured that thou
canst not have a kinder or more partial advocate
of what truly belongs to thy honor and happiness
than my own heart.
As the daughter of Melchior de Willading
concluded
,
she extended her hand with affection to
the young man, who pressed it against his breast
with manly tenderness, when he slowly and
reluctantly
withdrew.
CHAPTER XII.
To know no more
Is woman's happiest knowledge, and her praise.
Milton
.
Our
heroine was a woman in the best meaning
of that endearing, and, we might add,
comprehensive
word. Sensitive, reserved, and at times
even timid, on points that did not call for the
exercise
of higher qualities, she was firm in her
principles
,
constant as she was fond in her affections,
and self-devoted when duty and inclination united
to induce the concession, to a degree that placed
the idea of sacrifice out of the question. On the
other hand, the liability to receive lively
impressions
,
a distinctive feature of her sex, and the
aptitude
to attach importance to the usages by which
she was surrounded, and which is necessarily
greatest in those who lead secluded and inactive
lives, rendered it additionally difficult for her mind
to escape from the trammels of opinion, and to think
with indifference of circumstances which all near
her treated with high respect, or to which they
attached a stigma allied to disgust. Had the case
been reversed, had Sigismund been noble, and
Adelheid a headsman's child, it is probable the
young man might have found the means to indulge
his passion without making too great a sacrifice
of his pride. By transporting his wife to his
castle
,
conferring his own established name,
separating
her from all that was unpleasant and degrading
in the connexion, and finding occupation for his
own mind in the multiplied and engrossing
employments
of his station, he would have diminished
motives for contemplating, and consequently for
lamenting, the objectionable features of the
alliance
he had made. These are the advantages
which nature and the laws of society give to man
over the weaker but the truer sex: and yet how
few would have had sufficient generosity to make
even the sacrifice of feeling which such a course
required! On the other hand, Adelheid would be
compelled to part with the ancient and
distinguished
appellation of her family, to adopt one which
was deemed infamous in the canton, or, if some
politic expedient were found to avert this first
disgrace
,
it would unavoidably be of a nature to
attract
,
rather than to avert, the attention of all who
knew the facts, from the humiliating character of
his origin. She had no habitual relief against the
constant action of her thoughts, for the sphere of
woman narrows the affections in such a way as
to render them most dependent on the little
accidents
of domestic life; she could not close her
doors against communication with the kinsmen of
her husband, should it be his pleasure to command
or his feeling to desire it; and it would become
obligatory on her to listen to the still but
never-ceasing
voice of duty, and to forget, at his request,
that she had ever been more fortunate, or that she
was born for better hopes.
We do not say that all these calculations crossed
the mind of the musing maiden, though she
certainly
had a general and vague view of the
consequences
that were likely to be drawn upon
herself
by a connexion with Sigismund. She sat
motionless
,
buried in deep thought, long after his
disappearance
.
The young man had passed by the
postern around the base of the castle, and was
descending the mountain-side, across the sloping
meadows, with rapid steps, and probably for the
first time since their acquaintance her eye followed
his manly figure vacantly and with indifference.
Her mind was too intently occupied for the
usual observation of the senses. The whole of
that grand and lovely landscape was spread before
her without conveying impressions, as we gaze
into the void of the firmament with our looks on
vacuum. Sigismund had disappeared among the
walls of the vineyards, when she arose, and drew
such a sigh as is apt to escape us after long and
painful meditation. But the eyes of the
high-minded
girl were bright and her cheek flushed,
while the whole of her features wore an
expression
of loftier beauty than ordinarily distinguished
even her loveliness. Her own resolution was
formed. She had decided with the rare and
generous
self-devotion of a female heart that loves,
and which can love in its freshness and purity but
once. At that instant footsteps were heard in the
corridor, and the three old nobles whom we so
lately left on the castle-terrace, appeared together
in the knights' hall.
Melchior de Willading approached his daughter
with a joyous face, for he too had lately gained
what he conceived to be a glorious conquest over
his prejudices, and the victory put him in excellent
humor with himself.
The question is for ever decided, he said,
kissing
the burning forehead of Adelheid with
affection
,
and rubbing his hands, in the manner of one
who was glad to be free from a perplexing doubt.
These good friends agree with me, that, in a case
like this, it becomes even our birth to forget the
origin of the youth. He who has saved the lives
of the two last of the Willadings at least deserves
to have some share in what is left of them. Here
is my good Grimaldi, too, ready to beard me if I
will not consent to let him enrich the brave
fellow
as
if we were beggars, and had not the
means of supporting our kinsman in credit at
home! But we will not be indebted even to so
tried a friend for a tittle of our happiness. The
work shall be all our own, even to the letters of
nobility, which I shall command at an early day
from Vienna; for it would be cruel to let the noble
fellow want so simple an advantage, which will at
once raise him to our own level, and make him as
gooday, by the beard of Luther! better than
the best man in Berne.
I have never known thee niggardly before,
though I have known thee often well intrenched
behind Swiss frugality; said the Signor Grimaldi,
laughing. Thy life, my dear Melchior, may
have excellent value in thine own eyes, but I am
little disposed to set so mean a price on my own,
as thou appearest to think it should command.
Thou hast decided well, I will say nobly, in the
best meaning of the word, in consenting to receive
this brave Sigismund as a son; but thou art not to
think, young lady, because this body of mine is
getting
the worse for use, that I hold it altogether
worthless, and that it is to be dragged from yonder
lake like so much foul linen, and no questions are
to be asked touching the manner in which the
service
has been done. I claim to portion thy
husband
,
that he may at least make an appearance
that becomes the son-in-law of Melchior de
Willading
.
Am I of no value, that ye treat me so
unceremoniously
as to say I shall not pay for my own
preservation?
Have it thine own way, good Gaetanohave
it as thou wilt, so thou dost but leave us the
youth
Father
I will have no maidenly affectation, Adelheid.
I expect thee to receive the husband we offer with
as good a grace as if he wore a crown. It has
been agreed upon between us that Sigismund
Steinbach is to be my son; and from time
immemorial
,
the daughters of our house have submitted,
in these affairs, to what has been advised by the
wisdom of their seniors, as became their sex and
inexperience.
The three old men had entered the hall full of
good-humor, and it would have been sufficiently
apparent, by the manner of the Baron de
Willading
,
that he trifled with Adelheid, had it not been
well known to the others that her feelings were
chiefly consulted in the choice that had just been
made.
But, notwithstanding the high glee in which the
father spoke, the pleasure and buoyancy of his
manner did not communicate itself to the child as
quickly as he could wish. There was far more
than virgin embarrassment in the mien of
Adelheid
.
Her color went and came, and her look
turned from one to the other painfully, while she
struggled to speak. The Signor Grimaldi
whispered
to his companions, and Roger de Blonay
discreetly withdrew, under the pretence that his
services were needed at Vvey, where active
preparations
were making for the Abbaye des
Vignerons
.
The Gnoese would then have followed his
example, but the baron held his arm, while he
turned
an inquiring eye towards his daughter, as if
commanding her to deal more frankly with him.
Father, said Adelheid, in a voice that shook,
in spite of the effort to control her feelings, I
have something important to communicate, before
this acceptance of Herr Steinbach is a matter
irrevocably determined.
Speak freely, my child; this is a tried friend,
and one entitled to know all that concerns us,
especially
in this affair. Throwing aside all
pleasantry
,
I trust, Adelheid, that we are to have no
girlish trifling with a youth like Sigismund; to
whom we owe so much, even to our lives, and in
whose behalf we should be ready to sacrifice every
feeling of prejudice, or habitall that we possess,
ay, even to our pride.
All, father?
I have said all. I will not take back a letter
of the word, though it should rob me of Willading,
my rank in the canton, and an ancient name to
boot. Am I not right, Gaetano? I place the
happiness
of the boy above all other considerations,
that of Adelheid being understood to be so
intimately
blended with his. I repeat it, therefore, all.
It would be well to hear what the young lady
has to say, before we urge this affair any farther;
said the Signor Grimaldi, who, having achieved no
conquest over himself, was not quite so exuberant
in his exultation as his friend; observing more
calmly, and noting what he saw with the clearness
of a cooler-headed and more sagacious man. I
am much in error, or thy daughter has that which
is serious, to communicate.
The paternal affection of Melchior now took the
alarm, and he gave an eager attention to his child.
Adelheid returned his evident solicitude by a smile
of love, but its painful expression was so
unequivocal
as to heighten the baron's fears.
Art not well, love? It cannot be that we have
been deceivedthat some peasant's daughter is
thought worthy to supplant thee? Ha!Signor
Grimaldi, this matter begins, in sooth, to seem
offensive
;but,
old as I amWell, we shall never
know the truth, unless thou speakest franklythis
is a rare business, after all, Gaetanothat a
daughter
of mine should be repulsed by a hind!
Adelheid made an imploring gesture for her
father
to forbear, while she resumed her seat from
farther inability to stand. The two anxious old
men followed her example, in wondering silence.
Thou dost both the honor and modesty of
Sigismund
great injustice, father; resumed the
maiden, after a pause, and speaking with a
calmness
of manner that surprised even herself. If
thou and this excellent and tried friend will give
me your attention for a few minutes, nothing shall
be concealed.
Her companions listened in wonder, for they
plainly saw that the matter was more grave than
either had at first imagined. Adelheid paused
again, to summon force for the ungrateful duty,
and then she succinctly, but clearly, related the
substance of Sigismund's communication. Both
the listeners eagerly caught each syllable that fell
from the quivering lips of the maiden, for she
trembled, notwithstanding a struggle to be calm
that was almost superhuman, and when her voice
ceased they gazed at each other like men
suddenly
astounded by some dire and totally unexpected
calamity. The baron, in truth, could scarcely
believe
that he had not been deceived by a defective
hearing, for age had begun a little to impair that
useful faculty, while his friend admitted the words
as one receives impressions of the most revolting
and disheartening nature.
This is a damnable and fearful fact! muttered
the latter, when Adelheid had altogether ceased to
speak.
Did she say that Sigismund is the son of
Balthazar
,
the public headsman of the canton! asked
the father of his friend, in the way that one
reluctantly
assures himself of some
half-comprehended
and unwelcome truth,of Balthazarof that
family accursed!
Such is the parentage it hath been the will of
God to bestow on the preserver of our lives,
meekly answered Adelheid.
Hath the villain dared to steal into my
family-circle
,
Vol. I. T
concealing this disgusting and disgraceful
fact!Hath he endeavored to engraft the impurity
of his source on the untarnished stock of a noble
and ancient family! There is something exceeding
mere duplicity in this, Signor Grimaldi. There is
a dark and meaning crime.
There is that which much exceeds our means
of remedying, good Melchior. But let us not
rashly blame the boy, whose birth is rather to be
imputed to him as a misfortune than as a crime.
If he were a thousand Balthazars, he has saved all
our lives!
Thou sayest truethou sayest no more than
the truth. Thou wert always of a more reasonable
brain than I, though thy more southern origin
would seem to contradict it. Here, then, are all
our fine fancies and liberal schemes of generosity
blown to the winds!
That is not so evident, returned the Genoese,
who had not failed the while to study the
countenance
of Adelheid, as if he would fully ascertain
her secret wishes. There has been much
discourse
,
fair Adelheid, between thee and the youth
on this matter?
Signore, there has. I was about to
communicate
the intentions of my father; for the
circumstances
in which we were placed, the weight of
our many obligations, the usual distance which
rank interposes between the noble and the simply
born, perhaps justified this boldness in a maiden,
she added, though the tell-tale blood revealed her
shame. I was making Sigismund acquainted
with my father's wishes, when he met my
confidence
by the avowal which I have just related.
He deems his birth?
An insuperable barrier to the connexion.
Sigismund
Steinbach, though so little favored in the
accident of his origin, is not a beggar to sue for
that which his own generous feelings would
condemn
.
And thou?
Adelheid lowered her eyes, and seemed to reflect
on the nature of her answer.
Thou wilt pardon this curiosity, which may
wear too much the aspect of unwarrantable
meddling
,
but my age and ancient friendship, the recent
occurrences, and a growing love for all that
concerns
thee, must plead my excuses. Unless we
know thy wishes, daughter, neither Melchior nor
I can act as we might wish?
Adelheid was long and thoughtfully silent.
Though every sentiment of her heart, and all that
inclination which is the offspring of the warm and
poetical illusions of love, tempted her to declare a
readiness to sacrifice every other consideration to
the engrossing and pure affections of woman,
opinion with its iron gripe still held her in suspense
on the propriety of braving the prejudices of the
world. The timidity of that sex which, however
ready to make an offering of its most cherished
privileges on the shrine of connubial tenderness,
shrinks with a keen sensitiveness from the
appearance
of a forward devotion to the other, had its
weight also, nor could a child so pious altogether
forget the effect her decision might have on the
future happiness of her sole surviving parent.
The Genoese understood the struggle, though he
foresaw its termination, and he resumed the
discourse
himself, partly with the kind wish to give
the maiden time to reflect maturely before she
answered
,
and partly following a very natural train
of his own thoughts.
There is naught sure in this fickle state of
being
;
he continued. Neither the throne, nor
riches, nor health, nor even the sacred affections,
are secure against change. Well may we pause
then and weigh every chance of happiness, ere we
take the last and final step in any great or novel
measure. Thou knowest the hopes with which I
entered life, Melchior, and the chilling
disappointments
with which my career is likely to close. No
youth was born to fairer hopes, nor did Italy know
one more joyous than myself, the morning I
received
the hand of Angiolina; and yet two short
years saw all those hopes withered, this joyousness
gone, and a cloud thrown across my prospects
which has never disappeared. A widowed
husband
,
a childless father, may not prove a bad
counsellor
,
my friend, in a moment when there is so
much doubt besetting thee and thine.
Thy mind naturally returns to thine own
unhappy
child, poor Gaetano, when there is so much
question of the fortunes of mine.
The Signor Grimaldi turned his look on his
friend, but the gleam of anguish, which was wont
to pass athwart his countenance when his mind
was drawn powerfully towards that painful subject,
betrayed that he was not just then able to reply.
We see in all these events, continued the
Genoese, as if too full of his subject to restrain his
words, the unsearchable designs of Providence.
Here is a youth who is all that a father could desire;
worthy in every sense to be the depository of a
beloved and only daughter's weal; manly, brave,
virtuous, and noble in all but the chances of blood,
and yet so accursed by the world's opinion that
we might scarce venture to name him as the
associate
of an idle hour, were the fact known that
he is the man he has declared himself to be!
You put the matter in strong language, Signor
Grimaldi; said Adelheid, starting.
A youth of a form so commanding that a king
might exult at the prospect of his crown
descending
on such a head; of a perfection of strength
and masculine excellence that will almost justify
the dangerous exultation of health and vigor; of
a reason that is riper than his years; of a virtue
of proof; of all qualities that we respect, and which
come of study and not of accident, and yet a
youth condemned of men to live under the
reproach
of their hatred and contempt, or to
conceal
for ever the name of the mother that bore
him! Compare this Sigismund with others that
may be named; with the high-born and pampered
heir of some illustrious house, who riots in men's
respect while he shocks men's morals; who
presumes
on privilege to trifle with the sacred and
the just; who lives for self, and that in base
enjoyments
;
who is fitter to be the lunatic's companion
than any other's, though destined to rule in the
council; who is the type of the wicked, though
called to preside over the virtuous; who cannot
be esteemed, though entitled to be honored; and
let us ask why this is so, what is the wisdom which
hath drawn differences so arbitrary, and which,
while proclaiming the necessity of justice, so openly,
so wantonly, and so ingeniously sets its plainest
dictates at defiance?
Signore, it should not be thusGod never
intended
it should be so!
While every principle would seem to say that
each must stand or fall by his own good or evil
deeds, that men are to be honored as they merit,
every device of human institutions is exerted to
achieve the opposite. This is exalted, because his
ancestry is noble; that condemned for no better
reason than that he is born vile. Melchior!
Melchior
!
our reason is unhinged by subtleties, and
our boasted philosophy and right are no more than
T 2
unblushing mockeries, at which the very devils
laugh!
And yet the commandments of God tell us,
Gaetano, that the sins of the father shall be visited
on the descendants from generation to generation.
You of Rome pay not this close attention,
perhaps
,
to sacred writ, but I have heard it said that
we have not in Berne a law for which good
warranty
cannot be found in the holy volume itself.
Ay, there are sophists to prove all that they
wish. The crimes and follies of the ancestor leave
their physical, or even their moral taint, on the
child, beyond a question, good Melchior;but is
not this sufficient? Are we blasphemously, even
impiously, to pretend that God has not sufficiently
provided for the punishment of the breaches of his
wise ordinances, that we must come forward to
second them by arbitrary and heartless rules of
our own? What crime is imputable to the family
of this youth beyond that of poverty, which
probably
drove the first of his race to the execution of
their revolting office. There is little in the mien
or morals of Sigismund to denote the visitations
of Heaven's wise decrees, but there is everything
in his present situation to proclaim the injustice of
man.
And dost thou, Gaetano Grimaldi, the ally of
so many ancient and illustrious housesthou,
Gaetano
Grimaldi, the honored of Genoadost thou
counsel me to give my only child, the heiress of
my lands and name, to the son of the public
executioner
,
nay, to the very heritor of his disgusting
duties!
There thou hast me on the hip, Melchior; the
question is put strongly, and needs reflection for
an answer. Oh! why is this Balthazar so rich in
offspring, and I so poor? But we will not press the
matter; it is an affair of many sides, and should
be judged by us as men, as well as nobles.
Daughter
,
thou hast just learned, by the words of thy
father, that I am against thee, by position and
heritage
,
for, while I condemn the principle of this
wrong, I cannot overlook its effects, and never
before
did a case of as tangled difficulty, one in which
right was so palpably opposed by opinion, present
itself for my judgment. Leave us, that we may
command ourselves; the required decision exacts
much care, and greater mastery of ourselves than
I can exercise, with that sweet pale face of thine
appealing so eloquently to my heart in behalf of
the noble boy.
Adelheid arose, and first offering her
marble-like
brow to the salutations of both her parents,
for the ancient friendship and strong sympathies
of the Genoese, gave him a claim to this
appellation
in her affections at least, she silently withdrew.
As to the conversation which ensued between the
old nobles, we momentarily drop the curtain, to
proceed to other incidents of our narrative. It
may, however, be generally observed that the day
passed quietly away, without the occurrence of
any event which it is necessary to relate, all in
the chteau, with the exception of the travellers,
being principally occupied by the approaching
festivities
.
The Signor Grimaldi sought an occasion
to have a long and confidential communication with
Sigismund, who, on his part, carefully avoided
being
seen again by her who had so great an
influence
on his feelings, until both had time to recover
their self-command.
CHAPTER XIII.
Hold, hurt him not, for God's sake;he is mad.
Comedy of Errors
.
The
festivals of Bacchus are supposed to have
been the models of those long-continued festivities,
which are still known in Switzerland by the name
of the Abbaye des Vignerons.
This fte was originally of a simple and rustic
character, being far from possessing the labored
ceremonies and classical allegories of a later day,
the severity of monkish discipline most probably
prohibiting the introduction of allusions to the
Heathen mythology, as was afterwards practised;
for certain religious communities that were the
proprietors of large vineyards in that vicinity
appear
to have been the first known patrons of the
custom. So long as a severe simplicity reigned
in the festivities, they were annually observed; but,
when heavier expenses and greater preparations
became necessary, longer intervals succeeded; the
Abbaye, at first, causing its festival to become
triennial, and subsequently extending the period of
vacation to six years. As greater time was
obtained
for the collection of means and inclination,
the festival gained in
clat
, until it came at length
to be a species of jubilee, to which the idle, the
curious, and the observant of all the adjacent
territories
were accustomed to resort in crowds. The
town of Vvey profited by the circumstance, the
usual motive of interest being enlisted in behalf of
the usage, and, down to the epoch of the great
European revolution, there would seem to have
been an unbroken succession of the ftes. The
occasion to which there has so often been allusion,
was one of the regular and long-expected festivals;
and, as report had spoken largely of the
preparations
,
the attendance was even more numerous
than usual.
Early on the morning of the second day after
the arrival of our travellers at the neighboring
castle of Blonay, a body of men, dressed in the
guise of halberdiers, a species of troops then known
in most of the courts of Europe, marched into the
great square of Vvey, taking possession of all its
centre, and posting its sentries in such a manner as
to interdict the usual passages of the place. This
was the preliminary step in the coming festivities;
for this was the spot chosen for the scene of most
of the ceremonies of the day. The curious were
not long behind the guards, and by the time the
sun had fairly arisen above the hills of Fribourg,
some thousands of spectators were pressing in and
about the avenues of the square, and boats from
the opposite shores of Savoy were arriving at each
instant, crowded to the water's edge with peasants
and their families.
Near the upper end of the square, capacious
scaffoldings had been erected to contain those who
were privileged by rank, or those who were able
to buy honors with the vulgar medium; while
humbler preparations for the less fortunate
completed
the three sides of a space that was in the
form of a parallelogram, and which was intended
to receive the actors in the coming scene. The
side next the water was unoccupied, though a
forest of latine spars, and a platform of decks, more
than supplied the deficiency of scaffolding and
room. Music was heard, from time to time,
intermingled
or relieved by those wild Alpine cries
which characterize the songs of the mountaineers.
The authorities of the town were early afoot, and,
as is customary with the important agents of small
concerns, they were exercising their municipal
function with a bustle, which of itself contained
reasonable evidence that they were of no great
moment, and a gravity of mien with which the
chiefs of a state might have believed it possible to
dispense.
The estrade, or stage, erected for the superior
class of spectators was decorated with flags, and
a portion near its centre had a fair display of
tapestry and silken hangings. The
chateau-looking
edifice near the bottom of the square, and
whose windows, according to a common Swiss
and German usage, showed the intermingled stripes
that denoted it to be public property, were also gay
in colors, for the ensign of the Republic floated
over its pointed roofs, and rich silks waved against
the walls. This was the official residence of Peter
Hofmeister, the functionary whom we have already
introduced to the reader.
An hour later, a shot gave the signal for the
various
troupes
to appear, and soon after, parties
of the different actors arrived in the square. As
the little processions approached to the sound of
the trumpet or horn, curiosity became more active,
and the populace was permitted to circulate in
those portions of the square that were not
immediately
required for other purposes. About this
time, a solitary individual appeared on the stage.
He seemed to enjoy peculiar privileges, not only
from his situation, but by the loud salutations and
noisy welcomes with which he was greeted from
the crowd below. It was the good monk of St.
Bernard, who, with a bare head and a joyous
contented
face, answered to the several calls of the
peasants, most of whom had either bestowed
hospitality
on the worthy Augustine, in his many
journeyings among the charitable of the lower
world, or had received it at his hands in their
frequent
passages of the mountain. These
recognitions
and greetings spoke well for humanity; for
in every instance they wore the air of cordial
good-will, and a readiness to do honor to the
benevolent
character of the religious community that
was represented in the person of its clavier or
steward.
Good luck to thee, Father Xavier, and a rich
qute
, cried a burly peasant; thou hast of late
unkindly forgotten Benoit Emery and his. When
did a clavier of St. Bernard ever knock at my door,
and go away with an empty hand? We look for
thee, reverend monk, with thy vessel, to-morrow;
for the summer has been hot, the grapes are rich,
and the wine is beginning to run freely in our tubs.
Thou shalt dip without any to look at thee, and,
take it of which color thou wilt, thou shalt take it
with a welcome.
Thanks, thanks, generous Benoit; St.
Augustine
will remember the favor, and thy fruitful vines
will be none the poorer for thy generosity. We
ask only that we may give, and on none do we
bestow more willingly than on the honest Vaudois,
whom may the saints keep in mind for their
kindness
and good-will!
Nay, I will have none of thy saints; thou
knowest we are St. Calvin's men in Vaud, if there
must be any canonized. But what is it to us that
thou hearest mass, while we love the simple
worship
!
Are we not equally men? Does not the
frost nip the members of Catholic and Protestant
the same? or does the avalanche respect one more
than the other? I never knew thee, or any of thy
convent, question the frozen traveller of his faith,
but all are fed, and warmed, and, at need,
administered
to from the pharmacy, with brotherly care,
and as Christians merit. Whatever thou mayest
think of the state of our souls, thou on thy
mountain
there, no one will deny thy tender services to
our bodies. Say I well, neighbors, or is this only
the foolish gossip of old Benoit, who has crossed
the Col so often, that he has forgotten that our
churches have quarrelled, and that the learned
will have us go to heaven by different roads?
A general movement among the people, and a
tossing of hands, appeared in support of the truth
and popularity of the honest peasant's sentiments,
for in that age the hospice of St. Bernard, more
exclusively a refuge for the real and poor
traveller
than at present, enjoyed a merited reputation
in all the country round.
Thou shalt always be welcome on the pass,
thou and thy friends, and all others in the shape
of men, without other interference in thy opinions
than secret prayers; returned the good-humored
and happy-looking clavier, whose round contented
face shone partly in habitual joy, partly in
gratification
at this public testimonial in favor of the
brotherhood, and a little in satisfaction perhaps at
the promise of an ample addition to the convent's
stores; for the community of St. Bernard, while
so much was going out, had a natural and
justifiable
desire to see some return for its incessant and
unwearied liberality. Thou wilt not deny us the
happiness of praying for those we love, though it
happen to be in a manner different from that in
which they ask blessings for themselves.
Have it thine own way, good canon; I am
none of those who are ready to refuse a favor
because it savors of Rome. But what has
become
of our friend Uberto? He rarely comes
into the valleys, that we are not anxious to see his
glossy coat.
The Augustine gave the customary call, and the
mastiff mounted the stage with a grave deliberate
step, as if conscious of the dignity and usefulness
of the life he led, and like a dog accustomed to
the friendly notice of man. The appearance of
this well-known and celebrated brute caused
another
stir in the throng, many pressing upon the
guards to get a nearer view, and a few casting
fragments of food from their wallets, as tokens of
gratitude and regard. In the midst of this little
by-play of good feeling, a dark shaggy animal
leaped upon the scaffolding, and very cooly
commenced
,
with an activity that denoted the influence
of the keen mountain air on his appetite, picking
up the different particles of meat that had, as yet,
escaped the eye of Uberto. The intruder was
received much in the manner that an unpopular or
an offending actor is made to undergo the
hostilities
of pit and galleries, to revenge some slight
or neglect for which he has forgotten or refused
to atone. In other words, he was incontinently
and mercilessly pelted with such missiles as first
presented themselves. The unknown animal, which
the reader, however, will not be slow in
recognizing
to be the water-dog of Il Maledetto, received
these unusual visitations with some surprise, and
rather awkwardly; for, in his proper sphere,
Nettuno
had been quite as much accustomed to meet
with demonstrations of friendship from the race
he so faithfully served, as any of the far-famed
and petted mastiffs of the convent. After dodging
sundry stones and clubs, as well as a pretty close
attention to the principal matter in hand would
allow
,
and with a dexterity that did equal credit to
his coolness and muscle, a missile of formidable
weight took the unfortunate follower of Maso in
the side, and sent him howling from the stage. At
the next instant, his master was at the throat of
the offender, throttling him till he was black in the
face.
The unlucky stone had come from Conrad.
Forgetful
Vol. I. U
of his assumed character, he had joined in
the hue and cry against a dog whose character
and service should have been sufficiently known
to him, at least, to prove his protection, and had
given the cruelest blow of all. It has been
already
seen that there was little friendship between
Maso and the pilgrim, for the former appeared to
have an instinctive dislike of the latter's calling,
and this little occurrence was not of a character
likely to restore the peace between them.
Thou, too! cried the Italian, whose blood had
mounted at the first attack on his faithful follower,
and which fairly boiled when he witnessed the
cowardly and wanton conduct of this new
assailant
art
not satisfied with feigning prayers and
godliness with the credulous, but thou must even
feign enmity to my dog, because it is the fashion
to praise the cur of St. Bernard at the expense of
all other brutes! Reptile!dost not dread the
arm of an honest man, when raised against thee in
just anger?
FriendsVvaisanshonorable citizens!
gasped the pilgrim, as the gripe of Maso
permitted
breath. I am Conrad, a poor, miserable,
repentant
pilgrimWill ye see me murdered for a
brute?
Such a contest could not continue long in such a
place. At first the pressure of the curious, and
the great density of the crowd, rather favored the
attack of the mariner; but in the end they proved
his enemies by preventing the possibility of
escaping
from those who were especially charged with
the care of the public peace. Luckily for Conrad,
for passion had fairly blinded Maso to the
consequences
of his fury, the halberdiers soon forced
their way into the centre of the living mass, and
they succeeded in seasonably rescuing him from
the deadly gripe of his assailant. Il Maledetto
trembled with the reaction of this hot sally, the
moment his gripe was forcibly released, and he
would have disappeared as soon as possible, had
it been the pleasure of those into whose hands he
had fallen to permit so politic a step. But now
commenced the war of words, and the clamor of
voices, which usually succeed, as well as precede,
all contests of a popular nature. The officer in
charge of this portion of the square questioned;
twenty answered in a breath, not only drowning
each other's voices, but effectually contradicting
all that was said in the way of explanation. One
maintained that Conrad had not been content with
attacking Maso's dog, but that he had followed up
the blow by offering a personal indignity to the
master himself; this was the publican in whose
house the mariner had taken up his abode, and in
which he had been sufficiently liberal in his
expenditure
fairly to entitle him to the hospitable
support
of its landlord. Another professed his
readiness
to swear that the dog was the property of the
pilgrim, being accustomed to carry his wallet, and
that Maso, owing to an ancient grudge against
both master and beast, had hurled the stone which
sent the animal away howling, and had resented a
mild remonstrance of its owner in the
extraordinary
manner that all had seen. This witness was
the Neapolitan juggler, Pippo, who had much
attached
himself to the person of Conrad since the
adventure of the bark, and who was both ready
and willing to affirm anything in behalf of a friend
who had so evident need of his testimony, if it
were only on the score of boon-companionship.
A third declared that the dog belonged truly to the
Italian, that the stone had been really hurled by
one who stood near the pilgrim, who had been
wrongfully accused of the offence by Maso; that
the latter had made his attack under a false
impression
,
and richly merited punishment for the
unceremonious manner in which he had stopped
Conrad's breath. This witness was perfectly
honest
,
but of a vulgar and credulous mind. He
attributed
the original offence to one near that
happened
to have a bad name, and who was very
liable
to father every sin that, by possibility, could be
laid at his door, as well as some that could not.
On the other hand, he had also been duped that
morning by the pilgrim's superabundant
professions
of religious zeal, a circumstance that of itself
would have prevented him from detecting Conrad's
arm in the air as it cast the stone, and which
served greatly to increase his certainty that the first
offence came from the luckless wight just alluded
to; since they who discriminate under general
convictions and popular prejudices, usually heap
all the odium they pertinaciously withhold from the
lucky and the favored, on those who seem fated by
general consent to be the common target of the
world's darts.
The officer, by the time he had deliberately
heard the three principal witnesses, together with
the confounding explanations of those who
professed
to be only half-informed in the matter, was
utterly at a loss to decide which had been right
and which wrong. He came, therefore, to the
safe conclusion to send all the parties to the
guard-house
,
including the witnesses, being quite sure
that he had hit on an effectual method of visiting
the true criminal with punishment, and of
admonishing
all those who gave evidence in future to
have a care of the manner in which they
contradicted
each other. Just as this equitable decision
was pronounced, the sound of a trumpet
proclaimed
the approach of a division of the principal
mummers
,
if so irreverent a term can be applied to men
engaged in a festival as justly renowned as that of
the vine-dressers. This announcement greatly
quickened the steps of Justice, for they who were
charged with the execution of her decrees felt the
necessity of being prompt, under the penalty of
losing an interesting portion of the spectacle.
Actuated by this new impulse, which, if not as
respectable, was quite as strong, as the desire to
do right, the disturbers of the peace, even to those
who had shown a quarrelsome temper by telling
stories that gave each other the lie, were hurried
away in a body, and the public was left in the
enjoyment
of that tranquillity which, in these
perilous
times of revolution and changes, is thought to
to be so necessary to its dignity, so especially
favorable to commerce, and so grateful to those
whose duty it is to preserve the public peace with
as little inconvenience to themselves as possible.
A blast of the trumpet was the signal for a more
general movement, for it announced the
commencement
of the ceremonies. As it will be presently
necessary to speak of the different personages who
were represented on this joyous occasion, we shall
only say here, that group after group of the actors
came into the square, each party marching to the
sound of music from its particular point of
rendezvous
to the common centre. The stage now began
to fill with the privileged, among whom were many
of the high aristocracy of the ruling canton, most
of its officials, who were too dignified to be more
than complacent spectators of revels like these,
many nobles of mark from France and Italy, a
few travellers from England, for in that age
England
was deemed a distant country and sent forth
but a few of her
lite
to represent her on such
occasions, most of those from the adjoining
territories
who could afford the time and cost, and who
by rank or character were entitled to the
distinction
,
and the wives and families of the local officers
U 2
who happened to be engaged as actors in the
representation
.
By the time the different parts of the
principal procession were assembled in the square,
all the seats of the estrade were crowded, with
the exception of those reserved for the bailiff and
his immediate friends.
CHAPTER XIV.
So once were ranged the sons of ancient Rome,
A noble show! While Roscius trod the stage.
Cowper
.
The
day was not yet far advanced, when all
the component parts of the grand procession had
arrived in the square. Shortly after, a flourish of
clarions gave notice of the approach of the
authorities
.
First came the bailiff, filled with the dignity
of station, and watching, with a vigilant but covert
eye, every indication of feeling that might prove
of interest to his employers, even while he most
affected sympathy with the occasion and
self-abandonment
to the follies of the hour; for Peter
Hofmeister
owed his long-established favor with the
brgerschaft more to a never-slumbering regard
to its exclusive interests and its undivided
supremacy
,
than to any particular skill in the art of
rendering
men comfortable and happy. Next to the
worthy bailiff, for apart from an indomitable
resolution
to maintain the authority of his masters, for
good or for evil, the Herr Hofmeister merited the
appellation of a worthy man, came Roger de
Blonay
and his guest the Baron de Willading,
marching
,
pari passu
, at the side of the representative of
Berne himself. There might have been some
question how far the bailiff was satisfied with this
arrangement of the difficult point of etiquette, for
he issued from his own gate with a sort of
side-long
movement that kept him nearly confronted
to the Signor Grimaldi, though it left him the
means of choosing his path and of observing the
aspect of things in the crowd. At any rate, the
Genoese, though apparently occupying a
secondary
station, had no grounds to complain of
indifference
to his presence. Most of the observances
and not a few of the sallies of honest Peter, who
had some local reputation as a joker and a
bel
esprit
, as is apt to be the case with your municipal
magistrate, more especially when he holds his
authority independently of the community with
whom he associates, and perhaps as little likely to
be the fact when he depends on popular favor for
his rank, were addressed to the Signor Grimaldi.
Most of these good things were returned in kind,
the Genoese meeting the courtesies like a man
accustomed to be the object of peculiar attentions,
and possibly like one who rather rioted in the
impunity
from ceremonies and public observation,
that he now happened to enjoy. Adelheid, with a
maiden of the house of Blonay, closed the little
train.
As all commendable diligence was used by the
officers of the peace to make way for the bailiff,
Herr Hofmeister and his companions were soon
in their allotted stations, which, it is scarcely
necessary
to repeat, were the upper places on the
estrade. Peter had seated himself, after returning
numerous salutations, for none in a situation to
catch his eye neglected so fair an opportunity to
show their intimacy with the bailiff, when his
wandering
glance fell upon the happy visage of Father
Xavier. Rising hastily, the bailiff went through
a multitude of the formal ceremonies that
distinguished
the courtesy of the place and period, such
as frequent wavings and liftings of the beaver,
profound reverences, smiles that seemed to flow
from the heart, and a variety of other tokens of
extraordinary love and respect. When all were
ended, he resumed his place by the side of
Melchior
de Willading, with whom he commenced a
confidential dialogue.
We know not, noble Freiherr, (he spoke in
the vernacular of their common canton,) whether
we have most reason to esteem or to disrelish these
Augustines. While they do so many Christian acts
to the travellers on their mountain yonder, they
are devils incarnate in the way of upholding popery
and its abominations among the people. Look you,
the commonaltyGod bless them as they deserve!
have no great skill at doctrinal discussions, and
are much disposed to be led away by appearances.
Numberless are the miserable dolts who fancy the
godliness which is content to pass its time on the
top of a frozen hill, doing good, feeding the
hungry
,
dressing the wounds of the fallen, andbut
thou knowest the manner in which these sayings
runthe ignorant, as I was about to add, are but
too ready to believe that the religion which leads
men to do this, must have some savor of Heaven
in it, after all!
Are they so very wrong, friend Peter, that we
were wise to disturb the monks in the enjoyment
of a favor that is so fairly earned?
The bailiff looked askance at his brother burgher,
for such was the humble appellation that aristocracy
assumed in Berne, appearing desirous to probe the
depth of the other's political morals before he spoke
more freely.
Though of a house so honored and trusted, I
believe thou art not much accustomed of late to
mingle with the council? he evasively observed.
Since the heavy losses in my family, of which
thou may'st have heard, the care of this sole
surviving
child has been my principal solace and
occupation
.
I know not whether the frequent and
near sight of death among those so tenderly loved
may have softened my heart towards the
Augustines
,
but to me theirs seems a self-denying and a
right worthy life.
'Tis doubtless as you say, noble Melchior, and
we shall do well to let our love for the holy canons
be seen. Ho! Mr. Officerdo us the favor to
request the reverend monk of St. Bernard to draw
nearer, that the people may learn the esteem in
which their patient charities and never-wearying
benevolence are held by the lookers-on. As you
will have occasion to pass a night beneath the
convent's
roof, Herr von Willading, in your journey
to Italy, a little honor shown to the honest and
pains-taking clavier will not be lost on the
brotherhood
,
if these churchmen have even a decent
respect for the usages of their fellow-creatures.
Father Xavier took the proffered place, which
was nearer to the person of the bailiff than the
one he had just quitted, and insomuch the more
honorable, with the usual thanks, but with a
simplicity
which proved that he understood the
compliment
to be due to the fraternity of which he
was a member, and not to himself. This little
disposition
made, as well as all other preliminary
matters properly observed, the bailiff seemed
satisfied
with himself and his arrangements, for the
moment.
The reader must imagine the stir in the throng,
the importance of the minor agents appointed to
marshal the procession, and the mixture of
weariness
and curiosity that possessed the spectators,
while the several parts of so complicated and
numerous
a train were getting arranged, each in its
prescribed order and station. But, as the
ceremonies
which followed were of a peculiar character,
and have an intimate connexion with the events of
the tale, we shall describe them with a little detail,
although the task we have allotted to ourselves is
less that of sketching pictures of local usages, and
of setting before the reader's imagination scenes
of real or fancied antiquarian accuracy, than the
exposition of a principle, and the wholesome moral
which we have always flattered ourselves might,
in a greater or less degree, follow from our labors.
A short time previously to the commencement
of the ceremonies, a guard of honor, composed of
shepherds, gardners, mowers, reapers,
vine-dressers
,
escorted by halberdiers and headed by music,
had left the square in quest of the abb, as the
regular and permanent presiding officer of the
abbaye
,
or company, is termed. This escort, all the
individuals of which were dressed in character,
was not long in making its appearance with the
officer in question, a warm, substantial citizen and
proprietor of the place, who, otherwise attired in
the ordinary costume of his class in that age, had
decorated his beaver with a waving plume, and,
in addition to a staff or baton, wore a flowing
scarf pendent from his shoulder. This personage,
on whom certain judicial functions had devolved,
took a convenient position in the front of the stage,
and soon made a sign for the officials to proceed
with their duties.
Twelve vine-dressers led by a chief, each having
his person more or less ornamented with garlands
of vine-leaves, and bearing other emblems of his
calling, marched in a body, chanting a song of the
fields. They escorted two of their number who
had been pronounced the most skilful and
successful
in cultivating the vineyards of the adjacent
ctes. When they reached the front of the estrade,
the abb pronounced a short discourse in honor of
the cultivators of the earth in general, after which
he digressed into especial eulogiums on the
successful
candidates, two pleased, abashed, and
unpractised
peasants, who received the simple prizes
with throbbing hearts. This little ceremony
observed
,
amid the eager and delightful gaze of
friends, and the oblique and discontented regards
of the few whose feelings were too contracted to
open to the joys of others, even on this simple and
grateful festival, the trumpets sounded again, and
the cry was raised to make room.
A large group advanced from among the body
of the actors to an open space, of sufficient size
and elevation, immediately in front of the stage.
When in full view of the multitude, those who
composed
it arranged themselves in a prescribed and
seemly order. They were the officials of Bacchus.
The high-priest, robed in a sacrificial dress, with
flowing beard, and head crowned with the vine,
stood foremost, chanting in honor of the craft of
the vine-dresser. His song also contained a few
apposite allusions to the smiling blushing candidates.
The whole joined in the chorus, though the leader
of the band scarce needed the support of any other
lungs than those with which he had been very
amply furnished by nature.
The hymn ended, a general burst of
instrumental
music succeeded; and, the followers of Bacchus
regaining their allotted station, the general
procession
began to move, sweeping around the whole
area of the square in a manner to pass in order
before the bailiff.
The first body in the march was composed of
the council of the abbaye, attended by the
shepherds
and gardeners. One in an antique costume,
and bearing a halberd, acted as marshal. He was
succeeded by the two crowned vine-dressers, after
whom came the abb with his counsellors, and
large groups of shepherds and shepherdesses, as
well as a number of both sexes who toiled in
gardens, all attired in costumes suited to the
traditions
of their respective pursuits. The marshal
and the officers of the abbaye moved slowly past,
with the gravity and decorum that became their
stations, occasionally halting to give time for the
evolutions of those who followed; but the other
actors now began in earnest to play their several
parts. A group of young shepherdesses, clad in
closely fitting vests of sky-blue with skirts of white,
each holding her crook, came forward dancing,
and singing songs that imitated the bleatings of
their flocks and all the other sounds familiar to
the elevated pasturages of that region. These were
soon joined by an equal number of young shepherds
also singing their pastorals, the whole exhibiting
an active and merry group of dancers, accustomed
to exercise their art on the sward of the Alps;
for, in this festival, although we have spoken of
the performers as actors, it is not in the literal
meaning of the term, since, with few exceptions,
none appeared to represent any other calling than
that which, in truth, formed his or her daily
occupation
.
We shall not detain the narrative to
say more of this party, than that they formed a
less striking exception to the conventional picture
of the appearance of those engaged in tending
flocks, than the truth ordinarily betrays; and that
their buoyant gaiety, blooming faces, and
unwearied
action, formed a good introductory
preparation
for the saltation that was to follow.
The male gardeners appeared in their aprons,
carrying spades, rakes, and the other implements
of their trade; the female supporting baskets on
their heads filled with rich flowers, vegetables, and
fruits. When in front of the bailiff, the young
men formed a sort of fasces of their several
implements
,
with a readiness that denoted much study,
while the girls arranged their baskets in a circle
at its foot. Then, joining hands, the whole whirled
around, filling the air with a song peculiar to their
pursuits.
During the whole of the preparations of the
morning, Adelheid had looked on with a vacant
eye, as if her feelings had little connexion with that
which was passing before her face. It is scarcely
necessary to say, that her mind, in spite of herself,
wandered to other scenes, and that her truant
thoughts were busy with interests very different
from those which were here presented to the senses.
But, by the time the group of gardeners had passed
dancing away, her feelings began to enlist with
those who were so evidently pleased with
themselves
and all around them, and her father, for the
first time that morning, was rewarded for the deep
attention with which he watched the play of her
features, by an affectionate and natural smile.
This goes off right merrily, Herr Bailiff;
exclaimed
the baron, animated by that encouraging
smile, as the blood is quickened by a genial ray of
the sun's heat when it has been long chilled and
deadened by cold.This goes off with a joyful
will, and is likely to end with credit to thy town!
I only wonder that you have not more of this, and
monthly. When joy can be had so cheap, it is
churlish to deny it to a people.
We complain not of the levities, noble
Freiherr
,
for your light thinker makes a sober and
dutiful subject; but we shall have more of this,
and of a far better quality, or our time is wasted.
What is thought at Berne, noble Melchior, of
the prospects of the Emperor's obtaining a new
concession for the levy of troops in our cantons?
I cry thy mercy, good Peterchen, but by thy
Vol. I. V
leave, we will touch on these matters more at our
leisure. Boyish though it seem to thy eyes, so long
accustomed to look at matters of state, I do confess
that these follies begin to have their entertainment,
and may well claim an hour of idleness from him
that has nothing better in hand.
Peter Hofmeister ejaculated a little expressively.
He then examined the countenance of the Signor
Grimaldi, who had given himself to the merriment
with the perfect good-will and self-abandonment
of a man of strong intellect, and who felt his
powers too sensibly to be jealous of appearances.
Shrugging his shoulders, like one that was
disappointed
,
the pragmatical bailiff turned his look
towards the revellers, in order to detect, if possible,
some breach of the usages of the country, that
might require official reproof; for Peter was of
that class of governors who have an itching to see
their fingers stirring even the air that is breathed
by the people, lest they should get it of a quality
or in a quantity that might prove dangerous to a
monopoly which it is now the fashion to call the
conservative principle. In the mean time the revels
proceeded.
No sooner had the gardeners quitted the arena,
than a solemn and imposing train appeared to
occupy
the sward. Four females marched to the
front, bearing an antique altar that was decorated
with suitable devices. They were clad in
emblematical
dresses, and wore garlands of flowers
on their heads. Boys carrying censers preceded
an altar that was dedicated to Flora, and her
ministering official came after it, mitred and
carrying
flowers. Like all the priestesses that
followed
,
she was laboriously attired in the robes
that denoted her sacred duty. The goddess
herself
was borne by four females on a throne
canopied
by flowers, and from whose several parts
sweeping festoons of every hue and die descended
to the earth. Haymakers of both sexes, gay and
pastoral in their air and attire, succeeded, and a
car groaning with the sweet-scented grass of the
Alps, accompanied by females bearing rakes,
brought up the rear.
The altar and the throne being deposited on the
sward, the priestess offered sacrifice, hymning the
praise of the goddess with mountain lungs. Then
followed the dance of the haymakers, as in the
preceding exhibition, and the train went off as
before.
Excellent well, and truer than it could be done
by your real pagan! cried the bailiff, who, in spite
of his official longings, began to watch the
mummery
with a pleased eye. This beateth greatly
our youthful follies in the Genoese and Lombard
carnivals, in which, to say truth, there are
sometimes
seen rare niceties in the way of representing
the old deities.
Is it the usage, friend Hofmeister, demanded
the baron, to enjoy these admirable pleasantries
often here in Vaud?
We partake of them, from time to time, as
the abbaye desires, and much as thou seest. The
honorable Signor Grimaldiwho will pardon me
that he gets no better treatment than he receives,
and who will not fail to ascribe what, to all who
know him, might otherwise pass for inexcusable
neglect, to his own desire for privacyhe will tell
us, should he be pleased to honor us with his real
opinion, that the subject is none the worse for
occasions
to laugh and be gay. Now, there is
Geneva
,
a town given to subtleties as ingenious and
complicated as the machinery of their own
watches
;
it can never have a merrymaking without a
leaven of disputation and reason, two as damnable
ingredients in the public humor as schism in
religion
,
or two minds in a
mnage
. There is not a
knave in the city who does not fancy himself a
better man than Calvin, and some there are who
believe if they are not cardinals, it is merely
because
the reformed church does not relish legs
cased in red stockings. By the word of a bailiff!
I would not be the ruler, look ye, of such a
community
,
for the hope of becoming Avoyer of Berne
itself. Here it is different. We play our antics
in the shape of gods and goddesses like sober
people
,
and, when all is over, we go train our vines,
or count our herds, like faithful subjects of the great
canton. Do I state the matter fairly to our friends,
Baron de Blonay?
Roger de Blonay bit his lip, for he and his had
been of Vaud a thousand years, and he little
relished
the allusion to the quiet manner in which his
countrymen submitted to a compelled and foreign
dictation. He bowed a cold acquiescence to the
bailiff's statement, however, as if no farther answer
were needed.
We have other ceremonies that invite our
attention
,
said Melchior de Willading, who had
sufficient
acquaintance with his friend's opinions to
understand his silence.
The next group that approached was composed
of those who lived by the products of the dairy.
Two cowherds led their beasts, the monotonous
tones of whose heavy bells formed a deep and
rural accompaniment to the music that regularly
preceded each party, while a train of dairy-girls,
and of young mountaineers of the class that tend
the herds in the summer pasturages, succeeded, a
car loaded with the implements of their calling
bringing up the rear. In this little procession, no
detail of equipment was wanting. The
milking-stool
was strapped to the body of the dairyman;
one had the peculiarly constructed pail in his hand,
while another bore at his back the deep wooden
vessel in which milk is carried up and down the
precipices to the chlet. When they reached the
sodded arena, the men commenced milking the
cows, the girls set in motion the different processes
of the dairy, and the whole united in singing the
Ranz des Vaches of the district. It is generally
and erroneously believed that there is a particular
air which is known throughout Switzerland by
this name, whereas in truth nearly every canton
has its own song of the mountains, each varying
from the others in the notes, as well as in the
words, and we might almost add in the language.
The Ranz des Vaches of Vaud is in the patois of
the country, a dialect that is composed of words
of Greek and Latin origin, mingled on a
foundation
of Celtic. Like our own familiar tune, which
was first bestowed in derision, and which a glorious
history has enabled us to continue in pride, the
words are far too numerous to be repeated. We
shall, however, give the reader a single verse of
a song which Swiss feeling has rendered so
celebrated
,
and which is said often to induce the
mountaineer in foreign service to desert the
mercenary
standard and the tame scenes of towns, to
return to the magnificent nature that haunts his
waking imagination and embellishes his dreams.
It will at once be perceived that the power of
this song is chiefly to be found in the
recollections
to which it gives birth, by recalling the
simple charms of rural life, and by reviving the
indelible impressions that are made by nature
wherever she has laid her hand on the face of the
earth with the same majesty as in Switzerland.
Le zermailli dei Colombett
D bon matin, s san lha.
Refrain
.
Ha, ah! ha, ah!
V 2
Liauba! Liauba! por aria.
Venid tot
Bllantz' et naire,
Rodz et motaile,
Dzjouvan' et etro
Dez ou tzehano,
Io vo z' ario
Dezo ou triembllo,
Io e triudzo,
Liauba! Liauba! por aris.
[2]
[2]
The cowherds of the Alps
Arise at an early hour.
Chorus
.
Ha, ah! ha, ah!
Liauba! Liauba! in order to milk.
Come all of you,
Black and white,
Red and mottled,
Young and old;
Beneath this oak
I am about to milk you,
Beneath this poplar,
I am about to press,
Liauba! Liauba! in order to milk.
The music of the mountains is peculiar and wild,
having most probably received its inspiration from
the grandeur of the natural objects. Most of the
sounds partake of the character of echoes, being
high-keyed but false notes; such as the rocks send
back to the valleys, when the voice is raised above
its natural key in order to reach the caverns and
savage recesses of inaccessible precipices. Strains
like these readily recall the glens and the
magnificence
amid which they were first heard, and hence,
by an irresistible impulse, the mind is led to indulge
in the strongest of all its sympathies, those which
are mixed with the unalloyed and unsophisticated
delights of buoyant childhood.
The herdsmen and dairymaids no sooner uttered
the first notes of this magic song, than a deep and
breathing stillness pervaded the crowd. As the
peculiar strains of the chorus rose on the ear,
murmuring
echoes issued from among the spectators,
and ere the wild intonations could be repeated
which accompanied the words Liauba! Liauba!
a thousand voices were lifted simultaneously, as it
were, to greet the surrounding mountains with the
salutations of their children. From that moment
the remainder of the Ranz des Vaches was a
common
burst of enthusiasm, the offspring of that
national
fervor, which forms so strong a link in the
social chain, and which is capable of recalling to
the bosom that, in other respects, has been
hardened
by vice and crime, a feeling of some of the
purest sentiments of our nature.
The last strain died amid this general exhibition
of healthful feeling. The cowherds and the
dairy-girls
collected their different implements, and
resumed
their march to the melancholy music of the
bells, which formed a deep contrast to the wild
notes that had just filled the square.
To these succeeded the fellowers of Ceres, with
the altar, the priestess, and the enthroned goddess,
as has been already described in the approach of
Flora. Cornucopi ornamented the chair of the
deity, and the canopy was adorned with the gifts
of autumn. The whole was surmounted by a sheaf
of wheat. She held the sickle as her sceptre, and
a tiara composed of the bearded grain covered her
brow. Reapers followed, bearing emblems of the
season of abundance, and gleaners closed the train.
There was the halt, the chant, the chorus, and the
song in praise of the beneficent goddess of autumn,
as had been done by the votaries of the deity of
flowers. A dance of the reapers and gleaners
followed
,
the threshers flourished their flails, and the
whole went their way.
After these came the grand standard of the
abbaye
,
and the vine-dressers, the real objects of the
festival, succeeded. The laborers of the spring
led the advance, the men carrying their picks and
spades, and the women vessels to contain the
cuttings
of the vines. Then came a train bearing
baskets loaded with the fruit, in its different
degrees
of perfection and of every shade of color.
Youths holding staves topped with minature
representations
of the various utensils known in the
culture of the grape, such as the laborer with the
tub on his back, the butt, and the vessel that first
receives the flowing juice, followed. A great
number
of men, who brought forward the forge that is
used to prepare the tools, closed this part of the
exhibition. The song and the dance again
succeeded
,
when the whole disappeared at a signal
given by the approaching music of Bacchus. As
we now touch upon the most elaborate part of the
representation, we seize the interval that is
necessary
to bring it forward, in order to take breath
ourselves.
CHAPTER XV.
And thou, O wall, O sweet, O lovely wall,
That stand'st between her father's ground and mine
Thou wall, O wall, O sweet and lovely wall,
Show me thy chink, to blink through with mine eyne.
Midsummer Night's Dream
:
'
Odds
my life, but this goes off with a grace,
brother Peter! exclaimed the Baron de Willading,
as he followed the vine-dressers in their retreat,
with an amused eyeIf we have much more like
it, I shall forget the dignity of the brgerschaft,
and turn mummer with the rest, though my good
name for wisdom were the forfeit of the folly.
That is better said between ourselves than
performed
before the vulgar eye, honorable Melchior.
It would sound ill, of a truth, were these Vaudois
to boast that a noble of thy estimation in Berne
were thus to forget himself!
None of this!are we not here to be merry,
and to laugh, and to be pleased with any folly that
offers? A truce, then, to thy official distrusts and
superabundant dignity, honest Peterchen, for such
was the good-natured name by which the worthy
bailiff was most commonly addressed by his friend;
let the tongue freely answer to the heart, as if
we were boys rioting together, as was once the
case, long ere thou wert thought of for this office,
or I knew a sorrowful hour.
The Signor Grimaldi shall judge between us:
I maintain that restraint is necessary to those in
high trusts.
I will decide when the actors have all played
their parts, returned the Genoese, smiling; at
present, here cometh one to whom all old soldiers
pay homage. We will not fail of respect in so
great a presence, on account of a little difference
in taste.
Peter Hofmeister was not a small drinker, and
as the approach of the god of the cup was
announced
by a flourish from some twenty instruments
made to speak on a key suited to the vault of
heaven, he was obliged to reserve his opinions for
another time. After the passage of the musicians,
and a train of the abbaye's servants, for especial
honors were paid to the ruby deity, there came
three officials of the sacrifice, one leading a goat
with gilded horns, while the two others bore the
knife and the hatchet. To these succeeded the
altar adorned with vines, the incense-bearers, and
the high-priest of Bacchus, who led the way for
the appearance of the youthful god himself. The
deity was seated astride on a cask, his head
encircled
with a garland of generous grapes, bearing a
cup in one hand, and a vine entwined and
fruit-crowned
sceptre in the other. Four Nubians
carried
him on their shoulders, while others shaded
his form with an appropriate canopy; fauns
wearing
tiger-skins, and playing their characteristic
antics, danced in his train, while twenty laughing
and light-footed Bacchantes flourished their
instruments
,
moving in measure in the rear.
A general shout in the multitude preceded the
appearance of Silenus, who was sustained in his
place on an ass by two blackamoors. The
half-empty
skin at his side, the vacant laugh, the foolish
eye, the lolling tongue, the bloated lip, and the
idiotic countenance, gave reason to suspect that
there was a better motive for their support than
any which belonged to the truth of the
representation
.
Two youths then advanced, bearing on a
pole a cluster of grapes that nearly descended to
the ground, and which was intended to represent
the fruit brought from Canaan by the messengers
of Joshuaa symbol much affected by the artists
and mummers of the other hemisphere, on occasions
suited to its display. A huge vehicle, ycleped the
ark of Noah, closed the procession. It held a
wine-press
,
having its workmen embowered among the
vines, and it contained the family of the second
father of the human race. As it rolled past, traces
of the rich liquor were left in the tracks of its
wheels.
Then came the sacrifice, the chant, and the
dance, as in most of the preceding exhibitions, each
of which, like this of Bacchus, had contained
allusions
to the peculiar habits and attributes of the
different deities. The bacchanal that closed the
scene was performed in character; the trumpets
flourished, and the procession departed in the order
in which it had arrived.
Peter relented a little from his usual political
reserve
,
as he witnessed these games in honor of a
deity to whom he so habitually did practical homage,
for it was seldom that this elaborate functionary,
who might be termed quite a doctrinaire in his
way, composed his senses in sleep, without having
pretty effectually steeped them in the liquor of the
neighboring hills; a habit that was of far more
general use among men of his class in that age
than in this of ours, which seems so eminently to
be the season of sobriety.
This is not amiss, of a verity; observed the
contented bailiff, as the Fauns and Bacchantes
moved off the sward, capering and cutting their
classical antics with far more agility and zeal than
grace. This looks like the inspiration of good
wine, Signior Genoese, and were the truth known,
it would be found that the rogue who plays the
part of the fat person on the asshow dost call
the knave, noble Melchior?
Body o'me! if I am wiser than thyself, worthy
bailiff; it is clearly a rogue who can never have
done his mummery so expertly, without some aid
from the flask.
Twill be well to know the fellow's character,
for there may be the occasion to commend him to
the gentlemen of the abbaye, when all is over.
Your skilful ruler has two great instruments that
he need use with discretion, Baron de Willading,
and these are, fear and flattery; and Berne hath
no servant more ready to apply both, or either, as
there may be necessity, than one of her poor
bailiffs that hath not received all his dues from the
general opinion, if truth were spoken. But it is
well to be prepared to speak these good people of
the abbaye fairly, touching their exploits. Harkee,
master halberdier; thou art of Vvey, I think, and
a warm citizen in thy every-day character, or my
eyes do us both injustice.
I am, as you have said, Monsieur le Bailli, a
Vvaisan, and one that is well known among our
artisans.
True, that was visible, spite of thy halberd.
Thou art, no doubt, rarely gifted, and taught to the
letter in these games. Wilt name the character
that has just ridden past on the asshe that hath
so well enacted the drunkard, I mean? His name
hath gone out of our minds for the moment, though
his acting never can, for a better performance of
one overcome by liquor is seldom seen.
Lord keep you! worshipful bailiff, that is
Antoine Giraud, the fat butcher of La Tour de
Peil, and a better at the cup there is not in all the
country of Vaud! No wonder that he hath done
his part so readily; for, while the others have been
reading in books, or drilling like so many awkward
recruits under the school-master, Antoine hath had
little more to perform than to dip into the skin at
his elbow. When the officers of the abbaye
complain
,
lest he should disturb the ceremonies, he bids
them not to make fools of themselves, for every
swallow he gives is just so much done in honor of
the representation; and he swears, by the creed of
Calvin! that there shall be more truth in his acting
than in that of any other of the whole party.
'Odds my life! the fellow hath humor as well
as good acting in himthis Antoine Giraud! Will
you look into the written order they have given
us, fair Adelheid, that we may make sure this
artisan-halberdier
hath not deceived us? We in
authority must not trust a Vvaisan too lightly.
It will be vain, I fear, Herr Bailiff, since the
characters, and not the names of the actors, appear
in the lists. The man in question represents
Silenus
I should think, judging from his appearance
and all the other circumstances.
Well, let it be as thou wilt. Silenus himself
could not play his own part better than it hath
been done by this Antoine Giraud. The fellow
would gain gold like water at the court of the
emperor as a mime, were he only advised to resort
thither. I warrant you, now, he would do Pluto,
or Minerva, or any other god, just as well as he
hath done this rogue Silenus!
The honest admiration of Peter, who, sooth to
say, had not much of the learning of the age, as
the phrase is, raised a smile on the lip of the
beauteous
daughter of the baron, and she glanced a
look to catch the eye of Sigismund, towards whom
all her secret sympathies, whether of sorrow or of
joy, so naturally and so strongly tended. But the
averted head, the fixed attention, and the nearly
immovable and statue-like attitude in which he
stood, showed that a more powerful interest drew
his gaze to the next group. Though ignorant of the
cause of his intense regard, Adelheid instantly
forgot the bailiff, his dogmatism, and his want of
erudition, in the wish to examine those who
approached
.
The more classical portion of the ceremonies
was now duly observed. The council of the
abbaye intended to close with an exhibition that
was more intelligible to the mass of the spectators
than anything which had preceded it, since it was
addressed to the sympathies and habits of every
people, and in all conditions of society. This was
the spectacle that so engrossingly attracted the
attention of Sigismund. It was termed the
procession
of the nuptials, and it was now slowly
advancing to occupy the space left vacant by the
retreat of Antoine Giraud and his companions.
There came in front the customary band,
playing
Vol. I. W
a lively air which use has long appropriated to
the festivities of Hymen. The lord of the manor,
or, as he was termed, the baron, and his
lady-partner
led the train, both apparelled in the rich and
quaint attire of the period. Six ancient couples,
the representatives of happy married lives,
followed
by a long succession of offspring of every age,
including equally the infant at the breast and the
husband and wife in the flower of their days,
walked
next to the noble pair. Then appeared the
section
of a dwelling, which was made to portray the
interior of domestic economy, having its kitchen,
its utensils, and most of the useful and necessary
objects that may be said to compose the material
elements of an humble
mnage
. Within this moiety
of a house, one female plied the wheel, and
another
was occupied in baking. The notary,
bearing
the register beneath an arm, with hat in hand,
and dressed in an exaggerated costume of his
profession
,
strutted in the rear of the two industrious
housemaids. His appearance was greeted with a
general laugh, for the spectators relished the humor
of the caricature with infinite got. But this
sudden
and general burst of merriment was as
quickly
forgotten in the desire to behold the bride and
bridegroom, whose station was next to that of the
officer of the law. It was understood that these
parties were not actors, but that the abbaye had
sought out a couple, of corresponding rank and
means, who had consented to join their fortunes in
reality on the occasion of this great jubilee,
thereby
lending to it a greater appearance of that
genuine joy and festivity which it was the desire
of the heads of the association to represent. Such
a search had not been made without exciting deep
interest in the simple communities which
surrounded
Vvey. Many requisites had been proclaimed
to be necessary in the candidatessuch as beauty,
modesty, merit, and the submission of her sex, in
the bride; and in her partner those qualities which
might fairly entitle him to be the repository of the
happiness of a maiden so endowed.
Many had been the speculations of the Vvaisans
touching the individuals who had been selected to
perform these grave and important characters,
which, for fidelity of representation, were to outdo
that of Silenus himself; but so much care had been
taken by the agents of the abbaye to conceal the
names of those they had selected, that, until this
moment, when disguise was no longer possible, the
public was completely in the dark on the interesting
point. It was so usual to make matches of this
kind on occasions of public rejoicing, and
marriages
of convenience, as they are not unaptly
termed, enter so completely into the habits of all
European communitiesperhaps we might say of
all old communitiesthat common opinion would
not have been violently outraged had it been known
that the chosen pair saw each other for the second
or third time in the procession, and that they had
now presented themselves to take the nuptial vow,
as it were, at the sound of the trumpet or the beat
of drum. Still, it was more usual to consult the
inclinations of the parties, since it gave greater
zest to the ceremony, and these selections of couples
on public occasions were generally supposed to
have more than the common interest of marriages,
since they were believed to be the means of
uniting
,
through the agency of the rich and powerful,
those whom poverty or other adverse
circumstances
had hitherto kept asunder. Rumor spoke
of many an inexorable father who had listened to
reason from the mouths of the great, rather than
balk the public humor; and thousands of pining
hearts, among the obscure and simple, are even
now gladdened at the approach of some joyous
ceremony, which is expected to throw open the
gates of the prison to the debtor and the criminal,
or that of Hymen to those who are richer in
constancy
and affection than in any other stores.
A general murmur and a common movement
betrayed the lively interest of the spectators, as
the principal and real actors in this portion of the
ceremonies drew near. Adelheid felt a warm glow
on her cheek, and a gentler flow of kindness at
her heart, when her eye first caught a view of the
bride and bridegroom, whom she was fain to
believe
a faithful pair that a cruel fortune had hitherto
kept separate, and who were now willing to brave
such strictures as all must encounter who court
public attention, in order to receive the reward of
their enduring love and self-denial. This sympathy,
which was at first rather of an abstract and vague
nature, finding its support chiefly in her own
peculiar
situation and the qualities of her gentle
nature
,
became intensely heightened, however, when
she got a better view of the bride. The modest
mien, abashed eye, and difficult breathing of the
girl, whose personal charms were of an order much
superior to those which usually distinguish rustic
beauty in those countries in which females are not
exempted from the labors of the field, were so
natural and winning as to awaken all her interest;
and, with instinctive quickness, the lady of
Willading
bent her look on the bridegroom, in order
to see if one whose appearance was so eloquent
in her favor was likely to be happy in her choice.
In age, personal appearance, and apparently in
condition
of life, there was no very evident unfitness,
though Adelheid fancied that the mien of the maiden
announced a better breeding than that of her
companion
a
difference which she was willing to
ascribe
,
however, to a greater aptitude in her own
sex to receive the first impress of the moral seal,
than that which belongs to man,
She is fair, whispered Adelheid, slightly
bending
her head towards Sigismund, who stood at her
side, and must deserve her happiness.
She is good, and merits a better fate!
muttered
the youth, breathing so hard as to render his
respiration audible,
The startled Adelheid raised her eyes, and strong
but suppressed agitation was quivering in every
lineament of her companion's countenance. The
attention of those near was so closely drawn
towards
the procession, as to allow an instant of
unobserved
communication.
Sigismund, this is thy sister!
God so cursed her.
Why has an occasion, public as this, been
chosen to wed a maiden of her modesty and
manner?
Can the daughter of Balthazar be squeamish?
Gold, the interest of the abbaye, and the foolish
clat
of this silly scene, have enabled my father to
dispose of his child to yonder mercenary, who has
bargained like a Jew in the affair, and who, among
other conditions, has required that the true name
of his bride shall never be revealed. Are we not
honored by a connexion which repudiates us even
before it is formed!
The hollow stifled laugh of the young man thrilled
on the nerves of his listener, and she ceased the
stolen dialogue to return to the subject at a more
favorable moment. In the mean time the
procession
had reached the station in front of the stage,
where the mummers had already commenced their
rites.
A dozen groomsmen and as many female
attendants
accompanied the pair who were about to take
the nuptial vow. Behind these came the
trousseau
W 2
and the
corbeille;
the first being that portion of the
dowry of the bride which applies to her personal
wants, and the last is an offering of the husband,
and is figuratively supposed to be a pledge of the
strength of his passion. In the present instance
the trousseau was so ample, and betokened so much
liberality, as well as means, on the part of the friends
of a maiden who would consent to become a wife
in a ceremony so public, as to create general
surprise
;
while, on the other hand, a solitary chain
of gold, of rustic fashion, and far more in
consonance
with the occasion, was the sole tribute of
the swain. This difference between the liberality
of the friends of the bride, and that of the
individual
,
who, judging from appearances, had much
the most reason to show his satisfaction, did not
fail to give rise to many comments. They ended
as most comments do, by deductions drawn against
the weaker and least defended of the parties. The
general conclusion was so uncharitable as to infer
that a girl thus bestowed must be under peculiar
disadvantages, else would there have been a greater
equality between the gifts; an inference that was
sufficiently true, though cruelly unjust to its modest
but unconscious subject.
While speculations of this nature were rife
among the spectators, the actors in the ceremony
began their dances, which were distinguished by
the quaint formality that belonged to the politeness
of the age. The songs that succeeded were in
honor of Hymen and his votaries, and a few
couplets
that extolled the virtues and beauty of the
bride were chanted in chorus. A sweep appeared
at the chimney-top, raising his cry, in allusion to
the business of the mnage, and then all moved
away, as had been done by those who had
preceded
them. A guard of halberdiers closed the
procession.
That part of the mummeries which was to be
enacted in front of the estrade was now ended for
the moment, and the different groups proceeded
to various other stations in the town, where the
ceremonies were to be repeated for the benefit of
those who, by reason of the throng, had not been
able to get a near view of what had passed in the
square. Most of the privileged profited by the
pause to leave their seats, and to seek such
relaxation
as the confinement rendered agreeable. Among
those who entirely quitted the square were the
bailiff and his friends, who strolled towards the
promenade on the lake-shore, holding discourse,
in which there was blended much facetious
merriment
concerning what they had just seen.
The bailiff soon drew his companions around
him, in a deep discussion of the nature of the
games, during which the Signor Grimaldi
betrayed
a malicious pleasure in leading on the dogmatic
Peter to expose the confusion that existed in his
head touching the characters of sacred and
profane
history. Even Adelheid was compelled to
laugh at the commencement of this ludicrous
exhibition
,
but her thoughts were not long in
recurring
to a subject in which she felt a nearer and a
more tender interest. Sigismund walked
thoughtfully
at her side, and she profited by the attention
of all around them being drawn to the laughable
dialogue just mentioned, to renew the subject that
had been so lightly touched on before.
I hope thy fair and modest sister will never
have reason to repent her choice, she said,
lessening
her speed, in a manner to widen the
distance
between herself and those she did not wish
to overhear the words, while it brought her nearer
to Sigismund; 't is a frightful violence to all
maiden feeling to be thus dragged before the eyes
of the curious and vulgar, in a scene trying and
solemn as that in which she plights her
marriage-vows
!
Poor Christine! her fate from infancy has been
pitiable. A purer or milder spirit than hers, one
that more sensitively shrinks from rude collision,
does not exist, and yet, on whichever side she turns
her eyes, she meets with appalling prejudices or
opinions to drive a gentle nature like hers to
madness
.
It may be a misfortune, Adelheid, to want
instruction, and to be fated to pass a life in the
depths of ignorance, and in the indulgence of
brutal
passions, but it is scarcely a blessing to have
the mind elevated above the tasks which a cruel
and selfish world so frequently imposes.
Thou wast speaking of thy mild and excellent
sister?
Well hast thou described her! Christine is
mild, and more than modestshe is meek. But
what can meekness itself do to palliate such a
calamity
?
Desirous of averting the stigma of his
family from all he could with prudence, my father
caused my sister, like myself, to be early taken
from the parental home. She was given in charge
to strangers, under such circumstances of secrecy,
as left her long, perhaps too long, in ignorance of
the stock from which she sprang. When maternal
pride led my mother to seek her daughter's society,
the mind of Christine was in some measure formed,
and she had to endure the humiliation of learning
that she was one of a family proscribed. Her gentle
spirit, however, soon became reconciled to the
truth, at least so far as human observation could
penetrate, and, from the moment of the first
terrible
agony, no one has heard her murmur at the
stern decree of Providence. The resignation of
that mild girl has ever been a reproach to my
own rebellious temper, for, Adelheid, I cannot
conceal
the truth from theeI have cursed all that I
dared include in my wicked imprecations, in very
madness at this blight on my hopes! Nay, I have
even accused my father of injustice, that he did
not train me at the side of the block, that I might
take a savage pride in that which is now the bane
of my existence. Not so with Christine; she has
always warmly returned the affection of our
parents
,
as a daughter should love the authors of her
being, while I fear I have been repining when I
should have loved. Our origin is a curse entailed
by the ruthless laws of the land, and it is not to
be attributed to any, at least to none of these later
days, as a fault; and such has ever been the
language
of my poor sister when she has seen a
merit in their wishes to benefit us at the expense
of their own natural affection. I would I could
imitate her reason and resignation!
The view taken by thy sister is that of a
female
,
Sigismund, whose heart is stronger than her
pride; and, what is more, it is just.
I deny it not; 't is just. But the ill-judged
mercy has for ever disqualified me to sympathize
as I could wish with those to whom I belong.
'T is an error to draw these broad distinctions
between
our habits and our affections. Creatures
stern as soldiers cannot bend their fancies like
pliant twigs, or with the facility of female
Duty, said Adelheid gravely, observing that
he hesitated.
If thou wilt, duty. The word has great weight
with thy sex, and I do not question that it should
have with mine.
Thou canst not be wanting in affection for thy
father, Sigismund. The manner in which thou
interposedst to save his life, when we were in that
fearful jeopardy of the tempest, disproves thy
words.
Heaven forbid that I should be wanting in
natural
feeling of this sort, and yet, Adelheid, it is
horrible not to be able to respect, to love
profoundly
,
those to whom we owe our existence!
Christine
in this is far happier than I, an advantage that
I doubt not she owes to her simple life, and to the
closer intimacies which unite females. I am the
son of a headsman; that bitter fact is never absent
from my thoughts when they turn to home and
those scenes in which I could so gladly take
pleasure
.
Balthazar may have meant a kindness when
he caused me to be trained in habits so different
from his own, but, to complete the good work, the
veil should never have been removed.
Adelheid was silent. Though she understood
the feelings which controlled one educated so very
differently from those to whom he owed his birth,
her habits of thought were opposed to the
indulgence
of any reflections that could unsettle the
reverence of the child for its parent.
One of a heart like thine, Sigismund, cannot
hate his mother! she said, after a pause.
In this thou dost me no more than justice; my
words have ill represented my thoughts, if they
have left such an impression. In cooler moments,
I have never considered my birth as more than a
misfortune, and my education I deem a reason for
additional respect and gratitude to my parents,
though it may have disqualified me in some
measure
to enter deeply into their feelings. Christine
herself is not more true, nor of more devoted love,
than my poor mother. It is necessary, Adelheid,
to see and know that excellent woman in order to
understand all the wrongs that the world inflicts
by its ruthless usages.
We will now speak only of thy sister. Has
she been here bestowed without regard to her own
wishes, Sigismund?
I hope not. Christine is meek, but, while
neither
word nor look betrays the weakness, still she
feels the load that crushes us both. She has long
accustomed herself to look at all her own merits
through the medium of this debasement, and has
set too low a value on her own excellent qualities.
Much, very much depends, in this life, on our own
habits of self-estimation, Adelheid; for he who is
prepared to admit unworthinessI speak not of
demerit towards God but towards menwill soon
become accustomed to familiarity with a standard
below his just pretensions, and will end perhaps in
being the thing he dreaded. Such has been the
consequence of Christine's knowledge of her birth,
for, to her meek spirit, there is an appearance of
generosity in overlooking this grand defect, and it
has too well prepared her mind to endow the youth
with a hundred more of the qualities that are
absolutely
necessary to her esteem, but which I fear
exist only in her own warm fancy.
This is touching on the most difficult branch
of human knowledge, returned Adelheid, smiling
sweetly on the agitated brother; a just
appreciation
of ourselves. If there is danger of setting
too low a value on our merits, there is also some
danger of setting too high; though I perfectly
comprehend the difference you would make
between
vulgar vanity, and that self-respect which
is certainly in some degree necessary to success.
But one, like her thou hast described, would scarce
yield her affections without good reason to think
them well bestowed.
Adelheid, thou, who hast never felt the world's
contempt, cannot understand how winning respect
and esteem can be made to those who pine beneath
its weight! My sister hath so long accustomed
herself to think meanly of her hopes, that the
appearance
of liberality and justice in this youth
would have been sufficient of itself to soften her
feelings in his favor. I cannot say I thinkfor
Christine will soon be his wifebut I will say, I
fear that the simple fact of his choosing one that
the world persecutes has given him a value in her
eyes he might not otherwise have possessed.
Thou dost not appear to approve of thy
sister's
choice?
I know the details of the disgusting bargain
better than poor Christine, answered the young
man, speaking between his teeth, like one who
repressed
bitter emotion. I was privy to the greedy
exactions on the one side, and to the humiliating
concessions on the other. Even money could not
buy this boon for Balthazar's child, without a
condition
that the ineffaceable stigma of her birth
should be for ever concealed.
Adelheid saw, by the cold perspiration that stood
on the brow of Sigismund, how intensely he
suffered
,
and she sought an immediate occasion to
lead his thoughts to a less disturbing subject.
With the readiness of her sex, and with the
sensitiveness
and delicacy of a woman that sincerely
loved, she found means to effect the charitable
purpose
,
without again alarming his pride. She
succeeded
so far in calming his feelings, that, when
they rejoined their companions, the manner of the
young man had entirely regained the quiet and
proud composure in which he appeared to take
refuge against the consciousness of the blot that
darkened his hopes, frequently rendering life itself
a burthen nearly too heavy to be borne.
END OF VOL. I.